


Colin Powell - Wikipedia




















 







Colin Powell

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the American politician. For the British soccer player, see Colin Powell (footballer).


Colin Powell








65th United States Secretary of State


In office
January 20, 2001 – January 26, 2005


President
George W. Bush


Deputy
Richard Armitage


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright


Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff


In office
October 1, 1989 – September 30, 1993


President
George H. W. Bush
Bill Clinton


Deputy
Robert Herres
David Jeremiah


Preceded by
William Crowe


Succeeded by
David Jeremiah (Acting)


16th National Security Advisor


In office
November 23, 1987 – January 20, 1989


President
Ronald Reagan


Deputy
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci


Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft





Personal details


Born
Colin Luther Powell
(1937-04-05) April 5, 1937 (age 80)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Alma Johnson (m. 1962)


Education
City University of New York, City College (BS)
George Washington University (MBA)


Signature



Military service


Allegiance
 United States


Service/branch
 United States Army


Years of service
1958–1993


Rank
 General


Unit
 3rd Armored Division
  23rd Infantry Division


Commands
 V Corps
 Joint Chiefs of Staff
  Army Forces Command


Battles/wars
Vietnam War
Invasion of Panama
Persian Gulf War


Colin Luther Powell (/ˈkoʊlᵻn/; born April 5, 1937)[1] is an American statesman and a retired four-star general in the United States Army.[2] Powell was born in Harlem as the son of Jamaican immigrants. During his military career, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989), as Commander of the U.S. Army Forces Command (1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Persian Gulf War. Powell was the first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State, serving under U.S. President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2005, the first African American to serve in that position.[3][4][5][6]
Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and was raised in the South Bronx. His parents, Luther and Maud Powell, immigrated to the United States from Jamaica. Powell was educated in the New York City public schools, graduating from the City College of New York (CCNY), where he earned a bachelor's degree in geology. He also participated in ROTC at CCNY and received a commission as an Army second lieutenant upon graduation in June 1958. His further academic achievements include a Master of Business Administration degree from George Washington University.[7]
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, during which time he held myriad command and staff positions and rose to the rank of 4-star General. His last assignment, from October 1, 1989 to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. He also formulated the Powell Doctrine.[7]
Following his military retirement, Powell wrote his best-selling autobiography, My American Journey. In addition, he pursued a career as a public speaker, addressing audiences across the country and abroad. Prior to his appointment as Secretary of State, Powell was the chairman of America's Promise - The Alliance for Youth, a national nonprofit organization dedicated to mobilizing people from every sector of American life to build the character and competence of young people. He was nominated by President Bush on December 16, 2000 as Secretary of State. After being unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate, he was sworn in as the 65th Secretary of State on January 20, 2001.[7]
Powell is the recipient of numerous U.S. and foreign military awards and decorations. Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medal of Freedom, the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, and the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country. Powell is married to the former Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama. The Powell family includes son Michael (ex-chairman of the Federal Communications Commission); daughters Linda and Anne; daughter-in-law Jane; and grandsons Jeffrey and Bryan.[7]
In 2016, while not a candidate for that year's election, Powell received three electoral votes for the office of President of the United States.



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Military career

2.1 Training
2.2 Vietnam War
2.3 After the Vietnam War
2.4 A "political general"
2.5 Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
2.6 Dates of rank
2.7 Awards and decorations

2.7.1 Badges
2.7.2 Medals and ribbons
2.7.3 Foreign decorations


2.8 13 Rules of Leadership


3 Potential presidential candidate
4 Secretary of State
5 Life after diplomatic service
6 Political views

6.1 Views on the Iraq War
6.2 Role in presidential election of 2008
6.3 Views on the Obama administration
6.4 2016 presidential election


7 Personal life
8 Civilian awards and honors
9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Early life and education
Powell was born on April 5, 1937,[8] in Harlem, a neighborhood in the New York City borough of Manhattan, to Jamaican immigrant parents Maud Arial (née McKoy) and Luther Theophilus Powell. His parents were both of mixed African and Scots ancestry.[9][10] Luther worked as a shipping clerk and Maud as a seamstress.[11] Powell was raised in the South Bronx and attended Morris High School, from which he graduated in 1954. (This school has since closed.)
While at school, Powell worked at a local baby furniture store, where he picked up Yiddish from the eastern European Jewish shopkeepers and some of the customers.[12] He also served as a Shabbos goy, helping Orthodox families with needed tasks on the Sabbath.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Geology from the City College of New York in 1958[14][15] and has said he was a 'C average' student.[16] He later earned an MBA degree from the George Washington University in 1971,[14] after his second tour in Vietnam.
Despite his parents' pronunciation of his name as /ˈkɒlᵻn/, Powell has pronounced his name /ˈkoʊlᵻn/ since childhood, after the heroic World War II flyer Colin P. Kelly Jr.[17] Public officials and radio and television reporters have used Powell's preferred pronunciation.
Military career
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, holding a variety of command and staff positions and rising to the rank of General.[18]
Training
Powell described joining the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) during college as one of the happiest experiences of his life; discovering something he loved and could do well, he felt he had "found himself." According to Powell:

It was only once I was in college, about six months into college when I found something that I liked, and that was ROTC, Reserve Officer Training Corps in the military. And I not only liked it, but I was pretty good at it. That's what you really have to look for in life, something that you like, and something that you think you're pretty good at. And if you can put those two things together, then you're on the right track, and just drive on.[19]

Cadet Powell joined the Pershing Rifles, the ROTC fraternal organization and drill team begun by General John Pershing. Even after he had become a general, Powell kept on his desk a pen set he had won for a drill team competition.
Upon graduation, he received a commission as an Army second lieutenant.[20] After attending basic training at Fort Benning, Powell was assigned to the 48th Infantry, in West Germany, as a platoon leader.[21]
Vietnam War
In his autobiography, Powell said he is haunted by the nightmare of the Vietnam War and felt that the leadership was very ineffective.
Captain Powell served a tour in Vietnam as a South Vietnamese Army (ARVN) advisor from 1962 to 1963. While on patrol in a Viet Cong-held area, he was wounded by stepping on a punji stake.[22] The large infection made it difficult for him to walk, and caused his foot to swell for a short time, shortening his first tour.
He returned to Vietnam as a major in 1968, serving in the 23rd Infantry Division, then as assistant chief of staff of operations for the Americal Division. During the second tour in Vietnam he was decorated for bravery after he survived a helicopter crash, single-handedly rescuing three others, including division commander Major General Charles Martin Gettys, from the burning wreckage.[21][23]
Powell was charged with investigating a detailed letter by 11th Light Infantry Brigade soldier Tom Glen, which backed up rumored allegations of the My Lai Massacre. He wrote: "In direct refutation of this portrayal is the fact that relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are excellent." Later, Powell's assessment would be described as whitewashing the news of the massacre, and questions would continue to remain undisclosed to the public. In May 2004 Powell said to television and radio host Larry King, "I was in a unit that was responsible for My Lai. I got there after My Lai happened. So, in war, these sorts of horrible things happen every now and again, but they are still to be deplored."[24]




Powell in April 1989, as the Commanding General of FORSCOM.


After the Vietnam War
Powell served a White House Fellowship under President Richard Nixon from 1972 to 1973. During 1975–1976 he attended the National War College, Washington, D.C.[25]
In his autobiography, My American Journey, Powell named several officers he served under who inspired and mentored him. As a lieutenant colonel serving in South Korea, Powell was very close to General Henry "Gunfighter" Emerson. Powell said he regarded Emerson as one of the most caring officers he ever met. Emerson insisted his troops train at night to fight a possible North Korean attack, and made them repeatedly watch the television film Brian's Song to promote racial harmony. Powell always professed that what set Emerson apart was his great love of his soldiers and concern for their welfare. After a race riot occurred, in which African American soldiers almost killed a Caucasian officer, Powell was charged by Emerson to crack down on black militants; Powell's efforts led to the discharge of one soldier, and other efforts to reduce racial tensions.[21]
A "political general"
In the early 1980s, Powell served at Fort Carson, Colorado. After he left Fort Carson, Powell became senior military assistant to Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, whom he assisted during the 1983 invasion of Grenada and the 1986 airstrike on Libya.




President Ronald Reagan and National Security Advisor Powell in 1988


In 1986, Powell took over the command of V Corps in Frankfurt, Germany, from Robert Lewis "Sam" Wetzel.
Following the Iran Contra scandal, Powell became, at the age of 49, Ronald Reagan's National Security Advisor, serving from 1987 to 1989 while retaining his Army commission as a lieutenant general.
In April 1989, after his tenure with the National Security Council, Powell was promoted to four-star general under President George H. W. Bush and briefly served as the Commander in Chief, Forces Command (FORSCOM), headquartered at Fort McPherson, Georgia, overseeing all Army, Army Reserve, and National Guard units in the Continental U.S., Alaska, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico. He became the third general since World War II to reach four-star rank without ever serving as a division commander, joining Dwight D. Eisenhower and Alexander Haig.
Later that year, President George H. W. Bush selected him as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.[26]
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff




Powell in November 1989, on his official Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff portrait.


Powell's last military assignment, from October 1, 1989, to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. At age 52, he became the youngest officer, and first Afro-Caribbean American, to serve in this position. Powell was also the first JCS Chair who received his commission through ROTC.[27]
During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including the invasion of Panama in 1989 to remove General Manuel Noriega from power and Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. During these events, Powell earned his nickname, "the reluctant warrior." He rarely advocated military intervention as the first solution to an international crisis, and instead usually prescribed diplomacy and containment.




General Colin Powell, Chairman, Joint Chiefs of Staff, waves from his motorcade during the Persian Gulf War Welcome Home Parade in New York City.


As a military strategist, Powell advocated an approach to military conflicts that maximizes the potential for success and minimizes casualties. A component of this approach is the use of overwhelming force, which he applied to Operation Desert Storm in 1991. His approach has been dubbed the "Powell Doctrine". Powell continued as chairman of the JCS into the Clinton presidency but as a dedicated "realist" he considered himself a bad fit for an administration largely made up of liberal internationalists.[28] He clashed with then-U.S. ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright over the Bosnian crisis, as he opposed any military interventions that didn't involve US interests.[29]
During his chairmanship of the JCS, there was discussion of awarding Powell a fifth star, granting him the rank of General of the Army. But even in the wake of public and Congressional pressure[30][31] to do so, Clinton-Gore presidential transition team staffers decided against it.[32][33][34]
Dates of rank

Promotions

Rank
Date


 General
April 4, 1989


 Lieutenant general
March 26, 1986


 Major general
August 1, 1983


 Brigadier general
June 1, 1979


 Colonel
February 1, 1976


 Lieutenant colonel
July 9, 1970


 Major
May 24, 1966


 Captain
June 2, 1962


 First lieutenant
December 30, 1959


 Second lieutenant
June 9, 1958


Awards and decorations
Badges







Combat Infantryman Badge









Expert Infantryman Badge









Ranger Tab









Parachutist Badge









Pathfinder Badge









Air Assault Badge









Presidential Service Badge









Secretary of Defense Identification Badge









Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge









Army Staff Identification Badge




Medals and ribbons











Defense Distinguished Service Medal with three oak leaf clusters









Distinguished Service Medal, Army with oak leaf cluster



Defense Superior Service Medal









Legion of Merit with oak leaf cluster



Soldier's Medal



Bronze Star



Purple Heart



Air Medal



Joint Service Commendation Medal










Army Commendation Medal with two oak leaf clusters



Presidential Medal of Freedom with Distinction (1993)[35]



Presidential Medal of Freedom (1991)



Presidential Citizens Medal









National Defense Service Medal with bronze service star









Vietnam Service Medal with silver service star



Army Service Ribbon



Army Overseas Service Ribbon with award numeral 4


Foreign decorations



Skanderbeg's Order (Albania)



Honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) (United Kingdom)



Légion d'honneur, Grand Cross (France)



Meritorious Service Cross (M.S.C.) (Canada)



Order of Stara Planina in the First Order (Bulgaria)[36][37]



Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation



Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal


13 Rules of Leadership
First printed in the August 13, 1989 issue of Parade magazine,[38] these are Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership.[39][40]

It ain't as bad as you think.
Get mad, then get over it.
Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.
It can be done.
Be careful what you choose. You may get it.
Don't let adverse facts stand in the way of a good decision.
You can't make someone else's choices.
Check small things.
Share credit.
Remain calm. Be kind.
Have a vision.
Don't take counsel of your fears or naysayers.
Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.

Potential presidential candidate
Powell's experience in military matters made him a very popular figure with both American political parties. Many Democrats admired his moderate stance on military matters, while many Republicans saw him as a great asset associated with the successes of past Republican administrations. Put forth as a potential Democratic Vice Presidential nominee in the 1992 U.S. presidential election[41] or even potentially replacing Vice President Dan Quayle as the Republican Vice Presidential nominee,[42] Powell eventually declared himself a Republican and began to campaign for Republican candidates in 1995.[43] He was touted as a possible opponent of Bill Clinton in the 1996 U.S. presidential election, possibly capitalizing on a split conservative vote in Iowa[44] and even leading New Hampshire polls for the GOP nomination,[45] but Powell declined, citing a lack of passion for politics.[46] Powell defeated Clinton 50–38 in a hypothetical match-up proposed to voters in the exit polls conducted on Election Day.[47] Despite not standing in the race, Powell won the Republican New Hampshire Vice-Presidential primary on write-in votes.[48]
In 1997 Powell founded America's Promise with the objective of helping children from all socioeconomic sectors. That same year saw the establishment of The Colin L. Powell Center for Leadership and Service. The mission of the Center is to "prepare new generations of publicly engaged leaders from populations previously underrepresented in public service and policy circles, to build a strong culture of civic engagement at City College, and to mobilize campus resources to meet pressing community needs and serve the public good." [49]
Powell was mentioned as a potential candidate in the 2000 U.S. presidential election, but decided against running.[50] Once Texas Governor George W. Bush secured the Republican nomination, Powell endorsed him for president and spoke at the 2000 Republican National Convention. Bush eventually won, and Powell was appointed Secretary of State.
In the electoral college vote count of 2016, Powell received three votes from faithless electors from Washington.
Secretary of State




Powell, National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice and Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld listen to President George W. Bush speak.


As Secretary of State in the Bush administration, Powell was perceived as moderate. Powell was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate. Over the course of his tenure he traveled less than any other U.S. Secretary of State in 30 years. [51]
On September 11, 2001, Powell was in Lima, Peru, meeting with President Alejandro Toledo and US Ambassador John Hamilton, and attending the special session of the OAS General Assembly that subsequently adopted the Inter-American Democratic Charter. After the September 11 attacks, Powell's job became of critical importance in managing America's relationships with foreign countries in order to secure a stable coalition in the War on Terrorism.
Powell came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 Invasion of Iraq. In a press statement on February 24, 2001, he had said that sanctions against Iraq had prevented the development of any weapons of mass destruction by Saddam Hussein. As was the case in the days leading up to the Persian Gulf War, Powell was initially opposed to a forcible overthrow of Saddam, preferring to continue a policy of containment. However, Powell eventually agreed to go along with the Bush administration's determination to remove Saddam. He had often clashed with others in the administration, who were reportedly planning an Iraq invasion even before the September 11 attacks, an insight supported by testimony by former terrorism czar Richard Clarke in front of the 9/11 Commission. The main concession Powell wanted before he would offer his full support for the Iraq War was the involvement of the international community in the invasion, as opposed to a unilateral approach. He was also successful in persuading Bush to take the case of Iraq to the United Nations, and in moderating other initiatives. Powell was placed at the forefront of this diplomatic campaign.




Computer-generated image of an alleged mobile production facility for biological weapons, presented by Powell at the UN Security Council. On May 27, 2003, US and UK experts examined the trailers and declared they had nothing to do with biological weapons.[52]






Powell holding a model vial of anthrax while giving a presentation to the United Nations Security Council in February 2003.


Powell's chief role was to garner international support for a multi-national coalition to mount the invasion. To this end, Powell addressed a plenary session of the United Nations Security Council on February 5, 2003, to argue in favor of military action. Citing numerous anonymous Iraqi defectors, Powell asserted that "there can be no doubt that Saddam Hussein has biological weapons and the capability to rapidly produce more, many more." Powell also stated that there was "no doubt in my mind" that Saddam was working to obtain key components to produce nuclear weapons.[53]
Most observers praised Powell's oratorical skills. However, Britain's Channel 4 News reported soon afterwards that a UK intelligence dossier that Powell had referred to as a "fine paper" during his presentation had been based on old material and plagiarized an essay by American graduate student Ibrahim al-Marashi.[54][55] A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
In an interview with Charlie Rose, Powell contended that prior to his UN presentation, he had merely four days to review the data concerning WMD in Iraq.[56]
A Senate report on intelligence failures would later detail the intense debate that went on behind the scenes on what to include in Powell's speech. State Department analysts had found dozens of factual problems in drafts of the speech. Some of the claims were taken out, but others were left in, such as claims based on the yellowcake forgery.[57] The administration came under fire for having acted on faulty intelligence, particularly what was single-sourced to the informant known as Curveball. Powell later recounted how Vice President Dick Cheney had joked with him before he gave the speech, telling him, "You've got high poll ratings; you can afford to lose a few points." Powell's longtime aide-de-camp and Chief of Staff from 1989–2003, Colonel Lawrence Wilkerson, later characterized Cheney's view of Powell's mission as to "go up there and sell it, and we'll have moved forward a peg or two. Fall on your damn sword and kill yourself, and I'll be happy, too."[58]
In September 2005, Powell was asked about the speech during an interview with Barbara Walters and responded that it was a "blot" on his record. He went on to say, "It will always be a part of my record. It was painful. It's painful now."[59]
Wilkerson said that he inadvertently participated in a hoax on the American people in preparing Powell's erroneous testimony before the United Nations Security Council.[60]
Because Powell was seen as more moderate than most figures in the administration, he was spared many of the attacks that have been leveled at more controversial advocates of the invasion, such as Donald Rumsfeld and Paul Wolfowitz. At times, infighting among the Powell-led State Department, the Rumsfeld-led Defense Department, and Cheney's office had the effect of polarizing the administration on crucial issues, such as what actions to take regarding Iran and North Korea.




Secretary Powell with NATO Secretary General Jaap de Hoop Scheffer


After Saddam Hussein had been deposed, Powell's new role was to once again establish a working international coalition, this time to assist in the rebuilding of post-war Iraq. On September 13, 2004, Powell testified before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee,[61] acknowledging that the sources who provided much of the information in his February 2003 UN presentation were "wrong" and that it was "unlikely" that any stockpiles of WMDs would be found. Claiming that he was unaware that some intelligence officials questioned the information prior to his presentation, Powell pushed for reform in the intelligence community, including the creation of a national intelligence director who would assure that "what one person knew, everyone else knew."
Additionally, Powell has been critical of other instances of U.S. foreign policy in the past, such as its support for the 1973 Chilean coup d'état. From two separate interviews in 2003, Powell stated in one about the 1973 event "I can't justify or explain the actions and decisions that were made at that time. It was a different time. There was a great deal of concern about communism in this part of the world. Communism was a threat to the democracies in this part of the world. It was a threat to the United States."[62] In another interview, however, he also simply stated "With respect to your earlier comment about Chile in the 1970s and what happened with Mr. Allende, it is not a part of American history that we're proud of."[63]
Powell announced his resignation as Secretary of State on November 15, 2004. According to The Washington Post, he had been asked to resign by the president's chief of staff, Andrew Card.[58] Powell announced that he would stay on until the end of Bush's first term or until his replacement's confirmation by Congress. The following day, Bush nominated National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice as Powell's successor. News of Powell's leaving the Administration spurred mixed reactions from politicians around the world — some upset at the loss of a statesman seen as a moderating factor within the Bush administration, but others hoping for Powell's successor to wield more influence within the cabinet.
In mid-November, Powell stated that he had seen new evidence suggesting that Iran was adapting missiles for a nuclear delivery system.[64] The accusation came at the same time as the settlement of an agreement between Iran, the IAEA, and the European Union.
On December 31, 2004, Powell rang in the New Year by pressing a button in Times Square with New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg to initiate the ball drop and 60 second countdown, ushering in the year 2005. He appeared on the networks that were broadcasting New Year's Eve specials and talked about this honor, as well as being a native of New York City.[65]
Life after diplomatic service
After retiring from the role of Secretary of State, Powell returned to private life. In April 2005, he was privately telephoned by Republican senators Lincoln Chafee and Chuck Hagel,[66] at which time Powell expressed reservations and mixed reviews about the nomination of John R. Bolton as ambassador to the United Nations, but refrained from advising the senators to oppose Bolton (Powell had clashed with Bolton during Bush's first term).[67] The decision was viewed as potentially dealing significant damage to Bolton's chances of confirmation. Bolton was put into the position via a recess appointment because of the strong opposition in the Senate.




Powell with Ban Ki-moon, 2004.


On April 28, 2005, an opinion piece in The Guardian by Sidney Blumenthal (a former top aide to President Bill Clinton) claimed that Powell was in fact "conducting a campaign" against Bolton because of the acrimonious battles they had had while working together, which among other things had resulted in Powell cutting Bolton out of talks with Iran and Libya after complaints about Bolton's involvement from the British. Blumenthal added that "The foreign relations committee has discovered that Bolton made a highly unusual request and gained access to 10 intercepts by the National Security Agency. Staff members on the committee believe that Bolton was probably spying on Powell, his senior advisors and other officials reporting to him on diplomatic initiatives that Bolton opposed."[68]
In July 2005, Powell joined Kleiner, Perkins, Caufield & Byers, a well-known Silicon Valley venture capital firm, with the title of "strategic limited partner."
In September 2005, Powell criticized the response to Hurricane Katrina.[69] Powell said that thousands of people were not properly protected, but because they were poor rather than because they were black.




Powell walks with newly crowned King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Vice President Dick Cheney, and former President George H. W. Bush, Saudi Arabia, August 2005.


On January 5, 2006, he participated in a meeting at the White House of former Secretaries of Defense and State to discuss United States foreign policy with Bush administration officials. In September 2006, Powell sided with more moderate Senate Republicans in supporting more rights for detainees and opposing President Bush's terrorism bill. He backed Senators John Warner, John McCain and Lindsey Graham in their statement that U.S. military and intelligence personnel in future wars will suffer for abuses committed in 2006 by the U.S. in the name of fighting terrorism. Powell stated that "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of [America's] fight against terrorism."[70]
Also in 2006, Powell began appearing as a speaker at a series of motivational events called Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani. In his speeches for the tour, he openly criticized the Bush Administration on a number of issues. Powell has been the recipient of mild criticism for his role with Get Motivated which has been called a "get-rich-quick-without-much-effort, feel-good schemology."[71]
In 2007 he joined the Board of Directors of Steve Case's new company Revolution Health. Powell also serves on the Council on Foreign Relations Board of directors.[72]
Powell, in honor of Martin Luther King Day, dropped the ceremonial first puck at a New York Islanders ice hockey game at Nassau Coliseum on January 21, 2008. On November 11, 2008, Powell again dropped the puck in recognition of Military Appreciation Day and Veterans Day.[73][74]
Recently, Powell has encouraged young people to continue to use new technologies to their advantage in the future. In a speech at the Center for Strategic and International Studies to a room of young professionals, he said, "That's your generation...a generation that is hard-wired digital, a generation that understands the power of the information revolution and how it is transforming the world. A generation that you represent, and you're coming together to share; to debate; to decide; to connect with each other."[75] At this event, he encouraged the next generation to involve themselves politically on the upcoming Next America Project, which uses online debate to provide policy recommendations for the upcoming administration.
In 2008, Powell served as a spokesperson for National Mentoring Month, a campaign held each January to recruit volunteer mentors for at-risk youth.[76]
Soon after Barack Obama's 2008 election, Powell began being mentioned as a possible cabinet member.[77] He was not nominated.
In September 2009, Powell advised President Obama against surging US forces in Afghanistan.[78] The president announced the surge the following December.
On March 14, 2014, Salesforce.com announced that Powell had joined its Board of Directors.[79]
Political views
A liberal Republican, Powell is well known for his willingness to support liberal or centrist causes.[80] He is pro-choice regarding abortion, and in favor of "reasonable" gun control.[80][clarification needed] He stated in his autobiography that he supports affirmative action that levels the playing field, without giving a leg up to undeserving persons because of racial issues. Powell was also instrumental in the 1993 implementation of the military's don't ask, don't tell policy,[80] though he later supported its repeal as proposed by Robert Gates and Admiral Mike Mullen in January 2010, saying "circumstances had changed".[81]

External video

 Booknotes interview with Powell on My American Journey, January 7, 1996, C-SPAN


The Vietnam War had a profound effect on Powell's views of the proper use of military force. These views are described in detail in the autobiography My American Journey. The Powell Doctrine, as the views became known, was a central component of U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf War (the first U.S. war in Iraq) and U.S. invasion of Afghanistan (the overthrow of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan following the September 11 attacks). The hallmark of both operations was strong international cooperation, and the use of overwhelming military force.
Powell was the subject of controversy in 2004 when, in a conversation with British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, he reportedly referred to neoconservatives within the Bush administration as "fucking crazies."[82] In addition to being reported in the press (although the expletive was generally censored in the U.S. press), the quotation was used by James Naughtie in his book, The Accidental American: Tony Blair and the Presidency, and by Chris Patten in his book, Cousins and Strangers: America, Britain, and Europe in a New Century.
In a September 2006 letter to Sen. John McCain, General Powell expressed opposition to President Bush's push for military tribunals of those formerly and currently classified as enemy combatants. Specifically, he objected to the effort in Congress to "redefine Common Article 3 of the Geneva Convention." He also asserted: "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of our fight against terrorism."[83]
Powell endorsed President Obama in 2008 and again in 2012. When asked why he is still a Republican on Meet the Press he said, "I’m still a Republican. And I think the Republican Party needs me more than the Democratic Party needs me. And you can be a Republican and still feel strongly about issues such as immigration, and improving our education system, and doing something about some of the social problems that exist in our society and our country. I don’t think there's anything inconsistent with this." [84]
Views on the Iraq War
While Powell was wary of a military solution, he supported the decision to invade Iraq after the Bush administration concluded that diplomatic efforts had failed. After his departure from the State Department, Powell repeatedly emphasized his continued support for American involvement in the Iraq War.
At the 2007 Aspen Ideas Festival in Colorado,[85] Powell revealed that he had spent two and a half hours explaining to President Bush "the consequences of going into an Arab country and becoming the occupiers." During this discussion, he insisted that the U.S. appeal to the United Nations first, but if diplomacy failed, he would support the invasion: "I also had to say to him that you are the President, you will have to make the ultimate judgment, and if the judgment is this isn't working and we don't think it is going to solve the problem, then if military action is undertaken I'm with you, I support you."[86]
In a 2008 interview on CNN, Powell reiterated his support for the 2003 decision to invade Iraq in the context of his endorsement of Barack Obama, stating: "My role has been very, very straightforward. I wanted to avoid a war. The president [Bush] agreed with me. We tried to do that. We couldn't get it through the U.N. and when the president made the decision, I supported that decision. And I've never blinked from that. I've never said I didn't support a decision to go to war."[87]
Powell's position on the Iraq War troop surge of 2007 has been less consistent. In December 2006, he expressed skepticism that the strategy would work and whether the U.S. military had enough troops to carry it out successfully. He stated: "I am not persuaded that another surge of troops into Baghdad for the purposes of suppressing this communitarian violence, this civil war, will work."[88] Following his endorsement of Barack Obama in October 2008, however, Powell praised General David Petraeus and U.S. troops, as well as the Iraqi government, concluding that "it's starting to turn around."[87] By mid-2009, he had concluded a surge of U.S. forces in Iraq should have come sooner, perhaps in late 2003.[89] Throughout this period, Powell consistently argued that Iraqi political progress was essential, not just military force.
Role in presidential election of 2008
Powell donated the maximum allowable amount to John McCain's campaign in the summer of 2007[90] and in early 2008, his name was listed as a possible running mate for Republican nominee McCain's bid during the 2008 U.S. presidential election.[91] However, on October 19, 2008, Powell announced his endorsement of Barack Obama during a Meet the Press interview, citing "his ability to inspire, because of the inclusive nature of his campaign, because he is reaching out all across America, because of who he is and his rhetorical abilities", in addition to his "style and substance." He additionally referred to Obama as a "transformational figure".[92][93] Powell further questioned McCain's judgment in appointing Sarah Palin as the vice presidential candidate, stating that despite the fact that she is admired, "now that we have had a chance to watch her for some seven weeks, I don't believe she's ready to be president of the United States, which is the job of the vice president." He said that Obama's choice for vice-president, Joe Biden, was ready to be president. He also added that he was "troubled" by the "false intimations that Obama was Muslim." Powell stated that "[Obama] is a Christian—he's always been a Christian... But the really right answer is, what if he is? Is there something wrong with being a Muslim in this country? The answer's no, that's not America." Powell then mentioned Kareem Rashad Sultan Khan, a Muslim American soldier in the U.S. Army who served and died in the Iraq War. He later stated, "Over the last seven weeks, the approach of the Republican Party has become narrower and narrower [...] I look at these kind of approaches to the campaign, and they trouble me."[92][93] Powell concluded his Sunday morning talk show comments, "It isn't easy for me to disappoint Sen. McCain in the way that I have this morning, and I regret that [...] I think we need a transformational figure. I think we need a president who is a generational change and that's why I'm supporting Barack Obama, not out of any lack of respect or admiration for Sen. John McCain."[94] Later in a December 12, 2008, CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Powell reiterated his belief that during the last few months of the campaign, Palin pushed the Republican party further to the right and had a polarizing impact on it.[95]
Views on the Obama administration
In a July 2009 CNN interview with John King, Powell expressed concern over President Obama growing the size of the federal government and the size of the federal budget deficit.[96] In September 2010, he criticized the Obama administration for not focusing "like a razor blade" on the economy and job creation. Powell reiterated that Obama was a "transformational figure."[97] In a video that aired on CNN.com in November 2011, Colin Powell said in reference to Barack Obama, "many of his decisions have been quite sound. The financial system was put back on a stable basis."[98]
On October 25, 2012, 12 days before the presidential election, he gave his endorsement to President Obama for re-election during a broadcast of CBS This Morning. He cited success and forward progress in foreign and domestic policy arenas under the Obama Administration, and made the following statement: "I voted for him in 2008 and I plan to stick with him in 2012 and I'll be voting for he [sic] and for Vice President Joe Biden next month."
As additional reason for his endorsement, Powell cited the changing positions and perceived lack of thoughtfulness of Mitt Romney on foreign affairs, and a concern for the validity of Romney's economic plans.[99]
In an interview with ABC's Diane Sawyer and George Stephanopoulos during ABC's coverage of President Obama's second inauguration, Powell criticized members of the Republican Party who "demonize[d] the president". He called on GOP leaders to publicly denounce such talk.[100]
2016 presidential election
Powell has been very vocal on the state of the Republican party. Speaking at a Washington Ideas forum in early October 2015, he warned the audience that the Republican party had begun a move to the fringe right, lessening the chances of a Republican White House in the future. He also remarked on Republican presidential contender Donald Trump's statements regarding immigrants, noting that there were many immigrants working in Trump hotels.[101]
In March 2016, Powell denounced the "nastiness" of the 2016 Republican primaries during an interview on CBS This Morning. He compared the race to a "reality show", and stated that the campaign had gone "into the mud".[102]
In August 2016, Powell accused the Clinton campaign of trying to pin Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton's email controversy on him. Speaking to People magazine, Powell said, "The truth is, she was using [the private email server] for a year before I sent her a memo telling her what I did."[103]
On September 13, 2016, emails were obtained that revealed Powell's private communications regarding both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton. Powell privately reiterated his comments regarding Clinton's email scandal, writing, "I have told Hillary's minions repeatedly that they are making a mistake trying to drag me in, yet they still try," and complaining that "Hillary’s mafia keeps trying to suck me into it" in another email.[104] In another email discussing Clinton's controversy, Powell noted that she should have told everyone what she did "two years ago", and said that she has not "been covering herself with glory." Writing on the 2012 Benghazi attack controversy surrounding Clinton, Powell said to then U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice, "Benghazi is a stupid witch hunt." Commenting on Clinton in a general sense, Powell mused that "Everything [Clinton] touches she kind of screws up with hubris", and in another email stated "I would rather not have to vote for her, although she is a friend I respect."[105]
Powell referred to Donald Trump as a "national disgrace", with "no sense of shame". He wrote candidly of Trump's role in the birther movement, which he referred to as "racist". Powell suggested that the media ignore Trump, saying, "To go on and call him an idiot just emboldens him." The emails were obtained by the media as the result of a hack.[106]
Powell endorsed Clinton on October 25, 2016, stating it was "because I think she's qualified, and the other gentleman is not qualified."[107]
Despite not running in the election, Powell received three electoral votes for president from faithless electors in Washington who had pledged to vote for Clinton, coming in third overall.[108] After Barack Obama, Powell was only the second African American to receive electoral votes in a presidential election. He was also the first Republican since 1984 to receive electoral votes from Washington in a presidential election, as well as the first Republican African American to do so.
Personal life
Powell married Alma Johnson on August 25, 1962. Their son, Michael Powell, was the chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) from 2001 to 2005. His daughters are Linda Powell, an actress, and Annemarie Powell. As a hobby, Powell restores old Volvo and Saab cars.[109][110] In 2013, he faced questions about a relationship with a Romanian diplomat, after a hacked AOL email account had been made public. He acknowledged a "very personal" email relationship but denied further involvement.[111]
Civilian awards and honors
Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medals of Freedom (the second with distinction), the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal, and the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country.

In 1988, Powell received the Academy of Achievement's Golden Plate Award.
In 1990, Powell received the U.S. Senator John Heinz Award for Greatest Public Service by an Elected or Appointed Official, an award given out annually by Jefferson Awards.[112]
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom by President George H. W. Bush.
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Spingarn Medal from the NAACP.[113]
In 1991, Powell was inducted into the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans,[114] which "honors the achievements of outstanding individuals in U.S. society who have succeeded in spite of adversity and of encouraging young people to pursue their dreams through higher education."
On September 30, 1993, Powell was awarded his second Presidential Medal of Freedom with distinction by President Bill Clinton.[35]
On November 9, 1993, Powell was awarded the second Ronald Reagan Freedom Award, by President Ronald Reagan. Powell served as Reagan's National Security Advisor from 1987–1989.[115]
On December 15, 1993, Colin Powell was created an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom.
In 1998, he was awarded the prestigious Sylvanus Thayer Award by the United States Military Academy for his commitment to the ideals of "Duty, Honor, Country."
The 2002 Liberty Medal was awarded to Colin Powell on July 4 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. In his acceptance speech, Powell reminded Americans that "It is for America, the Land of the Free and the Home of the Brave, to help freedom ring across the globe, unto all the peoples thereof. That is our solemn obligation, and we will not fail."[116]





Coat of arms



The Coat of Arms of Colin Powell was granted by the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh on February 4, 2004. Technically the grant was to Powell's father (a British subject) to be passed on by descent. Scotland's King of Arms is traditionally responsible for granting arms to Commonwealth citizens of Scottish descent. Blazoned as:

Azure, two swords in saltire points downwards between four mullets Argent, on a chief of the Second a lion passant Gules. On a wreath of the Liveries is set for Crest the head of an American bald-headed eagle erased Proper. And in an escrol over the same this motto, "DEVOTED TO PUBLIC SERVICE."

The swords and stars refer to the former general's career, as does the crest, which is the badge of the 101st Airborne (which he served as a brigade commander in the mid-1970s). The lion may be an allusion to Scotland. The shield can be shown surrounded by the insignia of an honorary Knight Commander of the Most Honorable Order of the Bath (KCB), an award the General received after the first Gulf War.
In 2005 Powell received the Bishop John T. Walker Distinguished Humanitarian Service Award for his contributions to Africa.
AARP honored Powell with the 2006 AARP Andrus Award, the Association's highest honor. This award, named in honor of AARP's founder, Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, is presented biennially to distinguished individuals who have generated positive social change in the world, and whose work and achievements reflect AARP's vision of bringing lifetimes of experience and leadership to serve all generations.
In 2005 Colin and Alma Powell were awarded the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service by the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution.
Colin Powell was initiated as an honorary brother in Sigma Phi Epsilon.
Powell is a recipient of the Silver Buffalo Award, the highest adult award given by the Boy Scouts of America.
A street in Gelnhausen, Germany was named after him: "General-Colin-Powell-Straße".[117]
In 2002, scholar Molefi Kete Asante listed Colin Powell on his list of 100 Greatest African Americans.[118]
In 2009, an elementary school named for Colin Powell opened in El Paso. It is in the El Paso Independent School District, located on Fort Bliss property, and serves a portion of Fort Bliss.[119] There is also a street in El Paso named for Powell, Colin Powell Drive.
Powell is an Honorary Board Member of the humanitarian organization Wings of Hope[120]
Since 2006, he is the chairman of the Board of Trustees for Eisenhower Fellowships[121]
In 2006, The Harry S. Truman Research Institute for the Advancement of Peace at The Hebrew University of Jerusalem awarded Colin Powell with the Truman Peace Prize for his efforts to conduct the "war against terrorism", through diplomatic as well as military means, and to avert regional and civil conflicts in many parts of the world.[122]
In September 2012 Union City, New Jersey opened Colin Powell Elementary School, which was named after Powell, and dedicated the school on February 7, 2013, with governor Chris Christie in attendance.[123] Powell himself visited the school on June 4, 2013.[124]
In 2014, Colin Powell was named to the National Board of Advisors for High Point University.[125]

See also


Biography portal
United States Army portal
Military of the United States portal



List of African-American United States Cabinet Secretaries
Plame affair
Pottery Barn rule
Republican and conservative support for Barack Obama in 2008

References


^ "Biographies of the Secretary of State:Colin Luther Powell". U.S. Department of State, Office of the Historian. Retrieved November 16, 2015. 
^ Preferred pronunciation rhymes with "bowel", not "bowl" (as in Charles Powell, Baron Powell of Bayswater) – see Alexander Chancellor, "You Say Tomato", New Yorker. August 9, 1993, p. 27.
^ The first African American secretary of state, Colin Powell, The African American Registry.
^ Biographies – Colin Powell: United States Secretary of State, African American History Month, US Department of Defense.
^ Colin Powell, Britannica Online Encyclopedia.
^ Profile: Colin Powell, BBC News.
^ a b c d "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell". The White House. Retrieved 24 December 2016.   This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.
^ Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Colin Powell". wargs.com. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Branigan, Tania (May 12, 2004). "Colin Powell claims Scottish coat of arms". The Guardian. London. 
^ "Colin Powell's Scottish Ancestry". Eastman's Online Genealogy Newsletter. 9 (20). May 17, 2004. 
^ CNN staff (March 30, 2016). "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. Retrieved September 30, 2016. 
^ Daly, Michael (August 2, 2000). "Powell's Old Nabe Boss a Big Backer". New York Daily News. Retrieved October 19, 2008. Powell explained that he had joined ROTC. He became an officer after graduation, leaving Sickser's with a smattering of Yiddish... 
^ "Former Secretary of State Gen. Colin Powell and Mario Cuomo, former governor of New York State, each a former Shabbos goy, both share fond recollections of their youth, when they were uniquely qualified to lend a Jewish neighbor a hand." Fertig, Avi. "Glatt Kosher Adventure To The Land Down Under", The Jewish Press, November 21, 2007.
^ a b "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. April 2, 2017. Education: City College of New York, B.S. in geology,1958; George Washington University, M.B.A.,1971; National War College, 1976 
^ "About Gen. Colin L. Powell, USA (Ret.)". The Colin Powell School for Civic and Global Leadership, The City College of New York. He attended New York City public schools and the City College of New York where he earned a B.S. in Geology. 
^ Schwab, Nikki (May 30, 2012). "Colin Powell: bad student". Washington Examiner. My cousins became lawyers and doctors and judges and I just sort of hung around," he recalled. "I had a straight C average all the way through high school and the City College of New York — I'm not sure how I got in. 
^ "Major Player: Gen. Colin L. Powell (Ret.)". Washington Post. July 28, 2000. Retrieved April 30, 2010. 
^ "Colin (Luther) Powell Biography (1937– )". The Biography Channel. A&E Television Networks. Retrieved May 31, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell Interview". achievement.org. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell (biography)". The White House. April 29, 2003. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b c "Colin Powell". CNN. 1996. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ Kearny, Cresson H. (1996). Jungle Snafus...And Remedies. Cave Junction, Oregon: Oregon Institute of Science & Medicine. p. 179. ISBN 978-1-884067-10-5. OCLC 41447083. 
^ Finlayson, Reggie (2003). Colin Powell. Biography (A & E). Twenty-First Century Books. p. 55. ISBN 9780822549666. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ "Interview on CNN's Larry King Live". New York: U.S. Department of State. May 4, 2004. Archived from the original on January 10, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brown, Warren; Wagner, Heather Lehr (1 Jan 2009). Colin Powell: Soldier and Statesman. Infobase Publishing. p. 41,43. 
^ "Online NewsHour: Colin Powell". Pbs.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "The 14 Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff". Joint History Office, U.S. Department of Defense. American Forces Press Service. August 10, 1999. Retrieved April 24, 2008. 
^ O'Sullivan, Christopher (2010). Colin Powell: A Political Biography. Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers. p. 100. ISBN 978-0-7425-5187-9. 
^ "Reluctant warrior", The Observer, September 30, 2001.
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (March 1991). "U.S. Sen. Kasten Pushing Effort To Award Powell With Historic Fifth Star". Jet. 79 (23). ISSN 0021-5996. Retrieved February 21, 2011. ...there is a movement afoot in the U.S. Senate to award an historic fifth star to the nation's first Black Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Colin L. Powell for his military proficiency. 
^ Italia, Bob (1991). Armed Forces: War in the Gulf. Abdo & Daughters. pp. 44–6. ISBN 978-1-56239-026-6. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Others want to make him a five-star general. [...] Congress is talking about giving him a fifth silver star, which is very rare. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (1999). All Too Human: A Political Education. Thorndike Press. pp. 330–1. ISBN 978-0-7862-2016-8. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Mack asked me to secretly research the procedure for awarding a fifth star to a general. [...] If Powell did challenge Clinton, the fifth star would forestall criticism of the general's military record. 
^ Hamilton, Nigel (2007). Bill Clinton: Mastering the Presidency. PublicAffairs. pp. 190, 399. ISBN 978-1-58648-516-0. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Moreover, for the very reason he admired Colin Powell as the most distinguished living black American, Clinton also feared the general as a potential rival. [...] Bill Clinton had denied Powell his rightful fifth star... 
^ Halberstam, David (2001). War in a Time of Peace: Bush, Clinton, and the Generals. Scribner. p. 190. ISBN 978-0-7432-0212-1. Retrieved February 22, 2011. They checked it out and found that the last general to get a fifth star was Omar Bradley forty-three years earlier. Powell, they decided, was not Bradley. Besides, as George Stephanopoulos noted, if they gave him one more star, it might help him one day politically. 
^ a b Clinton, W. J. (September 30, 1993). "Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia". University of California, Santa Barbara: The American Presidency Project. Retrieved September 18, 2016. In recognition of your legacy and service, of your courage and accomplishment, today, General Powell, I was honored to present you with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, with distinction. I want to tell all those here in attendance that this was the second Medal of Freedom you have received, the first from President Bush in 1991. And today, you became only the second American citizen in the history of the Republic to be the recipient of two Medals of Freedom. 
^ "Remarks With Bulgarian President Georgi Purvanov At Award Ceremony for the Stara Planina First Order Medal". Presidential Palace, Coat of Arms Hall, Sofia, Bulgaria: U.S. Department of State. December 7, 2004. 
^ "Parvanov-Powell". President of the Republic of Bulgaria. December 7, 2004. President Georgi Parvanov awarded US Secretary of State Colin Powell with the highest Bulgarian order "Stara Planina" for his extraordinary services to the advancement of Bulgarian-American relations and in connection with the 100th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between Bulgaria and the United States. 
^ Powell, Colin (2012). It Worked for Me. HarperCollins. pp. 3–4. ISBN 978-0-06-213512-4. 
^ McClimon, Tim (27 August 2012). "Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership". American Express. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ "Can we apply Colin Powell's 13 rules?" (PDF). Texas Child Care Quarterly. Summer 2012. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ Schram, Martin (January 21, 1995). "Don't Count Out Colin Powell". The Seattle Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Van Dyk, Ted (September 6, 1990). "Will Powell Run With Bush in '92?". The New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Lusane C. Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice: Foreign Policy, Race and the New American Century. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006, ISBN 0-275-98309-9, p. 46.
^ Apple, R. W. (October 28, 1995). "Life in Iowa May Not Have Changed, But the Political Turf Is Another Story". The New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Berke, Richard L. (October 19, 1995). "New Hampshire Poll Finds Powell With an Edge". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Clines, Francis X. (November 9, 1995). "The Powell Decision: The Announcement". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Plissner, Martin (February 7, 2007). "Ready for Obama Already". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ "NH US Vice President – R Primary Race". Our Campaigns. Feb 20, 1996. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Colin L. Powell Center for Public Policy". Retrieved 16 February 2013. 
^ "How Mccain Does It". 2000-03-06. Retrieved 2016-08-12. 
^ Kessler, Glenn (July 14, 2004). "Powell Flies in the Face of Tradition; The Secretary of State Is Least Traveled in 30 Years". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Warrick, Joby (April 12, 2006). "Lacking Biolabs, Trailers Carried Case for War; Administration Pushed Notion of Banned Iraqi Weapons Despite Evidence to Contrary". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Powell, Secretary Colin L. (February 5, 2003). "Remarks to the United Nations Security Council". New York City: U.S. Department of State. Archived from the original on January 9, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Lawless, Jill (February 7, 2003). "U.S. Scholar Uncredited in Iraq Report". Associated Press. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "UK accused of lifting dossier text". CNN. February 7, 2003. 
^ Charlie Rose. charlierose.com. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ Miller, Greg (July 15, 2004). "Flaws Cited in Powell's U.N. Speech on Iraq". Los Angeles Times. reprinted by CommonDreams.org. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b DeYoung, Karen (October 1, 2006). "Falling on His Sword: Colin Powell's most significant moment turned out to be his lowest". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell on Iraq, Race, and Hurricane Relief". ABC News: 20/20. September 8, 2005. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brancaccio, David (February 3, 2006). "Iraq Pre-War Intelligence". NOW. PBS. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Pincus, Walter (February 14, 2004). "Support for Intelligence Plan". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Remarks at the 2003 Groundhog Job Shadow Day Program, Secretary Colin L. Powell, Remarks and question and answer session with students, Washington, DC, January 31, 2003, excerpt on 1973 Chile coup, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell, Interview On Black Entertainment Television's Youth Town Hall, February 20, 2003, excerpt on 1973 U.S. covert action in Chile, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Sciolino, Elaine (November 18, 2004). "Exiles Add to Claims on Iran Nuclear Arms". New York Times. Retrieved February 8, 2007. 
^ Anderson, Cooper (December 31, 2004). "Transcripts: New Year's Eve Special". CNN. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ VandeHei, Jim; Robin Wright (April 22, 2005). "Powell Playing Quiet Role in Bolton Battle". Washington Post. 
^ Borger, Julian (April 23, 2005). "Powell's remarks harm Bolton's chances of UN job". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (April 28, 2005). "The good soldier's revenge". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Powell criticises storm response". BBC News. September 9, 2005. 
^ "Senators defy Bush on tribunals". BBC News. September 15, 2006. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Wilken, Dennis (September 7, 2008). "Down the Rabbit Hole". American Satellite Magazine. Retrieved October 10, 2008. 
^ "Board of Directors". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved December 6, 2007. 
^ "islanderspointblank.com". islanderspointblank.com. Archived from the original on July 13, 2011. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "nhl.com". nhl.com. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Powell, General Colin L, USA (Ret.) (July 8, 2008). "Keynote Address – A New Vision for America's Future: Young Leaders Shaping an International Agenda". CSIS Launch of Next America. Center for Strategic and International Studies. Archived from the original on July 31, 2008. Retrieved October 20, 2008. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ "Who Mentored Colin Powell?". President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2008. 
^ "Al Gore, Colin Powell, Caroline Kennedy in Obama's Administration? – Washington Whispers". usnews.com. November 11, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell advised against Afghan surge", Politico (September 27, 2009). http://www.politico.com/blogs/laurarozen/0909/Powell_advised_against_Afghan_surge.html
^ Ingrid Lunden. "General Colin Powell Joins Salesforce Board Of Directors, As CRM Giant Zeros In On Public Sector". TechCrunch. AOL. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ a b c Colin Powell's biography from 'On The Issues'.
^ DeYoung, Karen (February 3, 2010). "Colin Powell shifts stance on 'don't ask, don't tell' policy". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2010. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (November 18, 2004). "Colin and the crazies". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Sen. McCain Releases Letter from Gen. Colin Powell", Washington Post (September 14, 2006). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/graphic/2006/09/14/GR2006091400728.html
^ "Colin Powell: Republican Party Needs Me More Than The Democratic Party Needs Me". TheLonelyConservative.com. February 7, 2014. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ See Official website: Aspen Ideas Festival
^ "Conversation with Colin Powell" (PDF). Aspen Ideas Festival. July 2007. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell: Support for Obama doesn't mean Iraq war wrong", CNN (October 19, 2008). http://edition.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/10/19/powell.transcript/
^ James M. Klatell, "Powell: We Are Losing In Iraq", CBS (December 17, 2006). http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/12/17/ftn/main2274583.shtml
^ "Powell says Iraq surge should have come earlier", Seattle Times (July 5, 2009)
^ Henry, Ed (August 9, 2007). "Powell donates to McCain". CNN. Retrieved August 9, 2007. 
^ Holland, Steve (March 5, 2008). "McCain now has to pick a vice presidential nominee". Boston Globe. Reuters. Retrieved April 14, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell endorses Obama for president; Republican ex-Secretary of State calls Democrat 'transformational figure'". Meet the Press. MSNBC and NBC News. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ a b "Meet the Press' transcript for October 19, 2008". MSNBC. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Ohlemacher, Stephen (October 20, 2008). "Colin Powell endorses Barack Obama for president". USA Today. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell on Rush Limbaugh". CNN. July 16, 2010. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell airs doubts on Obama agenda". The Washington Times. July 3, 2009. Retrieved September 17, 2010. 
^ Carrie Budoff Brown, "Colin Powell critical of President Obama", Politico (September 19, 2010). http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0910/42381.html
^ "Video". CNN. 
^ [1] retrieved October 25, 2012.
^ "ABC News". Retrieved 2013-01-22. 
^ https://www.yahoo.com/news/colin-powell-slams-donald-trumps-immigration-plan-163454530.html. Colin Powell slams Donald Trump's immigration plan. October 1, 2015. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-gop-race_us_56dda980e4b0000de405301a Colin Powell: The GOP Race Has ‘Gone Into The Mud’. The Huffington Post. March 7, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.people.com/article/colin-powell-hillary-clinton-pinning-email-scandal-on-him Colin Powell Says Hillary Clinton's 'People Have Been Trying to Pin' Email Scandal on Him. People Magazine. August 21, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/09/13/colin-powell-hacked-emails/90341788/
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-hillary-clinton_us_57d96524e4b09d7a6880bf1c Colin Powell Attacked Hillary Clinton’s ‘Hubris’ In Leaked Emails. The Huffington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14th, 2016.
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/09/14/here-are-the-juiciest-colin-powell-comments-about-trump-and-clinton-from-his-leaked-emails/ Here are the juiciest Colin Powell comments about Trump and Clinton from his hacked emails. The Washington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ Colin Powell joins 67 Republican politicians, donors and officials who are supporting Hillary Clinton October 25, 2016
^ Four Washington electors break ranks and don’t vote for Clinton
^ Powell, Colin (October 17, 2005). "Interview transcript". Larry King Live (Interview). Interview with Larry King. CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Powell, Colin (August 2, 2004). "A Conversation with Colin Powell". The Atlantic (Interview). Interview with P. J. O'Rourke. Washington, D.C. Archived from the original on February 4, 2013. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Colin Powell insists ‘there was no affair then and there is not one now’ with diplomat. NY Daily News. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ National Winners | public service awards. Jefferson Awards.org. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ "Spingarn Medal Winners: 1915 to Today". naacp.org. Archived from the original on May 5, 2014. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Colin L. Powell". The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans. n.d. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "The Ronald Reagan Freedom Award". Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation & Library. Archived from the original on October 16, 2006. 
^ Powell, Colin (July 4, 2002). "2002 Liberty Medal Acceptance Speech". Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: National Constitution Center. 
^ "GEN Colin Powell". 2016-03-08. Retrieved 2017-07-01. 
^ Asante, Molefi Kete (2002). 100 Greatest African Americans: A Biographical Encyclopedia. Amherst, New York. Prometheus Books. ISBN 1-57392-963-8.
^ According to the Fort Bliss Bugle, as of 10/24/2013, nine schools have been named for Colin Powell.
^ ":.: The Official Wings Of Hope Homepage :.:". Wings-of-hope.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ efworld
^ "Powell: Friendship with Israel means friendship with Arabs" (PDF). afhu.org. 
^ McDonald, Terrence T. (February 8, 2013). "Gov. Christie visits Union City school opening, hears Democratic mayor praise him". NJ.com.
^ Wenik, Ian (June 9, 2013). "Saluting the general". The Union City Reporter. pp. 1 and 11.
^ "High Point University National Board of Advisors". 


Further reading

LaFeber, Walter, "The Rise and Fall of Colin Powell and the Powell Doctrine", Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Spring 2009), 71–93.
Powell, Colin A. and Joseph Persico, My American Journey, Ballantine Books, 1995. ISBN 0-345-40728-8.
Excerpts from My American Journey, TIME, September 18, 1995.
DeYoung, Karen, Soldier: The Life of Colin Powell, Alfred A. Knopf, 2006. ISBN 1-4000-4170-8.
"Alex Haley's Other Roots: African-Americans with Irish Ancestors". February 25, 2006. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
Powell, Colin; Koltz, Tony (2012). It Worked for Me: Lessons in Leadership and Life. Harper. ISBN 978-0062135124. 

External links

Find more aboutColin Powellat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Appearances on C-SPAN
Colin Powell on Charlie Rose
Colin Powell on IMDb
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The New York Times. 
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The Guardian.  
Works by or about Colin Powell in libraries (WorldCat catalog)
Colin Powell: America's Best Leaders from U.S. News & World Report
Issue positions and quotes at On the Issues
Colin Powell Quotes
African Americans in the U.S. Army
The American Presidency Project: Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia, September 30, 1993
Address to the National Summit on Africa, Washington, D.C., February 2000
Remarks to the United Nations Security Council, February 5, 2003
Complete text, audio, video of Colin Powell's Remarks to the UN Security Council AmericanRhetoric.com
"Curveball" Revelations Indicate falsified info used to start Iraq war and esp used for Powell's UN presentation on Iraq WMDs, November 5, 2007
Colin Powell demands answers over Curveball's WMD lies, Ed Pikington, Helen Pidd and Martin Chulov, The Guardian, February 16, 2011
WARGS: Ancestry of Gen. Colin Powell



Political offices


Preceded by
Peter Rodman
Deputy National Security Advisor
1987
Succeeded by
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci
National Security Advisor
1987–1989
Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright
United States Secretary of State
2001–2005
Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


Military offices


Preceded by
William Crowe
Chair of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
1989–1993
Succeeded by
David Jeremiah
Acting


Awards and achievements


Preceded by
Mikhail Gorbachev
Recipient of the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award
1993
Succeeded by
Yitzhak Rabin


Party political offices


Preceded by
Susan Molinari
Keynote Speaker of the Republican National Convention
2000
Served alongside: John McCain
Succeeded by
Zell Miller








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Cabinet of President George W. Bush (2001–09)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Colin Powell (2001–05)
Condoleezza Rice (2005–09)








Secretary of the Treasury



Paul H. O'Neill (2001–02)
John W. Snow (2003–06)
Henry Paulson (2006–09)





Secretary of Defense



Donald Rumsfeld (2001–06)
Robert Gates (2006–09)





Attorney General



John Ashcroft (2001–05)
Alberto Gonzales (2005–07)
Michael Mukasey (2007–09)





Secretary of the Interior



Gale Norton (2001–06)
Dirk Kempthorne (2006–09)





Secretary of Agriculture



Ann Veneman (2001–05)
Mike Johanns (2005–07)
Ed Schafer (2008–09)





Secretary of Commerce



Donald Evans (2001–05)
Carlos Gutierrez (2005–09)





Secretary of Labor



Elaine Chao (2001–09)





Secretary of Health and
Human Services



Tommy Thompson (2001–05)
Mike Leavitt (2005–09)





Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development



Mel Martinez (2001–03)
Alphonso Jackson (2003–08)
Steve Preston (2008–09)





Secretary of Transportation



Norman Mineta (2001–06)
Mary E. Peters (2006–09)





Secretary of Energy



Spencer Abraham (2001–05)
Samuel Bodman (2005–09)





Secretary of Education



Rod Paige (2001–05)
Margaret Spellings (2005–09)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Anthony Principi (2001–05)
Jim Nicholson (2005–07)
James Peake (2007–09)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Tom Ridge (2003–05)
Michael Chertoff (2005–09)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Dick Cheney (2001–09)





White House Chief of Staff



Andrew Card (2001–06)
Joshua Bolten (2006–09)





Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency



Christine Todd Whitman (2001–03)
Mike Leavitt (2003–05)
Stephen L. Johnson (2005–09)





Director of the Office of
Management and Budget



Mitch Daniels (2001–03)
Joshua Bolten (2003–06)
Rob Portman (2006–07)
Jim Nussle (2007–09)





Director of National Drug
Control Policy



John P. Walters (2001–09)





Trade Representative



Robert Zoellick (2001–05)
Rob Portman (2005–06)
Susan Schwab (2006–09)













Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff









Bradley
Radford
Twining
Lemnitzer
Taylor
Wheeler
Moorer
Brown
Jones
Vessey
Crowe
Powell
Jeremiah (acting)
Shalikashvili
Shelton
Myers
Pace
Mullen
Dempsey
Dunford















v
t
e


Assistants to the President for National Security Affairs






Cutler
Anderson
Jackson
Cutler
Gray
Bundy
Rostow
Kissinger
Scowcroft
Brzezinski
Allen
Clark
McFarlane
Poindexter
Carlucci
Powell
Scowcroft
Lake
Berger
C. Rice
Hadley
Jones
Donilon
S. Rice
Flynn
Kellogg (acting)
McMaster















v
t
e


Recipients of the Soldier's Medal






Marty Allen
Glenn Andreotta
Clift Andrus
Aaron Bank
James Leroy Bondsteel
Leonard Boswell
Allison Brooks
William Francis Buckley
Max Cleland
Lawrence Colburn
John Thomas Corley
Wayne A. Downing
Theodore Leslie Futch
John Galvin
Elmer Gedeon
Carl Genian
Hershel W. Gober
John F. Goodman
David E. Grange Jr.
Ed Grady
Edith Ellen Greenwood
Francis Grevemberg
Bo Gritz
William W. Hartzog
Mike Hayden
Anthony Herbert
Patrick J. Hessian
Don Holleder
Bob Hoover
Eli D. Hoyle
Otto Kerner Jr.
Darwin K. Kyle
Richard L. Lawson
Reis Leming
Charles Andrew MacGillivary
William A. Matheny
Charles J. McDonnell
Jack N. Merritt
Leo J. Meyer
Henry Mucci
José Antonio Muñiz
Thomas Alexander Parrott
Frank D. Peregory
Colin Powell
Edwin W. Rawlings
Richard Scholtes
Preston Schoyer
Stephen Silvasy Jr.
John K. Singlaub
Alek Skarlatos
Christopher Speer
Donn A. Starry
Joseph Warren Stilwell Jr.
Thomas Tackaberry
Hugh Thompson Jr.
Clarence L. Tinker
Alfred Valenzuela
Leon L. Van Autreve
David Wade
Ron Welch
Samuel Tankersley Williams
Walter K. Wilson Jr.






Names are in alphabetical order







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 79113153
LCCN: n87926095
ISNI: 0000 0001 0858 8433
GND: 119077817
SUDOC: 073950408
BNF: cb12496187m (data)
NDL: 00515602
NKC: jo2003163174
IATH: w68g9rsz










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Colin_Powell&oldid=790924136"					
Categories: 1937 birthsLiving people21st-century American politicians21st-century American writersAfrican-American diplomatsAfrican-American members of the Cabinet of the United StatesAfrican-American military personnelAfrican-American politiciansAfrican-American writersAmerican EpiscopaliansAmerican male writersAmerican memoiristsAmerican military personnel of the Gulf WarAmerican military personnel of the Vietnam WarAmerican people of Jamaican descentAmerican people of Scottish descentAmerican political writersAmerican politicians of Jamaican descentChairmen of the Joint Chiefs of StaffCity College of New York alumniCongressional Gold Medal recipientsFellows of the United States National Academy of Public AdministrationGeorge W. Bush administration cabinet membersGeorge Washington University School of Business alumniHonorary Knights Commander of the Order of the BathIraq and weapons of mass destructionKleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers peopleLégion d'honneur recipientsMilitary leaders of the Gulf WarMilitary personnel from New York CityMy Lai MassacreNational War College alumniNew York RepublicansPeople from HarlemPeople from the BronxPeople from McLean, VirginiaPershing RiflemenPolitical realistsPresidential Citizens Medal recipientsPresidential Medal of Freedom recipientsReagan administration personnelRecipients of the Air MedalRecipients of the Defense Distinguished Service MedalRecipients of the Defense Superior Service MedalRecipients of the Distinguished Service Medal (US Army)Recipients of the Legion of MeritRecipients of the Order of Saint MauriceRecipients of the Order of Skanderbeg (1990–)Recipients of the Order of Stara PlaninaRecipients of the Soldier's MedalSpingarn Medal winnersUnited States Army Command and General Staff College alumniUnited States Army Command and General Staff College facultyUnited States Army generalsUnited States National Security AdvisorsUnited States Secretaries of StateWhite House FellowsWriters from New York CityHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listWikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleUse mdy dates from March 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from October 2011Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიLatviešuLietuviųमराठीმარგალურიBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng ViệtYorùbá中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 00:21.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
 




Colin Powell: American Leadership — We Can’t Do It for Free - The New York Times

































































































































NYTimes.com no longer supports Internet Explorer 9 or earlier. Please upgrade your browser.
LEARN MORE »









Sections

Home

Search
Skip to content
Skip to navigation
View mobile version




The New York Times





The Opinion Pages|Colin Powell: American Leadership — We Can’t Do It for Free







Search

Subscribe Now
Log In


0
Settings




Close search



https://nyti.ms/2qXlId7








Advertisement








Supported by



The Opinion Pages
| Op-Ed Contributor 
Colin Powell: American Leadership — We Can’t Do It for Free

By COLIN POWELLMAY 24, 2017



Continue reading the main story
Share This Page

Continue reading the main story












Photo







Credit
            Doug Chayka        



At our best, being a great nation has always meant a commitment to building a better, safer world — not just for ourselves, but for our children and grandchildren. This has meant leading the world in advancing the cause of peace, responding when disease and disaster strike, lifting millions out of poverty and inspiring those yearning for freedom.This calling is under threat.The administration’s proposal, announced Tuesday, to slash approximately 30 percent from the State Department and foreign assistance budget signals an American retreat, leaving a vacuum that would make us far less safe and prosperous. While it may sound penny-wise, it is pound-foolish.This proposal would bring resources for our civilian forces to a third of what we spent at the height of Ronald Reagan’s “peace through strength” years, as a percentage of the gross domestic product. It would be internationally irresponsible, distressing our friends, encouraging our enemies and undermining our own economic and national security interests.The idea that putting Americans “first” requires a withdrawal from the world is simply wrongheaded, because a retreat would achieve exactly the opposite for our citizens. I learned that lesson the hard way when I became secretary of state after a decade of budget cuts that hollowed out our civilian foreign policy tools.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

Many had assumed the Cold War’s end would allow us to retreat from the world, but cuts that may have looked logical at the time came back to haunt us as tensions rose in the Middle East, Africa, the Korean Peninsula and elsewhere. Confronting such challenges requires not just a military that is second to none, but also well-resourced, effective and empowered diplomats and aid workers. Continue reading the main story







Advertisement

Continue reading the main story





Indeed, we’re strongest when the face of America isn’t only a soldier carrying a gun but also a diplomat negotiating peace, a Peace Corps volunteer bringing clean water to a village or a relief worker stepping off a cargo plane as floodwaters rise. While I am all for reviewing, reforming and strengthening the State Department and the United States Agency for International Development, proposals to zero out economic and development assistance in more than 35 countries would effectively lower our flag at our outposts around the world and make us far less safe.
Newsletter Sign Up
Continue reading the main story
Sign Up for the Opinion Today Newsletter Every weekday, get thought-provoking commentary from Op-Ed columnists, the Times editorial board and contributing writers from around the world. 


Please verify you're not a robot by clicking the box.
Invalid email address. Please re-enter.
You must select a newsletter to subscribe to.



Sign Up







You agree to receive occasional updates and special offers for The New York Times's products and services.





Thank you for subscribing.
An error has occurred. Please try again later.
You are already subscribed to this email.
View all New York Times newsletters.


See Sample
Manage Email Preferences
Not you?
Privacy Policy
Opt out or contact us anytime




Today, the world is witnessing some of the most significant humanitarian crises in living memory. With more than 65 million people displaced, there have never been more people fleeing war and instability since World War II. The famines engulfing families in South Sudan, Yemen, Nigeria and Somalia put more than 20 million people at risk of starvation — further destabilizing regions already under threat from the Islamic State, Al Qaeda, Boko Haram and Al-Shabaab.Do we really want to slash the State Department and the U.S.A.I.D. at such a perilous moment? The American answer has always been no. Yet this budget proposal has forced us to ask what America’s role in the world is and what kind of nation we seek to be. The president’s budget director, Mick Mulvaney, has described these cuts as “not a reflection of the president’s policies regarding an attitude toward State.” But how is a 32 percent cut to our civilian programs overseas anything but a clear expression of policy?True, many in Congress have effectively declared the administration’s budget proposal “dead on arrival,” but they also acknowledge that it will set the tone for the coming budget debate. That’s the wrong conversation. Our diplomacy and development budget is not just about reducing spending and finding efficiencies. We need a frank conversation about what we stand for as that “shining city on a hill.” And that conversation begins by acknowledging that we can’t do it on the cheap.Diplomacy and aid aren’t the only self-defeating cuts in the administration’s proposal. A call to all but eliminate two key export-promotion agencies — the Overseas Private Investment Corporation and the Trade and Development Agency — would harm thousands of American workers and actually add to the deficit. And any cuts to our economic development investments in Africa and elsewhere would undermine our ability to build new customer bases in the world’s fastest-growing markets.With 95 percent of the world’s consumers outside our borders, it’s not “America first” to surrender the field to an ambitious China rapidly expanding its influence, building highways and railroads across Africa and Asia. China is far from slashing its development budget. Instead, it’s growing — by more than 780 percent in Africa alone since 2003.Since the release of its initial budget request in March, the administration has started to demonstrate a more strategic foreign policy approach. This is welcome, but it will take far more than a strike against Syria, a harder line on Russia, increased pressure on North Korea and deeper engagement with China to steer American foreign policy. It also takes the resources to underwrite it.

America is great when we’re the country that the world admires, a beacon of hope and a principled people who are generous, fair and caring. That’s the American way. If we’re still that nation, then we must continue to devote this small but strategic 1 percent of our federal budget to this mission.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

Throughout my career, I learned plenty about war on the battlefield, but I learned even more about the importance of finding peace. And that is what the State Department and U.S.A.I.D. do: prevent the wars that we can avoid, so that we fight only the ones we must. For our service members and citizens, it’s an investment we must make.
Continue reading the main story






We’re interested in your feedback on this page. Tell us what you think.





























What's Next


Loading...









Go to Home Page »

Site Index

The New York Times
























Colin Powell - Military Leader, Diplomat - Biography.comSubscribe to NewsletterAboutColin Powell Biography.comMilitary Leader, Diplomat(1937–)2.9KSHARESQuick FactsNameColin PowellOccupationMilitary Leader, DiplomatBirth DateApril 5, 1937 (age 80)EducationGeorge Washington University, National War College, City College of New York, Morris High SchoolPlace of BirthNew York, New YorkZodiac SignAriesCite This PageColin Powell was the first African American appointed as the U.S.  Secretary of State, and the first, and so far the only, to serve on the  Joint Chiefs of Staff.IN THESE GROUPSFamous Military LeadersFamous People Named ColinFamous DiplomatsFamous People Born in New YorkShow All GroupsFamous AriansFamous People Named PowellFamous People Who Served in the ArmyFamous Military VeteransFamous George Washington University AlumniNational War CollegeFamous City College of New York AlumniFamous People Born in New YorkFamous GovernmentFamous People Born on April 5Famous People Born in United StatesFamous People in Military HistoryFamous People Born in 1937Famous Morris High School Alumniquotes“You can't make someone else's choices. You shouldn't let someone else make yours.”Colin PowellSynopsisColin Luther Powell is a United States statesman and a retired four-star  general in the United States Army. He was the 65th United States  Secretary of State (2001-2005), serving under President George W. Bush.  He was the first African American appointed to that position. He was the  first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint  Chiefs of Staff.

Early Military CareerMilitary official/diplomat. Born Colin Luther Powell on April 5,  1937, in Harlem, New York. The son of Jamaican immigrants Luther and  Maud Powell, Colin was raised in the South Bronx. Powell was educated in  the New York City public schools, and graduated from Morris High School  in 1954 without any definite plans for where he wanted to go in life.  It was at City College of New York, where Powell studied geology, that  he found his calling—in the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC). He  soon became commander of his unit. This experience set him on a military  career and gave him structure and direction in his life. After  graduation in 1958, Powell was commissioned as a second lieutenant in  the U.S. Army. While stationed at Fort Devens, Massachusetts, Colin  Powell met Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama, and they married  in 1962. The couple now has three children: son Michael, and daughters  Linda and Annemarie. That same year, he was one of 16,000 advisers sent  to South Vietnam by President John Kennedy. In 1963, Powell was wounded  by a punji-stick booby trap while patrolling the Vietnamese-Laotian  border. During this first tour of duty, he was awarded a Purple Heart  and, a year later, a Bronze Star. While on his second Vietnam tour  of duty from 1968 to 1969, the 31-year-old Army major was given the  assignment of investigating the My Lai massacre. In this incident, more  than 300 civilians were killed by U.S. Army forces. Colin Powell's  report seemed to refute the allegations of wrongdoing and stated,  "Relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are  excellent." Also during this tour in Vietnam, Powell was injured in a  helicopter crash. Despite his injury, he managed to rescue his comrades  from the burning helicopter, for which he was awarded the Soldier's  Medal. In all, Powell has received 11 military decorations, including  the Legion of Merit.Reagan and Bush AdministrationsPowell earned an MBA at George Washington University, in Washington,  D.C., and won a White House fellowship in 1972. He was assigned to the  Office of Management and Budget during the Nixon administration and made  a lasting impression on Caspar Weinberger and Frank Carlucci. Both men  would consult Powell for advice when they served as secretary of defense  and national security adviser, respectively, in the Reagan  administration. Colonel Colin Powell served a tour of duty in  Korea in 1973 as a battalion commander and after that, he obtained a  staff job at the Pentagon. He attended the National War College in Washington D.C. from 1975-1976. He was  promoted to brigadier general in 1976 and commanded the 2nd Brigade of the 101st  Airborne Division. In the Carter administration, Powell was an assistant to  the deputy secretary of defense and the secretary of energy. Promoted to  major general, he again assisted Frank Carlucci at the Department of  Defense during the transition from the Carter to the Reagan  administration. He then served as senior military aide to Secretary of  Defense Caspar Weinberger, helping to coordinate the invasion of Granada  and the bombing of Libya. In 1987, Powell became national security adviser, a post  he held for the duration of the Reagan administration. While there, he  coordinated technical and policy advisers during Reagan's summit  meetings with Soviet President Gorbachev and his conferences to topple  the pro-Communist Sandinista government in Nicaragua. It was discovered  that the administration had arranged for covert and illegal shipments of  U.S. weapons to Iran in exchange for the release of hostages. Proceeds  from the sale of the weapons would go to support the counter-insurgency  movement in Nicaragua, which was aimed at toppling the Sandinistas. Such  support had been prohibited by Congress since 1982. Powell was asked to  testify before Congress about the incident, but he was not implicated  in any wrongdoing. In 1989, President  George H. W. Bush appointed General Colin Powell as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. The post is the highest military position in the  Department of Defense, and Powell was the first African-American officer  to receive that distinction. General Powell became a national figure  during Desert Shield and Desert Storm operations in Iraq. As chief  military strategist, he developed what became known as the "Powell  Doctrine," an approach to military conflicts that advocates using  overwhelming force to maximize success and minimize casualties. He  continued as chairman of the Joint Chiefs in the first few months of the  Clinton administration. He publicly disagreed with the president on the  issue of admitting gays into the military, although he eventually  agreed to the "don't ask, don't tell" compromise.Iraq ControversyColin Powell retired from the Army in 1993. In 1994, he joined  Senator Sam Nunn and former President Jimmy Carter on a last-minute  peacekeeping expedition to Haiti, which resulted in the end of military  rule and a peaceful return to elected government in that country. In  1995, he published a best-selling autobiography, My American Journey,  which chronicles his life and its influences, the ins and outs of  military bureaucracy, and what he learned in his life about personal  rules and character. From 1997 to 2000, he was chairman of America's  Promise, a nonprofit organization dedicated to fostering character and  competence in young people. Powell and his wife, Alma, now co-chair the  organization, which has a presence in more than 500 communities in all  50 states. In 2000, President George W. Bush appointed Colin  Powell secretary of state, and Powell was unanimously confirmed by the  U.S. Senate. At that time, this was the highest rank in civilian  government ever held by an African-American. During his tenure, Powell  came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 invasion  of Iraq. Initially, Powell had serious misgivings about President Bush's  plan to invade Iraq and overthrow Saddam Hussein. Powell believed the  policy of containment was sufficient to control the Iraqi regime. He  warned Bush that a military invasion would consume the president's first  term and that if an attack were to occur, it should use overwhelming  force and have broad international support. This support would be key to  the rebuilding of Iraq. Bush decided to go to war and, in a crucial moment,  Powell agreed to support the president. To advance the case for war with  the international community, Powell appeared before the U.N. Security  Council in February 2003 to present evidence that Iraq had concealed an  ongoing weapons development program. Powell's reputation for integrity  helped convince many in Congress and the country that Iraq posed an  imminent threat. For the remainder of Bush's first term, Colin Powell tried to establish  an international coalition to assist in the rebuilding of Iraq. In  September 2004, he testified before Congress that the intelligence  sources he used in his February presentation to the United Nations were  "wrong" and it was unlikely that Saddam had any stockpiles of weapons of  mass destruction. Powell advised the committee of the necessity to  reform the intelligence community in order to improve its gathering and  analysis. In 2004, after acknowledging it was unlikely that Iraq  possessed stockpiles of weapons of mass destruction, Powell announced  his resignation as secretary of state. National Security Adviser  Condoleezza Rice was his successor.RetirementSince his retirement, Powell has remained vocal on political  topics, openly criticizing the Bush administration on a number of  issues. In September 2006, Powell joined moderate Senate Republicans in  supporting more rights and better treatment for detainees at the  Guantanamo detention facility. In October 2008, Colin Powell made  headlines again when he announced his endorsement of Barack Obama for  president. Powell has also spent much of his retirement in the  business community. In 2006, he was a speaker at a special series called  Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudolph Giuliani.  Powell also joined Kleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers, a Silicon  Valley venture capital firm, as a "strategic limited partner." Most  recently he joined the board of directors at Steve Case's new company,  Revolution Health, a health-related portal site and social network that  provides online tools to help people better manage their health. Colin  Powell has spent much of his life inspiring many with his leadership  skills and life experiences. Along with his wife, Powell began America's  Promise Alliance, as part of their dedication to the wellbeing of  children and youth of all socioeconomic levels and their commitment to  seeing that young people receive the resources necessary to succeed. Colin  Powell began his American journey from ordinary circumstances. His  close-knit family provided support and a caring environment during his  childhood. He found his calling in the military, and his entire adult  life has been in the service of his country. As a soldier, he was  committed to protecting the nation and advancing democratic values.  While he gravitated toward support roles early in his career, his  organizational talent and pragmatic outlook were recognized by those who  placed him in key government advisory roles.Related Videos


Ronald Reagan - Mini Biography(TV-14; 2:12)

Condoleezza Rice - Mini Biography(TV-14; 3:25)

Bill Clinton - Mini Biography(TV-14; 4:17)

George W. Bush - Mini Biography(TV-14; 4:33)

George H.W. Bush - Mini Biography(TV-14; 4:35)

Barack Obama - Mini Biography(TV-14; 5:05)


Fact CheckWe strive for accuracy and fairness. If you see something that doesn't look right, contact us!Citation InformationArticle TitleColin Powell Biography.comAuthorBiography.com EditorsWebsite NameThe Biography.com websiteURLhttps://www.biography.com/people/colin-powell-9445708Access Date{{$root.currentTime | date:'MMMM d, yyyy'}}PublisherA&E Television NetworksLast UpdatedApril 27, 2017Original Published Daten/a2.9KSHARESBIO NEWSLETTERSign up to receive updates from BIO and A+E Networks.


Colin Powell - Wikipedia




















 







Colin Powell

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the American politician. For the British soccer player, see Colin Powell (footballer).


Colin Powell








65th United States Secretary of State


In office
January 20, 2001 – January 26, 2005


President
George W. Bush


Deputy
Richard Armitage


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright


Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff


In office
October 1, 1989 – September 30, 1993


President
George H. W. Bush
Bill Clinton


Deputy
Robert Herres
David Jeremiah


Preceded by
William Crowe


Succeeded by
David Jeremiah (Acting)


16th National Security Advisor


In office
November 23, 1987 – January 20, 1989


President
Ronald Reagan


Deputy
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci


Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft





Personal details


Born
Colin Luther Powell
(1937-04-05) April 5, 1937 (age 80)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Alma Johnson (m. 1962)


Education
City University of New York, City College (BS)
George Washington University (MBA)


Signature



Military service


Allegiance
 United States


Service/branch
 United States Army


Years of service
1958–1993


Rank
 General


Unit
 3rd Armored Division
  23rd Infantry Division


Commands
 V Corps
 Joint Chiefs of Staff
  Army Forces Command


Battles/wars
Vietnam War
Invasion of Panama
Persian Gulf War


Colin Luther Powell (/ˈkoʊlᵻn/; born April 5, 1937)[1] is an American statesman and a retired four-star general in the United States Army.[2] Powell was born in Harlem as the son of Jamaican immigrants. During his military career, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989), as Commander of the U.S. Army Forces Command (1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Persian Gulf War. Powell was the first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State, serving under U.S. President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2005, the first African American to serve in that position.[3][4][5][6]
Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and was raised in the South Bronx. His parents, Luther and Maud Powell, immigrated to the United States from Jamaica. Powell was educated in the New York City public schools, graduating from the City College of New York (CCNY), where he earned a bachelor's degree in geology. He also participated in ROTC at CCNY and received a commission as an Army second lieutenant upon graduation in June 1958. His further academic achievements include a Master of Business Administration degree from George Washington University.[7]
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, during which time he held myriad command and staff positions and rose to the rank of 4-star General. His last assignment, from October 1, 1989 to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. He also formulated the Powell Doctrine.[7]
Following his military retirement, Powell wrote his best-selling autobiography, My American Journey. In addition, he pursued a career as a public speaker, addressing audiences across the country and abroad. Prior to his appointment as Secretary of State, Powell was the chairman of America's Promise - The Alliance for Youth, a national nonprofit organization dedicated to mobilizing people from every sector of American life to build the character and competence of young people. He was nominated by President Bush on December 16, 2000 as Secretary of State. After being unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate, he was sworn in as the 65th Secretary of State on January 20, 2001.[7]
Powell is the recipient of numerous U.S. and foreign military awards and decorations. Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medal of Freedom, the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, and the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country. Powell is married to the former Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama. The Powell family includes son Michael (ex-chairman of the Federal Communications Commission); daughters Linda and Anne; daughter-in-law Jane; and grandsons Jeffrey and Bryan.[7]
In 2016, while not a candidate for that year's election, Powell received three electoral votes for the office of President of the United States.



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Military career

2.1 Training
2.2 Vietnam War
2.3 After the Vietnam War
2.4 A "political general"
2.5 Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
2.6 Dates of rank
2.7 Awards and decorations

2.7.1 Badges
2.7.2 Medals and ribbons
2.7.3 Foreign decorations


2.8 13 Rules of Leadership


3 Potential presidential candidate
4 Secretary of State
5 Life after diplomatic service
6 Political views

6.1 Views on the Iraq War
6.2 Role in presidential election of 2008
6.3 Views on the Obama administration
6.4 2016 presidential election


7 Personal life
8 Civilian awards and honors
9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Early life and education
Powell was born on April 5, 1937,[8] in Harlem, a neighborhood in the New York City borough of Manhattan, to Jamaican immigrant parents Maud Arial (née McKoy) and Luther Theophilus Powell. His parents were both of mixed African and Scots ancestry.[9][10] Luther worked as a shipping clerk and Maud as a seamstress.[11] Powell was raised in the South Bronx and attended Morris High School, from which he graduated in 1954. (This school has since closed.)
While at school, Powell worked at a local baby furniture store, where he picked up Yiddish from the eastern European Jewish shopkeepers and some of the customers.[12] He also served as a Shabbos goy, helping Orthodox families with needed tasks on the Sabbath.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Geology from the City College of New York in 1958[14][15] and has said he was a 'C average' student.[16] He later earned an MBA degree from the George Washington University in 1971,[14] after his second tour in Vietnam.
Despite his parents' pronunciation of his name as /ˈkɒlᵻn/, Powell has pronounced his name /ˈkoʊlᵻn/ since childhood, after the heroic World War II flyer Colin P. Kelly Jr.[17] Public officials and radio and television reporters have used Powell's preferred pronunciation.
Military career
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, holding a variety of command and staff positions and rising to the rank of General.[18]
Training
Powell described joining the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) during college as one of the happiest experiences of his life; discovering something he loved and could do well, he felt he had "found himself." According to Powell:

It was only once I was in college, about six months into college when I found something that I liked, and that was ROTC, Reserve Officer Training Corps in the military. And I not only liked it, but I was pretty good at it. That's what you really have to look for in life, something that you like, and something that you think you're pretty good at. And if you can put those two things together, then you're on the right track, and just drive on.[19]

Cadet Powell joined the Pershing Rifles, the ROTC fraternal organization and drill team begun by General John Pershing. Even after he had become a general, Powell kept on his desk a pen set he had won for a drill team competition.
Upon graduation, he received a commission as an Army second lieutenant.[20] After attending basic training at Fort Benning, Powell was assigned to the 48th Infantry, in West Germany, as a platoon leader.[21]
Vietnam War
In his autobiography, Powell said he is haunted by the nightmare of the Vietnam War and felt that the leadership was very ineffective.
Captain Powell served a tour in Vietnam as a South Vietnamese Army (ARVN) advisor from 1962 to 1963. While on patrol in a Viet Cong-held area, he was wounded by stepping on a punji stake.[22] The large infection made it difficult for him to walk, and caused his foot to swell for a short time, shortening his first tour.
He returned to Vietnam as a major in 1968, serving in the 23rd Infantry Division, then as assistant chief of staff of operations for the Americal Division. During the second tour in Vietnam he was decorated for bravery after he survived a helicopter crash, single-handedly rescuing three others, including division commander Major General Charles Martin Gettys, from the burning wreckage.[21][23]
Powell was charged with investigating a detailed letter by 11th Light Infantry Brigade soldier Tom Glen, which backed up rumored allegations of the My Lai Massacre. He wrote: "In direct refutation of this portrayal is the fact that relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are excellent." Later, Powell's assessment would be described as whitewashing the news of the massacre, and questions would continue to remain undisclosed to the public. In May 2004 Powell said to television and radio host Larry King, "I was in a unit that was responsible for My Lai. I got there after My Lai happened. So, in war, these sorts of horrible things happen every now and again, but they are still to be deplored."[24]




Powell in April 1989, as the Commanding General of FORSCOM.


After the Vietnam War
Powell served a White House Fellowship under President Richard Nixon from 1972 to 1973. During 1975–1976 he attended the National War College, Washington, D.C.[25]
In his autobiography, My American Journey, Powell named several officers he served under who inspired and mentored him. As a lieutenant colonel serving in South Korea, Powell was very close to General Henry "Gunfighter" Emerson. Powell said he regarded Emerson as one of the most caring officers he ever met. Emerson insisted his troops train at night to fight a possible North Korean attack, and made them repeatedly watch the television film Brian's Song to promote racial harmony. Powell always professed that what set Emerson apart was his great love of his soldiers and concern for their welfare. After a race riot occurred, in which African American soldiers almost killed a Caucasian officer, Powell was charged by Emerson to crack down on black militants; Powell's efforts led to the discharge of one soldier, and other efforts to reduce racial tensions.[21]
A "political general"
In the early 1980s, Powell served at Fort Carson, Colorado. After he left Fort Carson, Powell became senior military assistant to Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, whom he assisted during the 1983 invasion of Grenada and the 1986 airstrike on Libya.




President Ronald Reagan and National Security Advisor Powell in 1988


In 1986, Powell took over the command of V Corps in Frankfurt, Germany, from Robert Lewis "Sam" Wetzel.
Following the Iran Contra scandal, Powell became, at the age of 49, Ronald Reagan's National Security Advisor, serving from 1987 to 1989 while retaining his Army commission as a lieutenant general.
In April 1989, after his tenure with the National Security Council, Powell was promoted to four-star general under President George H. W. Bush and briefly served as the Commander in Chief, Forces Command (FORSCOM), headquartered at Fort McPherson, Georgia, overseeing all Army, Army Reserve, and National Guard units in the Continental U.S., Alaska, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico. He became the third general since World War II to reach four-star rank without ever serving as a division commander, joining Dwight D. Eisenhower and Alexander Haig.
Later that year, President George H. W. Bush selected him as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.[26]
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff




Powell in November 1989, on his official Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff portrait.


Powell's last military assignment, from October 1, 1989, to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. At age 52, he became the youngest officer, and first Afro-Caribbean American, to serve in this position. Powell was also the first JCS Chair who received his commission through ROTC.[27]
During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including the invasion of Panama in 1989 to remove General Manuel Noriega from power and Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. During these events, Powell earned his nickname, "the reluctant warrior." He rarely advocated military intervention as the first solution to an international crisis, and instead usually prescribed diplomacy and containment.




General Colin Powell, Chairman, Joint Chiefs of Staff, waves from his motorcade during the Persian Gulf War Welcome Home Parade in New York City.


As a military strategist, Powell advocated an approach to military conflicts that maximizes the potential for success and minimizes casualties. A component of this approach is the use of overwhelming force, which he applied to Operation Desert Storm in 1991. His approach has been dubbed the "Powell Doctrine". Powell continued as chairman of the JCS into the Clinton presidency but as a dedicated "realist" he considered himself a bad fit for an administration largely made up of liberal internationalists.[28] He clashed with then-U.S. ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright over the Bosnian crisis, as he opposed any military interventions that didn't involve US interests.[29]
During his chairmanship of the JCS, there was discussion of awarding Powell a fifth star, granting him the rank of General of the Army. But even in the wake of public and Congressional pressure[30][31] to do so, Clinton-Gore presidential transition team staffers decided against it.[32][33][34]
Dates of rank

Promotions

Rank
Date


 General
April 4, 1989


 Lieutenant general
March 26, 1986


 Major general
August 1, 1983


 Brigadier general
June 1, 1979


 Colonel
February 1, 1976


 Lieutenant colonel
July 9, 1970


 Major
May 24, 1966


 Captain
June 2, 1962


 First lieutenant
December 30, 1959


 Second lieutenant
June 9, 1958


Awards and decorations
Badges







Combat Infantryman Badge









Expert Infantryman Badge









Ranger Tab









Parachutist Badge









Pathfinder Badge









Air Assault Badge









Presidential Service Badge









Secretary of Defense Identification Badge









Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge









Army Staff Identification Badge




Medals and ribbons











Defense Distinguished Service Medal with three oak leaf clusters









Distinguished Service Medal, Army with oak leaf cluster



Defense Superior Service Medal









Legion of Merit with oak leaf cluster



Soldier's Medal



Bronze Star



Purple Heart



Air Medal



Joint Service Commendation Medal










Army Commendation Medal with two oak leaf clusters



Presidential Medal of Freedom with Distinction (1993)[35]



Presidential Medal of Freedom (1991)



Presidential Citizens Medal









National Defense Service Medal with bronze service star









Vietnam Service Medal with silver service star



Army Service Ribbon



Army Overseas Service Ribbon with award numeral 4


Foreign decorations



Skanderbeg's Order (Albania)



Honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) (United Kingdom)



Légion d'honneur, Grand Cross (France)



Meritorious Service Cross (M.S.C.) (Canada)



Order of Stara Planina in the First Order (Bulgaria)[36][37]



Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation



Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal


13 Rules of Leadership
First printed in the August 13, 1989 issue of Parade magazine,[38] these are Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership.[39][40]

It ain't as bad as you think.
Get mad, then get over it.
Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.
It can be done.
Be careful what you choose. You may get it.
Don't let adverse facts stand in the way of a good decision.
You can't make someone else's choices.
Check small things.
Share credit.
Remain calm. Be kind.
Have a vision.
Don't take counsel of your fears or naysayers.
Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.

Potential presidential candidate
Powell's experience in military matters made him a very popular figure with both American political parties. Many Democrats admired his moderate stance on military matters, while many Republicans saw him as a great asset associated with the successes of past Republican administrations. Put forth as a potential Democratic Vice Presidential nominee in the 1992 U.S. presidential election[41] or even potentially replacing Vice President Dan Quayle as the Republican Vice Presidential nominee,[42] Powell eventually declared himself a Republican and began to campaign for Republican candidates in 1995.[43] He was touted as a possible opponent of Bill Clinton in the 1996 U.S. presidential election, possibly capitalizing on a split conservative vote in Iowa[44] and even leading New Hampshire polls for the GOP nomination,[45] but Powell declined, citing a lack of passion for politics.[46] Powell defeated Clinton 50–38 in a hypothetical match-up proposed to voters in the exit polls conducted on Election Day.[47] Despite not standing in the race, Powell won the Republican New Hampshire Vice-Presidential primary on write-in votes.[48]
In 1997 Powell founded America's Promise with the objective of helping children from all socioeconomic sectors. That same year saw the establishment of The Colin L. Powell Center for Leadership and Service. The mission of the Center is to "prepare new generations of publicly engaged leaders from populations previously underrepresented in public service and policy circles, to build a strong culture of civic engagement at City College, and to mobilize campus resources to meet pressing community needs and serve the public good." [49]
Powell was mentioned as a potential candidate in the 2000 U.S. presidential election, but decided against running.[50] Once Texas Governor George W. Bush secured the Republican nomination, Powell endorsed him for president and spoke at the 2000 Republican National Convention. Bush eventually won, and Powell was appointed Secretary of State.
In the electoral college vote count of 2016, Powell received three votes from faithless electors from Washington.
Secretary of State




Powell, National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice and Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld listen to President George W. Bush speak.


As Secretary of State in the Bush administration, Powell was perceived as moderate. Powell was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate. Over the course of his tenure he traveled less than any other U.S. Secretary of State in 30 years. [51]
On September 11, 2001, Powell was in Lima, Peru, meeting with President Alejandro Toledo and US Ambassador John Hamilton, and attending the special session of the OAS General Assembly that subsequently adopted the Inter-American Democratic Charter. After the September 11 attacks, Powell's job became of critical importance in managing America's relationships with foreign countries in order to secure a stable coalition in the War on Terrorism.
Powell came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 Invasion of Iraq. In a press statement on February 24, 2001, he had said that sanctions against Iraq had prevented the development of any weapons of mass destruction by Saddam Hussein. As was the case in the days leading up to the Persian Gulf War, Powell was initially opposed to a forcible overthrow of Saddam, preferring to continue a policy of containment. However, Powell eventually agreed to go along with the Bush administration's determination to remove Saddam. He had often clashed with others in the administration, who were reportedly planning an Iraq invasion even before the September 11 attacks, an insight supported by testimony by former terrorism czar Richard Clarke in front of the 9/11 Commission. The main concession Powell wanted before he would offer his full support for the Iraq War was the involvement of the international community in the invasion, as opposed to a unilateral approach. He was also successful in persuading Bush to take the case of Iraq to the United Nations, and in moderating other initiatives. Powell was placed at the forefront of this diplomatic campaign.




Computer-generated image of an alleged mobile production facility for biological weapons, presented by Powell at the UN Security Council. On May 27, 2003, US and UK experts examined the trailers and declared they had nothing to do with biological weapons.[52]






Powell holding a model vial of anthrax while giving a presentation to the United Nations Security Council in February 2003.


Powell's chief role was to garner international support for a multi-national coalition to mount the invasion. To this end, Powell addressed a plenary session of the United Nations Security Council on February 5, 2003, to argue in favor of military action. Citing numerous anonymous Iraqi defectors, Powell asserted that "there can be no doubt that Saddam Hussein has biological weapons and the capability to rapidly produce more, many more." Powell also stated that there was "no doubt in my mind" that Saddam was working to obtain key components to produce nuclear weapons.[53]
Most observers praised Powell's oratorical skills. However, Britain's Channel 4 News reported soon afterwards that a UK intelligence dossier that Powell had referred to as a "fine paper" during his presentation had been based on old material and plagiarized an essay by American graduate student Ibrahim al-Marashi.[54][55] A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
In an interview with Charlie Rose, Powell contended that prior to his UN presentation, he had merely four days to review the data concerning WMD in Iraq.[56]
A Senate report on intelligence failures would later detail the intense debate that went on behind the scenes on what to include in Powell's speech. State Department analysts had found dozens of factual problems in drafts of the speech. Some of the claims were taken out, but others were left in, such as claims based on the yellowcake forgery.[57] The administration came under fire for having acted on faulty intelligence, particularly what was single-sourced to the informant known as Curveball. Powell later recounted how Vice President Dick Cheney had joked with him before he gave the speech, telling him, "You've got high poll ratings; you can afford to lose a few points." Powell's longtime aide-de-camp and Chief of Staff from 1989–2003, Colonel Lawrence Wilkerson, later characterized Cheney's view of Powell's mission as to "go up there and sell it, and we'll have moved forward a peg or two. Fall on your damn sword and kill yourself, and I'll be happy, too."[58]
In September 2005, Powell was asked about the speech during an interview with Barbara Walters and responded that it was a "blot" on his record. He went on to say, "It will always be a part of my record. It was painful. It's painful now."[59]
Wilkerson said that he inadvertently participated in a hoax on the American people in preparing Powell's erroneous testimony before the United Nations Security Council.[60]
Because Powell was seen as more moderate than most figures in the administration, he was spared many of the attacks that have been leveled at more controversial advocates of the invasion, such as Donald Rumsfeld and Paul Wolfowitz. At times, infighting among the Powell-led State Department, the Rumsfeld-led Defense Department, and Cheney's office had the effect of polarizing the administration on crucial issues, such as what actions to take regarding Iran and North Korea.




Secretary Powell with NATO Secretary General Jaap de Hoop Scheffer


After Saddam Hussein had been deposed, Powell's new role was to once again establish a working international coalition, this time to assist in the rebuilding of post-war Iraq. On September 13, 2004, Powell testified before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee,[61] acknowledging that the sources who provided much of the information in his February 2003 UN presentation were "wrong" and that it was "unlikely" that any stockpiles of WMDs would be found. Claiming that he was unaware that some intelligence officials questioned the information prior to his presentation, Powell pushed for reform in the intelligence community, including the creation of a national intelligence director who would assure that "what one person knew, everyone else knew."
Additionally, Powell has been critical of other instances of U.S. foreign policy in the past, such as its support for the 1973 Chilean coup d'état. From two separate interviews in 2003, Powell stated in one about the 1973 event "I can't justify or explain the actions and decisions that were made at that time. It was a different time. There was a great deal of concern about communism in this part of the world. Communism was a threat to the democracies in this part of the world. It was a threat to the United States."[62] In another interview, however, he also simply stated "With respect to your earlier comment about Chile in the 1970s and what happened with Mr. Allende, it is not a part of American history that we're proud of."[63]
Powell announced his resignation as Secretary of State on November 15, 2004. According to The Washington Post, he had been asked to resign by the president's chief of staff, Andrew Card.[58] Powell announced that he would stay on until the end of Bush's first term or until his replacement's confirmation by Congress. The following day, Bush nominated National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice as Powell's successor. News of Powell's leaving the Administration spurred mixed reactions from politicians around the world — some upset at the loss of a statesman seen as a moderating factor within the Bush administration, but others hoping for Powell's successor to wield more influence within the cabinet.
In mid-November, Powell stated that he had seen new evidence suggesting that Iran was adapting missiles for a nuclear delivery system.[64] The accusation came at the same time as the settlement of an agreement between Iran, the IAEA, and the European Union.
On December 31, 2004, Powell rang in the New Year by pressing a button in Times Square with New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg to initiate the ball drop and 60 second countdown, ushering in the year 2005. He appeared on the networks that were broadcasting New Year's Eve specials and talked about this honor, as well as being a native of New York City.[65]
Life after diplomatic service
After retiring from the role of Secretary of State, Powell returned to private life. In April 2005, he was privately telephoned by Republican senators Lincoln Chafee and Chuck Hagel,[66] at which time Powell expressed reservations and mixed reviews about the nomination of John R. Bolton as ambassador to the United Nations, but refrained from advising the senators to oppose Bolton (Powell had clashed with Bolton during Bush's first term).[67] The decision was viewed as potentially dealing significant damage to Bolton's chances of confirmation. Bolton was put into the position via a recess appointment because of the strong opposition in the Senate.




Powell with Ban Ki-moon, 2004.


On April 28, 2005, an opinion piece in The Guardian by Sidney Blumenthal (a former top aide to President Bill Clinton) claimed that Powell was in fact "conducting a campaign" against Bolton because of the acrimonious battles they had had while working together, which among other things had resulted in Powell cutting Bolton out of talks with Iran and Libya after complaints about Bolton's involvement from the British. Blumenthal added that "The foreign relations committee has discovered that Bolton made a highly unusual request and gained access to 10 intercepts by the National Security Agency. Staff members on the committee believe that Bolton was probably spying on Powell, his senior advisors and other officials reporting to him on diplomatic initiatives that Bolton opposed."[68]
In July 2005, Powell joined Kleiner, Perkins, Caufield & Byers, a well-known Silicon Valley venture capital firm, with the title of "strategic limited partner."
In September 2005, Powell criticized the response to Hurricane Katrina.[69] Powell said that thousands of people were not properly protected, but because they were poor rather than because they were black.




Powell walks with newly crowned King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Vice President Dick Cheney, and former President George H. W. Bush, Saudi Arabia, August 2005.


On January 5, 2006, he participated in a meeting at the White House of former Secretaries of Defense and State to discuss United States foreign policy with Bush administration officials. In September 2006, Powell sided with more moderate Senate Republicans in supporting more rights for detainees and opposing President Bush's terrorism bill. He backed Senators John Warner, John McCain and Lindsey Graham in their statement that U.S. military and intelligence personnel in future wars will suffer for abuses committed in 2006 by the U.S. in the name of fighting terrorism. Powell stated that "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of [America's] fight against terrorism."[70]
Also in 2006, Powell began appearing as a speaker at a series of motivational events called Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani. In his speeches for the tour, he openly criticized the Bush Administration on a number of issues. Powell has been the recipient of mild criticism for his role with Get Motivated which has been called a "get-rich-quick-without-much-effort, feel-good schemology."[71]
In 2007 he joined the Board of Directors of Steve Case's new company Revolution Health. Powell also serves on the Council on Foreign Relations Board of directors.[72]
Powell, in honor of Martin Luther King Day, dropped the ceremonial first puck at a New York Islanders ice hockey game at Nassau Coliseum on January 21, 2008. On November 11, 2008, Powell again dropped the puck in recognition of Military Appreciation Day and Veterans Day.[73][74]
Recently, Powell has encouraged young people to continue to use new technologies to their advantage in the future. In a speech at the Center for Strategic and International Studies to a room of young professionals, he said, "That's your generation...a generation that is hard-wired digital, a generation that understands the power of the information revolution and how it is transforming the world. A generation that you represent, and you're coming together to share; to debate; to decide; to connect with each other."[75] At this event, he encouraged the next generation to involve themselves politically on the upcoming Next America Project, which uses online debate to provide policy recommendations for the upcoming administration.
In 2008, Powell served as a spokesperson for National Mentoring Month, a campaign held each January to recruit volunteer mentors for at-risk youth.[76]
Soon after Barack Obama's 2008 election, Powell began being mentioned as a possible cabinet member.[77] He was not nominated.
In September 2009, Powell advised President Obama against surging US forces in Afghanistan.[78] The president announced the surge the following December.
On March 14, 2014, Salesforce.com announced that Powell had joined its Board of Directors.[79]
Political views
A liberal Republican, Powell is well known for his willingness to support liberal or centrist causes.[80] He is pro-choice regarding abortion, and in favor of "reasonable" gun control.[80][clarification needed] He stated in his autobiography that he supports affirmative action that levels the playing field, without giving a leg up to undeserving persons because of racial issues. Powell was also instrumental in the 1993 implementation of the military's don't ask, don't tell policy,[80] though he later supported its repeal as proposed by Robert Gates and Admiral Mike Mullen in January 2010, saying "circumstances had changed".[81]

External video

 Booknotes interview with Powell on My American Journey, January 7, 1996, C-SPAN


The Vietnam War had a profound effect on Powell's views of the proper use of military force. These views are described in detail in the autobiography My American Journey. The Powell Doctrine, as the views became known, was a central component of U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf War (the first U.S. war in Iraq) and U.S. invasion of Afghanistan (the overthrow of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan following the September 11 attacks). The hallmark of both operations was strong international cooperation, and the use of overwhelming military force.
Powell was the subject of controversy in 2004 when, in a conversation with British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, he reportedly referred to neoconservatives within the Bush administration as "fucking crazies."[82] In addition to being reported in the press (although the expletive was generally censored in the U.S. press), the quotation was used by James Naughtie in his book, The Accidental American: Tony Blair and the Presidency, and by Chris Patten in his book, Cousins and Strangers: America, Britain, and Europe in a New Century.
In a September 2006 letter to Sen. John McCain, General Powell expressed opposition to President Bush's push for military tribunals of those formerly and currently classified as enemy combatants. Specifically, he objected to the effort in Congress to "redefine Common Article 3 of the Geneva Convention." He also asserted: "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of our fight against terrorism."[83]
Powell endorsed President Obama in 2008 and again in 2012. When asked why he is still a Republican on Meet the Press he said, "I’m still a Republican. And I think the Republican Party needs me more than the Democratic Party needs me. And you can be a Republican and still feel strongly about issues such as immigration, and improving our education system, and doing something about some of the social problems that exist in our society and our country. I don’t think there's anything inconsistent with this." [84]
Views on the Iraq War
While Powell was wary of a military solution, he supported the decision to invade Iraq after the Bush administration concluded that diplomatic efforts had failed. After his departure from the State Department, Powell repeatedly emphasized his continued support for American involvement in the Iraq War.
At the 2007 Aspen Ideas Festival in Colorado,[85] Powell revealed that he had spent two and a half hours explaining to President Bush "the consequences of going into an Arab country and becoming the occupiers." During this discussion, he insisted that the U.S. appeal to the United Nations first, but if diplomacy failed, he would support the invasion: "I also had to say to him that you are the President, you will have to make the ultimate judgment, and if the judgment is this isn't working and we don't think it is going to solve the problem, then if military action is undertaken I'm with you, I support you."[86]
In a 2008 interview on CNN, Powell reiterated his support for the 2003 decision to invade Iraq in the context of his endorsement of Barack Obama, stating: "My role has been very, very straightforward. I wanted to avoid a war. The president [Bush] agreed with me. We tried to do that. We couldn't get it through the U.N. and when the president made the decision, I supported that decision. And I've never blinked from that. I've never said I didn't support a decision to go to war."[87]
Powell's position on the Iraq War troop surge of 2007 has been less consistent. In December 2006, he expressed skepticism that the strategy would work and whether the U.S. military had enough troops to carry it out successfully. He stated: "I am not persuaded that another surge of troops into Baghdad for the purposes of suppressing this communitarian violence, this civil war, will work."[88] Following his endorsement of Barack Obama in October 2008, however, Powell praised General David Petraeus and U.S. troops, as well as the Iraqi government, concluding that "it's starting to turn around."[87] By mid-2009, he had concluded a surge of U.S. forces in Iraq should have come sooner, perhaps in late 2003.[89] Throughout this period, Powell consistently argued that Iraqi political progress was essential, not just military force.
Role in presidential election of 2008
Powell donated the maximum allowable amount to John McCain's campaign in the summer of 2007[90] and in early 2008, his name was listed as a possible running mate for Republican nominee McCain's bid during the 2008 U.S. presidential election.[91] However, on October 19, 2008, Powell announced his endorsement of Barack Obama during a Meet the Press interview, citing "his ability to inspire, because of the inclusive nature of his campaign, because he is reaching out all across America, because of who he is and his rhetorical abilities", in addition to his "style and substance." He additionally referred to Obama as a "transformational figure".[92][93] Powell further questioned McCain's judgment in appointing Sarah Palin as the vice presidential candidate, stating that despite the fact that she is admired, "now that we have had a chance to watch her for some seven weeks, I don't believe she's ready to be president of the United States, which is the job of the vice president." He said that Obama's choice for vice-president, Joe Biden, was ready to be president. He also added that he was "troubled" by the "false intimations that Obama was Muslim." Powell stated that "[Obama] is a Christian—he's always been a Christian... But the really right answer is, what if he is? Is there something wrong with being a Muslim in this country? The answer's no, that's not America." Powell then mentioned Kareem Rashad Sultan Khan, a Muslim American soldier in the U.S. Army who served and died in the Iraq War. He later stated, "Over the last seven weeks, the approach of the Republican Party has become narrower and narrower [...] I look at these kind of approaches to the campaign, and they trouble me."[92][93] Powell concluded his Sunday morning talk show comments, "It isn't easy for me to disappoint Sen. McCain in the way that I have this morning, and I regret that [...] I think we need a transformational figure. I think we need a president who is a generational change and that's why I'm supporting Barack Obama, not out of any lack of respect or admiration for Sen. John McCain."[94] Later in a December 12, 2008, CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Powell reiterated his belief that during the last few months of the campaign, Palin pushed the Republican party further to the right and had a polarizing impact on it.[95]
Views on the Obama administration
In a July 2009 CNN interview with John King, Powell expressed concern over President Obama growing the size of the federal government and the size of the federal budget deficit.[96] In September 2010, he criticized the Obama administration for not focusing "like a razor blade" on the economy and job creation. Powell reiterated that Obama was a "transformational figure."[97] In a video that aired on CNN.com in November 2011, Colin Powell said in reference to Barack Obama, "many of his decisions have been quite sound. The financial system was put back on a stable basis."[98]
On October 25, 2012, 12 days before the presidential election, he gave his endorsement to President Obama for re-election during a broadcast of CBS This Morning. He cited success and forward progress in foreign and domestic policy arenas under the Obama Administration, and made the following statement: "I voted for him in 2008 and I plan to stick with him in 2012 and I'll be voting for he [sic] and for Vice President Joe Biden next month."
As additional reason for his endorsement, Powell cited the changing positions and perceived lack of thoughtfulness of Mitt Romney on foreign affairs, and a concern for the validity of Romney's economic plans.[99]
In an interview with ABC's Diane Sawyer and George Stephanopoulos during ABC's coverage of President Obama's second inauguration, Powell criticized members of the Republican Party who "demonize[d] the president". He called on GOP leaders to publicly denounce such talk.[100]
2016 presidential election
Powell has been very vocal on the state of the Republican party. Speaking at a Washington Ideas forum in early October 2015, he warned the audience that the Republican party had begun a move to the fringe right, lessening the chances of a Republican White House in the future. He also remarked on Republican presidential contender Donald Trump's statements regarding immigrants, noting that there were many immigrants working in Trump hotels.[101]
In March 2016, Powell denounced the "nastiness" of the 2016 Republican primaries during an interview on CBS This Morning. He compared the race to a "reality show", and stated that the campaign had gone "into the mud".[102]
In August 2016, Powell accused the Clinton campaign of trying to pin Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton's email controversy on him. Speaking to People magazine, Powell said, "The truth is, she was using [the private email server] for a year before I sent her a memo telling her what I did."[103]
On September 13, 2016, emails were obtained that revealed Powell's private communications regarding both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton. Powell privately reiterated his comments regarding Clinton's email scandal, writing, "I have told Hillary's minions repeatedly that they are making a mistake trying to drag me in, yet they still try," and complaining that "Hillary’s mafia keeps trying to suck me into it" in another email.[104] In another email discussing Clinton's controversy, Powell noted that she should have told everyone what she did "two years ago", and said that she has not "been covering herself with glory." Writing on the 2012 Benghazi attack controversy surrounding Clinton, Powell said to then U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice, "Benghazi is a stupid witch hunt." Commenting on Clinton in a general sense, Powell mused that "Everything [Clinton] touches she kind of screws up with hubris", and in another email stated "I would rather not have to vote for her, although she is a friend I respect."[105]
Powell referred to Donald Trump as a "national disgrace", with "no sense of shame". He wrote candidly of Trump's role in the birther movement, which he referred to as "racist". Powell suggested that the media ignore Trump, saying, "To go on and call him an idiot just emboldens him." The emails were obtained by the media as the result of a hack.[106]
Powell endorsed Clinton on October 25, 2016, stating it was "because I think she's qualified, and the other gentleman is not qualified."[107]
Despite not running in the election, Powell received three electoral votes for president from faithless electors in Washington who had pledged to vote for Clinton, coming in third overall.[108] After Barack Obama, Powell was only the second African American to receive electoral votes in a presidential election. He was also the first Republican since 1984 to receive electoral votes from Washington in a presidential election, as well as the first Republican African American to do so.
Personal life
Powell married Alma Johnson on August 25, 1962. Their son, Michael Powell, was the chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) from 2001 to 2005. His daughters are Linda Powell, an actress, and Annemarie Powell. As a hobby, Powell restores old Volvo and Saab cars.[109][110] In 2013, he faced questions about a relationship with a Romanian diplomat, after a hacked AOL email account had been made public. He acknowledged a "very personal" email relationship but denied further involvement.[111]
Civilian awards and honors
Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medals of Freedom (the second with distinction), the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal, and the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country.

In 1988, Powell received the Academy of Achievement's Golden Plate Award.
In 1990, Powell received the U.S. Senator John Heinz Award for Greatest Public Service by an Elected or Appointed Official, an award given out annually by Jefferson Awards.[112]
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom by President George H. W. Bush.
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Spingarn Medal from the NAACP.[113]
In 1991, Powell was inducted into the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans,[114] which "honors the achievements of outstanding individuals in U.S. society who have succeeded in spite of adversity and of encouraging young people to pursue their dreams through higher education."
On September 30, 1993, Powell was awarded his second Presidential Medal of Freedom with distinction by President Bill Clinton.[35]
On November 9, 1993, Powell was awarded the second Ronald Reagan Freedom Award, by President Ronald Reagan. Powell served as Reagan's National Security Advisor from 1987–1989.[115]
On December 15, 1993, Colin Powell was created an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom.
In 1998, he was awarded the prestigious Sylvanus Thayer Award by the United States Military Academy for his commitment to the ideals of "Duty, Honor, Country."
The 2002 Liberty Medal was awarded to Colin Powell on July 4 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. In his acceptance speech, Powell reminded Americans that "It is for America, the Land of the Free and the Home of the Brave, to help freedom ring across the globe, unto all the peoples thereof. That is our solemn obligation, and we will not fail."[116]





Coat of arms



The Coat of Arms of Colin Powell was granted by the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh on February 4, 2004. Technically the grant was to Powell's father (a British subject) to be passed on by descent. Scotland's King of Arms is traditionally responsible for granting arms to Commonwealth citizens of Scottish descent. Blazoned as:

Azure, two swords in saltire points downwards between four mullets Argent, on a chief of the Second a lion passant Gules. On a wreath of the Liveries is set for Crest the head of an American bald-headed eagle erased Proper. And in an escrol over the same this motto, "DEVOTED TO PUBLIC SERVICE."

The swords and stars refer to the former general's career, as does the crest, which is the badge of the 101st Airborne (which he served as a brigade commander in the mid-1970s). The lion may be an allusion to Scotland. The shield can be shown surrounded by the insignia of an honorary Knight Commander of the Most Honorable Order of the Bath (KCB), an award the General received after the first Gulf War.
In 2005 Powell received the Bishop John T. Walker Distinguished Humanitarian Service Award for his contributions to Africa.
AARP honored Powell with the 2006 AARP Andrus Award, the Association's highest honor. This award, named in honor of AARP's founder, Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, is presented biennially to distinguished individuals who have generated positive social change in the world, and whose work and achievements reflect AARP's vision of bringing lifetimes of experience and leadership to serve all generations.
In 2005 Colin and Alma Powell were awarded the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service by the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution.
Colin Powell was initiated as an honorary brother in Sigma Phi Epsilon.
Powell is a recipient of the Silver Buffalo Award, the highest adult award given by the Boy Scouts of America.
A street in Gelnhausen, Germany was named after him: "General-Colin-Powell-Straße".[117]
In 2002, scholar Molefi Kete Asante listed Colin Powell on his list of 100 Greatest African Americans.[118]
In 2009, an elementary school named for Colin Powell opened in El Paso. It is in the El Paso Independent School District, located on Fort Bliss property, and serves a portion of Fort Bliss.[119] There is also a street in El Paso named for Powell, Colin Powell Drive.
Powell is an Honorary Board Member of the humanitarian organization Wings of Hope[120]
Since 2006, he is the chairman of the Board of Trustees for Eisenhower Fellowships[121]
In 2006, The Harry S. Truman Research Institute for the Advancement of Peace at The Hebrew University of Jerusalem awarded Colin Powell with the Truman Peace Prize for his efforts to conduct the "war against terrorism", through diplomatic as well as military means, and to avert regional and civil conflicts in many parts of the world.[122]
In September 2012 Union City, New Jersey opened Colin Powell Elementary School, which was named after Powell, and dedicated the school on February 7, 2013, with governor Chris Christie in attendance.[123] Powell himself visited the school on June 4, 2013.[124]
In 2014, Colin Powell was named to the National Board of Advisors for High Point University.[125]

See also


Biography portal
United States Army portal
Military of the United States portal



List of African-American United States Cabinet Secretaries
Plame affair
Pottery Barn rule
Republican and conservative support for Barack Obama in 2008

References


^ "Biographies of the Secretary of State:Colin Luther Powell". U.S. Department of State, Office of the Historian. Retrieved November 16, 2015. 
^ Preferred pronunciation rhymes with "bowel", not "bowl" (as in Charles Powell, Baron Powell of Bayswater) – see Alexander Chancellor, "You Say Tomato", New Yorker. August 9, 1993, p. 27.
^ The first African American secretary of state, Colin Powell, The African American Registry.
^ Biographies – Colin Powell: United States Secretary of State, African American History Month, US Department of Defense.
^ Colin Powell, Britannica Online Encyclopedia.
^ Profile: Colin Powell, BBC News.
^ a b c d "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell". The White House. Retrieved 24 December 2016.   This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.
^ Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Colin Powell". wargs.com. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Branigan, Tania (May 12, 2004). "Colin Powell claims Scottish coat of arms". The Guardian. London. 
^ "Colin Powell's Scottish Ancestry". Eastman's Online Genealogy Newsletter. 9 (20). May 17, 2004. 
^ CNN staff (March 30, 2016). "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. Retrieved September 30, 2016. 
^ Daly, Michael (August 2, 2000). "Powell's Old Nabe Boss a Big Backer". New York Daily News. Retrieved October 19, 2008. Powell explained that he had joined ROTC. He became an officer after graduation, leaving Sickser's with a smattering of Yiddish... 
^ "Former Secretary of State Gen. Colin Powell and Mario Cuomo, former governor of New York State, each a former Shabbos goy, both share fond recollections of their youth, when they were uniquely qualified to lend a Jewish neighbor a hand." Fertig, Avi. "Glatt Kosher Adventure To The Land Down Under", The Jewish Press, November 21, 2007.
^ a b "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. April 2, 2017. Education: City College of New York, B.S. in geology,1958; George Washington University, M.B.A.,1971; National War College, 1976 
^ "About Gen. Colin L. Powell, USA (Ret.)". The Colin Powell School for Civic and Global Leadership, The City College of New York. He attended New York City public schools and the City College of New York where he earned a B.S. in Geology. 
^ Schwab, Nikki (May 30, 2012). "Colin Powell: bad student". Washington Examiner. My cousins became lawyers and doctors and judges and I just sort of hung around," he recalled. "I had a straight C average all the way through high school and the City College of New York — I'm not sure how I got in. 
^ "Major Player: Gen. Colin L. Powell (Ret.)". Washington Post. July 28, 2000. Retrieved April 30, 2010. 
^ "Colin (Luther) Powell Biography (1937– )". The Biography Channel. A&E Television Networks. Retrieved May 31, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell Interview". achievement.org. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell (biography)". The White House. April 29, 2003. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b c "Colin Powell". CNN. 1996. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ Kearny, Cresson H. (1996). Jungle Snafus...And Remedies. Cave Junction, Oregon: Oregon Institute of Science & Medicine. p. 179. ISBN 978-1-884067-10-5. OCLC 41447083. 
^ Finlayson, Reggie (2003). Colin Powell. Biography (A & E). Twenty-First Century Books. p. 55. ISBN 9780822549666. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ "Interview on CNN's Larry King Live". New York: U.S. Department of State. May 4, 2004. Archived from the original on January 10, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brown, Warren; Wagner, Heather Lehr (1 Jan 2009). Colin Powell: Soldier and Statesman. Infobase Publishing. p. 41,43. 
^ "Online NewsHour: Colin Powell". Pbs.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "The 14 Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff". Joint History Office, U.S. Department of Defense. American Forces Press Service. August 10, 1999. Retrieved April 24, 2008. 
^ O'Sullivan, Christopher (2010). Colin Powell: A Political Biography. Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers. p. 100. ISBN 978-0-7425-5187-9. 
^ "Reluctant warrior", The Observer, September 30, 2001.
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (March 1991). "U.S. Sen. Kasten Pushing Effort To Award Powell With Historic Fifth Star". Jet. 79 (23). ISSN 0021-5996. Retrieved February 21, 2011. ...there is a movement afoot in the U.S. Senate to award an historic fifth star to the nation's first Black Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Colin L. Powell for his military proficiency. 
^ Italia, Bob (1991). Armed Forces: War in the Gulf. Abdo & Daughters. pp. 44–6. ISBN 978-1-56239-026-6. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Others want to make him a five-star general. [...] Congress is talking about giving him a fifth silver star, which is very rare. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (1999). All Too Human: A Political Education. Thorndike Press. pp. 330–1. ISBN 978-0-7862-2016-8. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Mack asked me to secretly research the procedure for awarding a fifth star to a general. [...] If Powell did challenge Clinton, the fifth star would forestall criticism of the general's military record. 
^ Hamilton, Nigel (2007). Bill Clinton: Mastering the Presidency. PublicAffairs. pp. 190, 399. ISBN 978-1-58648-516-0. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Moreover, for the very reason he admired Colin Powell as the most distinguished living black American, Clinton also feared the general as a potential rival. [...] Bill Clinton had denied Powell his rightful fifth star... 
^ Halberstam, David (2001). War in a Time of Peace: Bush, Clinton, and the Generals. Scribner. p. 190. ISBN 978-0-7432-0212-1. Retrieved February 22, 2011. They checked it out and found that the last general to get a fifth star was Omar Bradley forty-three years earlier. Powell, they decided, was not Bradley. Besides, as George Stephanopoulos noted, if they gave him one more star, it might help him one day politically. 
^ a b Clinton, W. J. (September 30, 1993). "Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia". University of California, Santa Barbara: The American Presidency Project. Retrieved September 18, 2016. In recognition of your legacy and service, of your courage and accomplishment, today, General Powell, I was honored to present you with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, with distinction. I want to tell all those here in attendance that this was the second Medal of Freedom you have received, the first from President Bush in 1991. And today, you became only the second American citizen in the history of the Republic to be the recipient of two Medals of Freedom. 
^ "Remarks With Bulgarian President Georgi Purvanov At Award Ceremony for the Stara Planina First Order Medal". Presidential Palace, Coat of Arms Hall, Sofia, Bulgaria: U.S. Department of State. December 7, 2004. 
^ "Parvanov-Powell". President of the Republic of Bulgaria. December 7, 2004. President Georgi Parvanov awarded US Secretary of State Colin Powell with the highest Bulgarian order "Stara Planina" for his extraordinary services to the advancement of Bulgarian-American relations and in connection with the 100th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between Bulgaria and the United States. 
^ Powell, Colin (2012). It Worked for Me. HarperCollins. pp. 3–4. ISBN 978-0-06-213512-4. 
^ McClimon, Tim (27 August 2012). "Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership". American Express. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ "Can we apply Colin Powell's 13 rules?" (PDF). Texas Child Care Quarterly. Summer 2012. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ Schram, Martin (January 21, 1995). "Don't Count Out Colin Powell". The Seattle Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Van Dyk, Ted (September 6, 1990). "Will Powell Run With Bush in '92?". The New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Lusane C. Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice: Foreign Policy, Race and the New American Century. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006, ISBN 0-275-98309-9, p. 46.
^ Apple, R. W. (October 28, 1995). "Life in Iowa May Not Have Changed, But the Political Turf Is Another Story". The New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Berke, Richard L. (October 19, 1995). "New Hampshire Poll Finds Powell With an Edge". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Clines, Francis X. (November 9, 1995). "The Powell Decision: The Announcement". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Plissner, Martin (February 7, 2007). "Ready for Obama Already". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ "NH US Vice President – R Primary Race". Our Campaigns. Feb 20, 1996. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Colin L. Powell Center for Public Policy". Retrieved 16 February 2013. 
^ "How Mccain Does It". 2000-03-06. Retrieved 2016-08-12. 
^ Kessler, Glenn (July 14, 2004). "Powell Flies in the Face of Tradition; The Secretary of State Is Least Traveled in 30 Years". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Warrick, Joby (April 12, 2006). "Lacking Biolabs, Trailers Carried Case for War; Administration Pushed Notion of Banned Iraqi Weapons Despite Evidence to Contrary". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Powell, Secretary Colin L. (February 5, 2003). "Remarks to the United Nations Security Council". New York City: U.S. Department of State. Archived from the original on January 9, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Lawless, Jill (February 7, 2003). "U.S. Scholar Uncredited in Iraq Report". Associated Press. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "UK accused of lifting dossier text". CNN. February 7, 2003. 
^ Charlie Rose. charlierose.com. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ Miller, Greg (July 15, 2004). "Flaws Cited in Powell's U.N. Speech on Iraq". Los Angeles Times. reprinted by CommonDreams.org. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b DeYoung, Karen (October 1, 2006). "Falling on His Sword: Colin Powell's most significant moment turned out to be his lowest". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell on Iraq, Race, and Hurricane Relief". ABC News: 20/20. September 8, 2005. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brancaccio, David (February 3, 2006). "Iraq Pre-War Intelligence". NOW. PBS. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Pincus, Walter (February 14, 2004). "Support for Intelligence Plan". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Remarks at the 2003 Groundhog Job Shadow Day Program, Secretary Colin L. Powell, Remarks and question and answer session with students, Washington, DC, January 31, 2003, excerpt on 1973 Chile coup, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell, Interview On Black Entertainment Television's Youth Town Hall, February 20, 2003, excerpt on 1973 U.S. covert action in Chile, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Sciolino, Elaine (November 18, 2004). "Exiles Add to Claims on Iran Nuclear Arms". New York Times. Retrieved February 8, 2007. 
^ Anderson, Cooper (December 31, 2004). "Transcripts: New Year's Eve Special". CNN. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ VandeHei, Jim; Robin Wright (April 22, 2005). "Powell Playing Quiet Role in Bolton Battle". Washington Post. 
^ Borger, Julian (April 23, 2005). "Powell's remarks harm Bolton's chances of UN job". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (April 28, 2005). "The good soldier's revenge". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Powell criticises storm response". BBC News. September 9, 2005. 
^ "Senators defy Bush on tribunals". BBC News. September 15, 2006. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Wilken, Dennis (September 7, 2008). "Down the Rabbit Hole". American Satellite Magazine. Retrieved October 10, 2008. 
^ "Board of Directors". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved December 6, 2007. 
^ "islanderspointblank.com". islanderspointblank.com. Archived from the original on July 13, 2011. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "nhl.com". nhl.com. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Powell, General Colin L, USA (Ret.) (July 8, 2008). "Keynote Address – A New Vision for America's Future: Young Leaders Shaping an International Agenda". CSIS Launch of Next America. Center for Strategic and International Studies. Archived from the original on July 31, 2008. Retrieved October 20, 2008. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ "Who Mentored Colin Powell?". President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2008. 
^ "Al Gore, Colin Powell, Caroline Kennedy in Obama's Administration? – Washington Whispers". usnews.com. November 11, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell advised against Afghan surge", Politico (September 27, 2009). http://www.politico.com/blogs/laurarozen/0909/Powell_advised_against_Afghan_surge.html
^ Ingrid Lunden. "General Colin Powell Joins Salesforce Board Of Directors, As CRM Giant Zeros In On Public Sector". TechCrunch. AOL. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ a b c Colin Powell's biography from 'On The Issues'.
^ DeYoung, Karen (February 3, 2010). "Colin Powell shifts stance on 'don't ask, don't tell' policy". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2010. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (November 18, 2004). "Colin and the crazies". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Sen. McCain Releases Letter from Gen. Colin Powell", Washington Post (September 14, 2006). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/graphic/2006/09/14/GR2006091400728.html
^ "Colin Powell: Republican Party Needs Me More Than The Democratic Party Needs Me". TheLonelyConservative.com. February 7, 2014. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ See Official website: Aspen Ideas Festival
^ "Conversation with Colin Powell" (PDF). Aspen Ideas Festival. July 2007. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell: Support for Obama doesn't mean Iraq war wrong", CNN (October 19, 2008). http://edition.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/10/19/powell.transcript/
^ James M. Klatell, "Powell: We Are Losing In Iraq", CBS (December 17, 2006). http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/12/17/ftn/main2274583.shtml
^ "Powell says Iraq surge should have come earlier", Seattle Times (July 5, 2009)
^ Henry, Ed (August 9, 2007). "Powell donates to McCain". CNN. Retrieved August 9, 2007. 
^ Holland, Steve (March 5, 2008). "McCain now has to pick a vice presidential nominee". Boston Globe. Reuters. Retrieved April 14, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell endorses Obama for president; Republican ex-Secretary of State calls Democrat 'transformational figure'". Meet the Press. MSNBC and NBC News. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ a b "Meet the Press' transcript for October 19, 2008". MSNBC. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Ohlemacher, Stephen (October 20, 2008). "Colin Powell endorses Barack Obama for president". USA Today. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell on Rush Limbaugh". CNN. July 16, 2010. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell airs doubts on Obama agenda". The Washington Times. July 3, 2009. Retrieved September 17, 2010. 
^ Carrie Budoff Brown, "Colin Powell critical of President Obama", Politico (September 19, 2010). http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0910/42381.html
^ "Video". CNN. 
^ [1] retrieved October 25, 2012.
^ "ABC News". Retrieved 2013-01-22. 
^ https://www.yahoo.com/news/colin-powell-slams-donald-trumps-immigration-plan-163454530.html. Colin Powell slams Donald Trump's immigration plan. October 1, 2015. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-gop-race_us_56dda980e4b0000de405301a Colin Powell: The GOP Race Has ‘Gone Into The Mud’. The Huffington Post. March 7, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.people.com/article/colin-powell-hillary-clinton-pinning-email-scandal-on-him Colin Powell Says Hillary Clinton's 'People Have Been Trying to Pin' Email Scandal on Him. People Magazine. August 21, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/09/13/colin-powell-hacked-emails/90341788/
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-hillary-clinton_us_57d96524e4b09d7a6880bf1c Colin Powell Attacked Hillary Clinton’s ‘Hubris’ In Leaked Emails. The Huffington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14th, 2016.
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/09/14/here-are-the-juiciest-colin-powell-comments-about-trump-and-clinton-from-his-leaked-emails/ Here are the juiciest Colin Powell comments about Trump and Clinton from his hacked emails. The Washington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ Colin Powell joins 67 Republican politicians, donors and officials who are supporting Hillary Clinton October 25, 2016
^ Four Washington electors break ranks and don’t vote for Clinton
^ Powell, Colin (October 17, 2005). "Interview transcript". Larry King Live (Interview). Interview with Larry King. CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Powell, Colin (August 2, 2004). "A Conversation with Colin Powell". The Atlantic (Interview). Interview with P. J. O'Rourke. Washington, D.C. Archived from the original on February 4, 2013. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Colin Powell insists ‘there was no affair then and there is not one now’ with diplomat. NY Daily News. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ National Winners | public service awards. Jefferson Awards.org. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ "Spingarn Medal Winners: 1915 to Today". naacp.org. Archived from the original on May 5, 2014. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Colin L. Powell". The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans. n.d. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "The Ronald Reagan Freedom Award". Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation & Library. Archived from the original on October 16, 2006. 
^ Powell, Colin (July 4, 2002). "2002 Liberty Medal Acceptance Speech". Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: National Constitution Center. 
^ "GEN Colin Powell". 2016-03-08. Retrieved 2017-07-01. 
^ Asante, Molefi Kete (2002). 100 Greatest African Americans: A Biographical Encyclopedia. Amherst, New York. Prometheus Books. ISBN 1-57392-963-8.
^ According to the Fort Bliss Bugle, as of 10/24/2013, nine schools have been named for Colin Powell.
^ ":.: The Official Wings Of Hope Homepage :.:". Wings-of-hope.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ efworld
^ "Powell: Friendship with Israel means friendship with Arabs" (PDF). afhu.org. 
^ McDonald, Terrence T. (February 8, 2013). "Gov. Christie visits Union City school opening, hears Democratic mayor praise him". NJ.com.
^ Wenik, Ian (June 9, 2013). "Saluting the general". The Union City Reporter. pp. 1 and 11.
^ "High Point University National Board of Advisors". 


Further reading

LaFeber, Walter, "The Rise and Fall of Colin Powell and the Powell Doctrine", Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Spring 2009), 71–93.
Powell, Colin A. and Joseph Persico, My American Journey, Ballantine Books, 1995. ISBN 0-345-40728-8.
Excerpts from My American Journey, TIME, September 18, 1995.
DeYoung, Karen, Soldier: The Life of Colin Powell, Alfred A. Knopf, 2006. ISBN 1-4000-4170-8.
"Alex Haley's Other Roots: African-Americans with Irish Ancestors". February 25, 2006. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
Powell, Colin; Koltz, Tony (2012). It Worked for Me: Lessons in Leadership and Life. Harper. ISBN 978-0062135124. 

External links

Find more aboutColin Powellat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Appearances on C-SPAN
Colin Powell on Charlie Rose
Colin Powell on IMDb
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The New York Times. 
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The Guardian.  
Works by or about Colin Powell in libraries (WorldCat catalog)
Colin Powell: America's Best Leaders from U.S. News & World Report
Issue positions and quotes at On the Issues
Colin Powell Quotes
African Americans in the U.S. Army
The American Presidency Project: Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia, September 30, 1993
Address to the National Summit on Africa, Washington, D.C., February 2000
Remarks to the United Nations Security Council, February 5, 2003
Complete text, audio, video of Colin Powell's Remarks to the UN Security Council AmericanRhetoric.com
"Curveball" Revelations Indicate falsified info used to start Iraq war and esp used for Powell's UN presentation on Iraq WMDs, November 5, 2007
Colin Powell demands answers over Curveball's WMD lies, Ed Pikington, Helen Pidd and Martin Chulov, The Guardian, February 16, 2011
WARGS: Ancestry of Gen. Colin Powell



Political offices


Preceded by
Peter Rodman
Deputy National Security Advisor
1987
Succeeded by
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci
National Security Advisor
1987–1989
Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright
United States Secretary of State
2001–2005
Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


Military offices


Preceded by
William Crowe
Chair of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
1989–1993
Succeeded by
David Jeremiah
Acting


Awards and achievements


Preceded by
Mikhail Gorbachev
Recipient of the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award
1993
Succeeded by
Yitzhak Rabin


Party political offices


Preceded by
Susan Molinari
Keynote Speaker of the Republican National Convention
2000
Served alongside: John McCain
Succeeded by
Zell Miller








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Cabinet of President George W. Bush (2001–09)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Colin Powell (2001–05)
Condoleezza Rice (2005–09)








Secretary of the Treasury



Paul H. O'Neill (2001–02)
John W. Snow (2003–06)
Henry Paulson (2006–09)





Secretary of Defense



Donald Rumsfeld (2001–06)
Robert Gates (2006–09)





Attorney General



John Ashcroft (2001–05)
Alberto Gonzales (2005–07)
Michael Mukasey (2007–09)





Secretary of the Interior



Gale Norton (2001–06)
Dirk Kempthorne (2006–09)





Secretary of Agriculture



Ann Veneman (2001–05)
Mike Johanns (2005–07)
Ed Schafer (2008–09)





Secretary of Commerce



Donald Evans (2001–05)
Carlos Gutierrez (2005–09)





Secretary of Labor



Elaine Chao (2001–09)





Secretary of Health and
Human Services



Tommy Thompson (2001–05)
Mike Leavitt (2005–09)





Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development



Mel Martinez (2001–03)
Alphonso Jackson (2003–08)
Steve Preston (2008–09)





Secretary of Transportation



Norman Mineta (2001–06)
Mary E. Peters (2006–09)





Secretary of Energy



Spencer Abraham (2001–05)
Samuel Bodman (2005–09)





Secretary of Education



Rod Paige (2001–05)
Margaret Spellings (2005–09)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Anthony Principi (2001–05)
Jim Nicholson (2005–07)
James Peake (2007–09)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Tom Ridge (2003–05)
Michael Chertoff (2005–09)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Dick Cheney (2001–09)





White House Chief of Staff



Andrew Card (2001–06)
Joshua Bolten (2006–09)





Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency



Christine Todd Whitman (2001–03)
Mike Leavitt (2003–05)
Stephen L. Johnson (2005–09)





Director of the Office of
Management and Budget



Mitch Daniels (2001–03)
Joshua Bolten (2003–06)
Rob Portman (2006–07)
Jim Nussle (2007–09)





Director of National Drug
Control Policy



John P. Walters (2001–09)





Trade Representative



Robert Zoellick (2001–05)
Rob Portman (2005–06)
Susan Schwab (2006–09)













Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff









Bradley
Radford
Twining
Lemnitzer
Taylor
Wheeler
Moorer
Brown
Jones
Vessey
Crowe
Powell
Jeremiah (acting)
Shalikashvili
Shelton
Myers
Pace
Mullen
Dempsey
Dunford















v
t
e


Assistants to the President for National Security Affairs






Cutler
Anderson
Jackson
Cutler
Gray
Bundy
Rostow
Kissinger
Scowcroft
Brzezinski
Allen
Clark
McFarlane
Poindexter
Carlucci
Powell
Scowcroft
Lake
Berger
C. Rice
Hadley
Jones
Donilon
S. Rice
Flynn
Kellogg (acting)
McMaster















v
t
e


Recipients of the Soldier's Medal






Marty Allen
Glenn Andreotta
Clift Andrus
Aaron Bank
James Leroy Bondsteel
Leonard Boswell
Allison Brooks
William Francis Buckley
Max Cleland
Lawrence Colburn
John Thomas Corley
Wayne A. Downing
Theodore Leslie Futch
John Galvin
Elmer Gedeon
Carl Genian
Hershel W. Gober
John F. Goodman
David E. Grange Jr.
Ed Grady
Edith Ellen Greenwood
Francis Grevemberg
Bo Gritz
William W. Hartzog
Mike Hayden
Anthony Herbert
Patrick J. Hessian
Don Holleder
Bob Hoover
Eli D. Hoyle
Otto Kerner Jr.
Darwin K. Kyle
Richard L. Lawson
Reis Leming
Charles Andrew MacGillivary
William A. Matheny
Charles J. McDonnell
Jack N. Merritt
Leo J. Meyer
Henry Mucci
José Antonio Muñiz
Thomas Alexander Parrott
Frank D. Peregory
Colin Powell
Edwin W. Rawlings
Richard Scholtes
Preston Schoyer
Stephen Silvasy Jr.
John K. Singlaub
Alek Skarlatos
Christopher Speer
Donn A. Starry
Joseph Warren Stilwell Jr.
Thomas Tackaberry
Hugh Thompson Jr.
Clarence L. Tinker
Alfred Valenzuela
Leon L. Van Autreve
David Wade
Ron Welch
Samuel Tankersley Williams
Walter K. Wilson Jr.






Names are in alphabetical order







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 79113153
LCCN: n87926095
ISNI: 0000 0001 0858 8433
GND: 119077817
SUDOC: 073950408
BNF: cb12496187m (data)
NDL: 00515602
NKC: jo2003163174
IATH: w68g9rsz










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Colin_Powell&oldid=790924136"					
Categories: 1937 birthsLiving people21st-century American politicians21st-century American writersAfrican-American diplomatsAfrican-American members of the Cabinet of the United StatesAfrican-American military personnelAfrican-American politiciansAfrican-American writersAmerican EpiscopaliansAmerican male writersAmerican memoiristsAmerican military personnel of the Gulf WarAmerican military personnel of the Vietnam WarAmerican people of Jamaican descentAmerican people of Scottish descentAmerican political writersAmerican politicians of Jamaican descentChairmen of the Joint Chiefs of StaffCity College of New York alumniCongressional Gold Medal recipientsFellows of the United States National Academy of Public AdministrationGeorge W. Bush administration cabinet membersGeorge Washington University School of Business alumniHonorary Knights Commander of the Order of the BathIraq and weapons of mass destructionKleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers peopleLégion d'honneur recipientsMilitary leaders of the Gulf WarMilitary personnel from New York CityMy Lai MassacreNational War College alumniNew York RepublicansPeople from HarlemPeople from the BronxPeople from McLean, VirginiaPershing RiflemenPolitical realistsPresidential Citizens Medal recipientsPresidential Medal of Freedom recipientsReagan administration personnelRecipients of the Air MedalRecipients of the Defense Distinguished Service MedalRecipients of the Defense Superior Service MedalRecipients of the Distinguished Service Medal (US Army)Recipients of the Legion of MeritRecipients of the Order of Saint MauriceRecipients of the Order of Skanderbeg (1990–)Recipients of the Order of Stara PlaninaRecipients of the Soldier's MedalSpingarn Medal winnersUnited States Army Command and General Staff College alumniUnited States Army Command and General Staff College facultyUnited States Army generalsUnited States National Security AdvisorsUnited States Secretaries of StateWhite House FellowsWriters from New York CityHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listWikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleUse mdy dates from March 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from October 2011Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიLatviešuLietuviųमराठीმარგალურიBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng ViệtYorùbá中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 00:21.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Colin Powell - Wikipedia




















 







Colin Powell

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the American politician. For the British soccer player, see Colin Powell (footballer).


Colin Powell








65th United States Secretary of State


In office
January 20, 2001 – January 26, 2005


President
George W. Bush


Deputy
Richard Armitage


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright


Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff


In office
October 1, 1989 – September 30, 1993


President
George H. W. Bush
Bill Clinton


Deputy
Robert Herres
David Jeremiah


Preceded by
William Crowe


Succeeded by
David Jeremiah (Acting)


16th National Security Advisor


In office
November 23, 1987 – January 20, 1989


President
Ronald Reagan


Deputy
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci


Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft





Personal details


Born
Colin Luther Powell
(1937-04-05) April 5, 1937 (age 80)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Alma Johnson (m. 1962)


Education
City University of New York, City College (BS)
George Washington University (MBA)


Signature



Military service


Allegiance
 United States


Service/branch
 United States Army


Years of service
1958–1993


Rank
 General


Unit
 3rd Armored Division
  23rd Infantry Division


Commands
 V Corps
 Joint Chiefs of Staff
  Army Forces Command


Battles/wars
Vietnam War
Invasion of Panama
Persian Gulf War


Colin Luther Powell (/ˈkoʊlᵻn/; born April 5, 1937)[1] is an American statesman and a retired four-star general in the United States Army.[2] Powell was born in Harlem as the son of Jamaican immigrants. During his military career, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989), as Commander of the U.S. Army Forces Command (1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Persian Gulf War. Powell was the first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State, serving under U.S. President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2005, the first African American to serve in that position.[3][4][5][6]
Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and was raised in the South Bronx. His parents, Luther and Maud Powell, immigrated to the United States from Jamaica. Powell was educated in the New York City public schools, graduating from the City College of New York (CCNY), where he earned a bachelor's degree in geology. He also participated in ROTC at CCNY and received a commission as an Army second lieutenant upon graduation in June 1958. His further academic achievements include a Master of Business Administration degree from George Washington University.[7]
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, during which time he held myriad command and staff positions and rose to the rank of 4-star General. His last assignment, from October 1, 1989 to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. He also formulated the Powell Doctrine.[7]
Following his military retirement, Powell wrote his best-selling autobiography, My American Journey. In addition, he pursued a career as a public speaker, addressing audiences across the country and abroad. Prior to his appointment as Secretary of State, Powell was the chairman of America's Promise - The Alliance for Youth, a national nonprofit organization dedicated to mobilizing people from every sector of American life to build the character and competence of young people. He was nominated by President Bush on December 16, 2000 as Secretary of State. After being unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate, he was sworn in as the 65th Secretary of State on January 20, 2001.[7]
Powell is the recipient of numerous U.S. and foreign military awards and decorations. Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medal of Freedom, the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, and the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country. Powell is married to the former Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama. The Powell family includes son Michael (ex-chairman of the Federal Communications Commission); daughters Linda and Anne; daughter-in-law Jane; and grandsons Jeffrey and Bryan.[7]
In 2016, while not a candidate for that year's election, Powell received three electoral votes for the office of President of the United States.



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Military career

2.1 Training
2.2 Vietnam War
2.3 After the Vietnam War
2.4 A "political general"
2.5 Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
2.6 Dates of rank
2.7 Awards and decorations

2.7.1 Badges
2.7.2 Medals and ribbons
2.7.3 Foreign decorations


2.8 13 Rules of Leadership


3 Potential presidential candidate
4 Secretary of State
5 Life after diplomatic service
6 Political views

6.1 Views on the Iraq War
6.2 Role in presidential election of 2008
6.3 Views on the Obama administration
6.4 2016 presidential election


7 Personal life
8 Civilian awards and honors
9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Early life and education
Powell was born on April 5, 1937,[8] in Harlem, a neighborhood in the New York City borough of Manhattan, to Jamaican immigrant parents Maud Arial (née McKoy) and Luther Theophilus Powell. His parents were both of mixed African and Scots ancestry.[9][10] Luther worked as a shipping clerk and Maud as a seamstress.[11] Powell was raised in the South Bronx and attended Morris High School, from which he graduated in 1954. (This school has since closed.)
While at school, Powell worked at a local baby furniture store, where he picked up Yiddish from the eastern European Jewish shopkeepers and some of the customers.[12] He also served as a Shabbos goy, helping Orthodox families with needed tasks on the Sabbath.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Geology from the City College of New York in 1958[14][15] and has said he was a 'C average' student.[16] He later earned an MBA degree from the George Washington University in 1971,[14] after his second tour in Vietnam.
Despite his parents' pronunciation of his name as /ˈkɒlᵻn/, Powell has pronounced his name /ˈkoʊlᵻn/ since childhood, after the heroic World War II flyer Colin P. Kelly Jr.[17] Public officials and radio and television reporters have used Powell's preferred pronunciation.
Military career
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, holding a variety of command and staff positions and rising to the rank of General.[18]
Training
Powell described joining the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) during college as one of the happiest experiences of his life; discovering something he loved and could do well, he felt he had "found himself." According to Powell:

It was only once I was in college, about six months into college when I found something that I liked, and that was ROTC, Reserve Officer Training Corps in the military. And I not only liked it, but I was pretty good at it. That's what you really have to look for in life, something that you like, and something that you think you're pretty good at. And if you can put those two things together, then you're on the right track, and just drive on.[19]

Cadet Powell joined the Pershing Rifles, the ROTC fraternal organization and drill team begun by General John Pershing. Even after he had become a general, Powell kept on his desk a pen set he had won for a drill team competition.
Upon graduation, he received a commission as an Army second lieutenant.[20] After attending basic training at Fort Benning, Powell was assigned to the 48th Infantry, in West Germany, as a platoon leader.[21]
Vietnam War
In his autobiography, Powell said he is haunted by the nightmare of the Vietnam War and felt that the leadership was very ineffective.
Captain Powell served a tour in Vietnam as a South Vietnamese Army (ARVN) advisor from 1962 to 1963. While on patrol in a Viet Cong-held area, he was wounded by stepping on a punji stake.[22] The large infection made it difficult for him to walk, and caused his foot to swell for a short time, shortening his first tour.
He returned to Vietnam as a major in 1968, serving in the 23rd Infantry Division, then as assistant chief of staff of operations for the Americal Division. During the second tour in Vietnam he was decorated for bravery after he survived a helicopter crash, single-handedly rescuing three others, including division commander Major General Charles Martin Gettys, from the burning wreckage.[21][23]
Powell was charged with investigating a detailed letter by 11th Light Infantry Brigade soldier Tom Glen, which backed up rumored allegations of the My Lai Massacre. He wrote: "In direct refutation of this portrayal is the fact that relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are excellent." Later, Powell's assessment would be described as whitewashing the news of the massacre, and questions would continue to remain undisclosed to the public. In May 2004 Powell said to television and radio host Larry King, "I was in a unit that was responsible for My Lai. I got there after My Lai happened. So, in war, these sorts of horrible things happen every now and again, but they are still to be deplored."[24]




Powell in April 1989, as the Commanding General of FORSCOM.


After the Vietnam War
Powell served a White House Fellowship under President Richard Nixon from 1972 to 1973. During 1975–1976 he attended the National War College, Washington, D.C.[25]
In his autobiography, My American Journey, Powell named several officers he served under who inspired and mentored him. As a lieutenant colonel serving in South Korea, Powell was very close to General Henry "Gunfighter" Emerson. Powell said he regarded Emerson as one of the most caring officers he ever met. Emerson insisted his troops train at night to fight a possible North Korean attack, and made them repeatedly watch the television film Brian's Song to promote racial harmony. Powell always professed that what set Emerson apart was his great love of his soldiers and concern for their welfare. After a race riot occurred, in which African American soldiers almost killed a Caucasian officer, Powell was charged by Emerson to crack down on black militants; Powell's efforts led to the discharge of one soldier, and other efforts to reduce racial tensions.[21]
A "political general"
In the early 1980s, Powell served at Fort Carson, Colorado. After he left Fort Carson, Powell became senior military assistant to Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, whom he assisted during the 1983 invasion of Grenada and the 1986 airstrike on Libya.




President Ronald Reagan and National Security Advisor Powell in 1988


In 1986, Powell took over the command of V Corps in Frankfurt, Germany, from Robert Lewis "Sam" Wetzel.
Following the Iran Contra scandal, Powell became, at the age of 49, Ronald Reagan's National Security Advisor, serving from 1987 to 1989 while retaining his Army commission as a lieutenant general.
In April 1989, after his tenure with the National Security Council, Powell was promoted to four-star general under President George H. W. Bush and briefly served as the Commander in Chief, Forces Command (FORSCOM), headquartered at Fort McPherson, Georgia, overseeing all Army, Army Reserve, and National Guard units in the Continental U.S., Alaska, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico. He became the third general since World War II to reach four-star rank without ever serving as a division commander, joining Dwight D. Eisenhower and Alexander Haig.
Later that year, President George H. W. Bush selected him as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.[26]
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff




Powell in November 1989, on his official Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff portrait.


Powell's last military assignment, from October 1, 1989, to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. At age 52, he became the youngest officer, and first Afro-Caribbean American, to serve in this position. Powell was also the first JCS Chair who received his commission through ROTC.[27]
During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including the invasion of Panama in 1989 to remove General Manuel Noriega from power and Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. During these events, Powell earned his nickname, "the reluctant warrior." He rarely advocated military intervention as the first solution to an international crisis, and instead usually prescribed diplomacy and containment.




General Colin Powell, Chairman, Joint Chiefs of Staff, waves from his motorcade during the Persian Gulf War Welcome Home Parade in New York City.


As a military strategist, Powell advocated an approach to military conflicts that maximizes the potential for success and minimizes casualties. A component of this approach is the use of overwhelming force, which he applied to Operation Desert Storm in 1991. His approach has been dubbed the "Powell Doctrine". Powell continued as chairman of the JCS into the Clinton presidency but as a dedicated "realist" he considered himself a bad fit for an administration largely made up of liberal internationalists.[28] He clashed with then-U.S. ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright over the Bosnian crisis, as he opposed any military interventions that didn't involve US interests.[29]
During his chairmanship of the JCS, there was discussion of awarding Powell a fifth star, granting him the rank of General of the Army. But even in the wake of public and Congressional pressure[30][31] to do so, Clinton-Gore presidential transition team staffers decided against it.[32][33][34]
Dates of rank

Promotions

Rank
Date


 General
April 4, 1989


 Lieutenant general
March 26, 1986


 Major general
August 1, 1983


 Brigadier general
June 1, 1979


 Colonel
February 1, 1976


 Lieutenant colonel
July 9, 1970


 Major
May 24, 1966


 Captain
June 2, 1962


 First lieutenant
December 30, 1959


 Second lieutenant
June 9, 1958


Awards and decorations
Badges







Combat Infantryman Badge









Expert Infantryman Badge









Ranger Tab









Parachutist Badge









Pathfinder Badge









Air Assault Badge









Presidential Service Badge









Secretary of Defense Identification Badge









Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge









Army Staff Identification Badge




Medals and ribbons











Defense Distinguished Service Medal with three oak leaf clusters









Distinguished Service Medal, Army with oak leaf cluster



Defense Superior Service Medal









Legion of Merit with oak leaf cluster



Soldier's Medal



Bronze Star



Purple Heart



Air Medal



Joint Service Commendation Medal










Army Commendation Medal with two oak leaf clusters



Presidential Medal of Freedom with Distinction (1993)[35]



Presidential Medal of Freedom (1991)



Presidential Citizens Medal









National Defense Service Medal with bronze service star









Vietnam Service Medal with silver service star



Army Service Ribbon



Army Overseas Service Ribbon with award numeral 4


Foreign decorations



Skanderbeg's Order (Albania)



Honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) (United Kingdom)



Légion d'honneur, Grand Cross (France)



Meritorious Service Cross (M.S.C.) (Canada)



Order of Stara Planina in the First Order (Bulgaria)[36][37]



Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation



Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal


13 Rules of Leadership
First printed in the August 13, 1989 issue of Parade magazine,[38] these are Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership.[39][40]

It ain't as bad as you think.
Get mad, then get over it.
Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.
It can be done.
Be careful what you choose. You may get it.
Don't let adverse facts stand in the way of a good decision.
You can't make someone else's choices.
Check small things.
Share credit.
Remain calm. Be kind.
Have a vision.
Don't take counsel of your fears or naysayers.
Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.

Potential presidential candidate
Powell's experience in military matters made him a very popular figure with both American political parties. Many Democrats admired his moderate stance on military matters, while many Republicans saw him as a great asset associated with the successes of past Republican administrations. Put forth as a potential Democratic Vice Presidential nominee in the 1992 U.S. presidential election[41] or even potentially replacing Vice President Dan Quayle as the Republican Vice Presidential nominee,[42] Powell eventually declared himself a Republican and began to campaign for Republican candidates in 1995.[43] He was touted as a possible opponent of Bill Clinton in the 1996 U.S. presidential election, possibly capitalizing on a split conservative vote in Iowa[44] and even leading New Hampshire polls for the GOP nomination,[45] but Powell declined, citing a lack of passion for politics.[46] Powell defeated Clinton 50–38 in a hypothetical match-up proposed to voters in the exit polls conducted on Election Day.[47] Despite not standing in the race, Powell won the Republican New Hampshire Vice-Presidential primary on write-in votes.[48]
In 1997 Powell founded America's Promise with the objective of helping children from all socioeconomic sectors. That same year saw the establishment of The Colin L. Powell Center for Leadership and Service. The mission of the Center is to "prepare new generations of publicly engaged leaders from populations previously underrepresented in public service and policy circles, to build a strong culture of civic engagement at City College, and to mobilize campus resources to meet pressing community needs and serve the public good." [49]
Powell was mentioned as a potential candidate in the 2000 U.S. presidential election, but decided against running.[50] Once Texas Governor George W. Bush secured the Republican nomination, Powell endorsed him for president and spoke at the 2000 Republican National Convention. Bush eventually won, and Powell was appointed Secretary of State.
In the electoral college vote count of 2016, Powell received three votes from faithless electors from Washington.
Secretary of State




Powell, National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice and Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld listen to President George W. Bush speak.


As Secretary of State in the Bush administration, Powell was perceived as moderate. Powell was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate. Over the course of his tenure he traveled less than any other U.S. Secretary of State in 30 years. [51]
On September 11, 2001, Powell was in Lima, Peru, meeting with President Alejandro Toledo and US Ambassador John Hamilton, and attending the special session of the OAS General Assembly that subsequently adopted the Inter-American Democratic Charter. After the September 11 attacks, Powell's job became of critical importance in managing America's relationships with foreign countries in order to secure a stable coalition in the War on Terrorism.
Powell came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 Invasion of Iraq. In a press statement on February 24, 2001, he had said that sanctions against Iraq had prevented the development of any weapons of mass destruction by Saddam Hussein. As was the case in the days leading up to the Persian Gulf War, Powell was initially opposed to a forcible overthrow of Saddam, preferring to continue a policy of containment. However, Powell eventually agreed to go along with the Bush administration's determination to remove Saddam. He had often clashed with others in the administration, who were reportedly planning an Iraq invasion even before the September 11 attacks, an insight supported by testimony by former terrorism czar Richard Clarke in front of the 9/11 Commission. The main concession Powell wanted before he would offer his full support for the Iraq War was the involvement of the international community in the invasion, as opposed to a unilateral approach. He was also successful in persuading Bush to take the case of Iraq to the United Nations, and in moderating other initiatives. Powell was placed at the forefront of this diplomatic campaign.




Computer-generated image of an alleged mobile production facility for biological weapons, presented by Powell at the UN Security Council. On May 27, 2003, US and UK experts examined the trailers and declared they had nothing to do with biological weapons.[52]






Powell holding a model vial of anthrax while giving a presentation to the United Nations Security Council in February 2003.


Powell's chief role was to garner international support for a multi-national coalition to mount the invasion. To this end, Powell addressed a plenary session of the United Nations Security Council on February 5, 2003, to argue in favor of military action. Citing numerous anonymous Iraqi defectors, Powell asserted that "there can be no doubt that Saddam Hussein has biological weapons and the capability to rapidly produce more, many more." Powell also stated that there was "no doubt in my mind" that Saddam was working to obtain key components to produce nuclear weapons.[53]
Most observers praised Powell's oratorical skills. However, Britain's Channel 4 News reported soon afterwards that a UK intelligence dossier that Powell had referred to as a "fine paper" during his presentation had been based on old material and plagiarized an essay by American graduate student Ibrahim al-Marashi.[54][55] A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
In an interview with Charlie Rose, Powell contended that prior to his UN presentation, he had merely four days to review the data concerning WMD in Iraq.[56]
A Senate report on intelligence failures would later detail the intense debate that went on behind the scenes on what to include in Powell's speech. State Department analysts had found dozens of factual problems in drafts of the speech. Some of the claims were taken out, but others were left in, such as claims based on the yellowcake forgery.[57] The administration came under fire for having acted on faulty intelligence, particularly what was single-sourced to the informant known as Curveball. Powell later recounted how Vice President Dick Cheney had joked with him before he gave the speech, telling him, "You've got high poll ratings; you can afford to lose a few points." Powell's longtime aide-de-camp and Chief of Staff from 1989–2003, Colonel Lawrence Wilkerson, later characterized Cheney's view of Powell's mission as to "go up there and sell it, and we'll have moved forward a peg or two. Fall on your damn sword and kill yourself, and I'll be happy, too."[58]
In September 2005, Powell was asked about the speech during an interview with Barbara Walters and responded that it was a "blot" on his record. He went on to say, "It will always be a part of my record. It was painful. It's painful now."[59]
Wilkerson said that he inadvertently participated in a hoax on the American people in preparing Powell's erroneous testimony before the United Nations Security Council.[60]
Because Powell was seen as more moderate than most figures in the administration, he was spared many of the attacks that have been leveled at more controversial advocates of the invasion, such as Donald Rumsfeld and Paul Wolfowitz. At times, infighting among the Powell-led State Department, the Rumsfeld-led Defense Department, and Cheney's office had the effect of polarizing the administration on crucial issues, such as what actions to take regarding Iran and North Korea.




Secretary Powell with NATO Secretary General Jaap de Hoop Scheffer


After Saddam Hussein had been deposed, Powell's new role was to once again establish a working international coalition, this time to assist in the rebuilding of post-war Iraq. On September 13, 2004, Powell testified before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee,[61] acknowledging that the sources who provided much of the information in his February 2003 UN presentation were "wrong" and that it was "unlikely" that any stockpiles of WMDs would be found. Claiming that he was unaware that some intelligence officials questioned the information prior to his presentation, Powell pushed for reform in the intelligence community, including the creation of a national intelligence director who would assure that "what one person knew, everyone else knew."
Additionally, Powell has been critical of other instances of U.S. foreign policy in the past, such as its support for the 1973 Chilean coup d'état. From two separate interviews in 2003, Powell stated in one about the 1973 event "I can't justify or explain the actions and decisions that were made at that time. It was a different time. There was a great deal of concern about communism in this part of the world. Communism was a threat to the democracies in this part of the world. It was a threat to the United States."[62] In another interview, however, he also simply stated "With respect to your earlier comment about Chile in the 1970s and what happened with Mr. Allende, it is not a part of American history that we're proud of."[63]
Powell announced his resignation as Secretary of State on November 15, 2004. According to The Washington Post, he had been asked to resign by the president's chief of staff, Andrew Card.[58] Powell announced that he would stay on until the end of Bush's first term or until his replacement's confirmation by Congress. The following day, Bush nominated National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice as Powell's successor. News of Powell's leaving the Administration spurred mixed reactions from politicians around the world — some upset at the loss of a statesman seen as a moderating factor within the Bush administration, but others hoping for Powell's successor to wield more influence within the cabinet.
In mid-November, Powell stated that he had seen new evidence suggesting that Iran was adapting missiles for a nuclear delivery system.[64] The accusation came at the same time as the settlement of an agreement between Iran, the IAEA, and the European Union.
On December 31, 2004, Powell rang in the New Year by pressing a button in Times Square with New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg to initiate the ball drop and 60 second countdown, ushering in the year 2005. He appeared on the networks that were broadcasting New Year's Eve specials and talked about this honor, as well as being a native of New York City.[65]
Life after diplomatic service
After retiring from the role of Secretary of State, Powell returned to private life. In April 2005, he was privately telephoned by Republican senators Lincoln Chafee and Chuck Hagel,[66] at which time Powell expressed reservations and mixed reviews about the nomination of John R. Bolton as ambassador to the United Nations, but refrained from advising the senators to oppose Bolton (Powell had clashed with Bolton during Bush's first term).[67] The decision was viewed as potentially dealing significant damage to Bolton's chances of confirmation. Bolton was put into the position via a recess appointment because of the strong opposition in the Senate.




Powell with Ban Ki-moon, 2004.


On April 28, 2005, an opinion piece in The Guardian by Sidney Blumenthal (a former top aide to President Bill Clinton) claimed that Powell was in fact "conducting a campaign" against Bolton because of the acrimonious battles they had had while working together, which among other things had resulted in Powell cutting Bolton out of talks with Iran and Libya after complaints about Bolton's involvement from the British. Blumenthal added that "The foreign relations committee has discovered that Bolton made a highly unusual request and gained access to 10 intercepts by the National Security Agency. Staff members on the committee believe that Bolton was probably spying on Powell, his senior advisors and other officials reporting to him on diplomatic initiatives that Bolton opposed."[68]
In July 2005, Powell joined Kleiner, Perkins, Caufield & Byers, a well-known Silicon Valley venture capital firm, with the title of "strategic limited partner."
In September 2005, Powell criticized the response to Hurricane Katrina.[69] Powell said that thousands of people were not properly protected, but because they were poor rather than because they were black.




Powell walks with newly crowned King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Vice President Dick Cheney, and former President George H. W. Bush, Saudi Arabia, August 2005.


On January 5, 2006, he participated in a meeting at the White House of former Secretaries of Defense and State to discuss United States foreign policy with Bush administration officials. In September 2006, Powell sided with more moderate Senate Republicans in supporting more rights for detainees and opposing President Bush's terrorism bill. He backed Senators John Warner, John McCain and Lindsey Graham in their statement that U.S. military and intelligence personnel in future wars will suffer for abuses committed in 2006 by the U.S. in the name of fighting terrorism. Powell stated that "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of [America's] fight against terrorism."[70]
Also in 2006, Powell began appearing as a speaker at a series of motivational events called Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani. In his speeches for the tour, he openly criticized the Bush Administration on a number of issues. Powell has been the recipient of mild criticism for his role with Get Motivated which has been called a "get-rich-quick-without-much-effort, feel-good schemology."[71]
In 2007 he joined the Board of Directors of Steve Case's new company Revolution Health. Powell also serves on the Council on Foreign Relations Board of directors.[72]
Powell, in honor of Martin Luther King Day, dropped the ceremonial first puck at a New York Islanders ice hockey game at Nassau Coliseum on January 21, 2008. On November 11, 2008, Powell again dropped the puck in recognition of Military Appreciation Day and Veterans Day.[73][74]
Recently, Powell has encouraged young people to continue to use new technologies to their advantage in the future. In a speech at the Center for Strategic and International Studies to a room of young professionals, he said, "That's your generation...a generation that is hard-wired digital, a generation that understands the power of the information revolution and how it is transforming the world. A generation that you represent, and you're coming together to share; to debate; to decide; to connect with each other."[75] At this event, he encouraged the next generation to involve themselves politically on the upcoming Next America Project, which uses online debate to provide policy recommendations for the upcoming administration.
In 2008, Powell served as a spokesperson for National Mentoring Month, a campaign held each January to recruit volunteer mentors for at-risk youth.[76]
Soon after Barack Obama's 2008 election, Powell began being mentioned as a possible cabinet member.[77] He was not nominated.
In September 2009, Powell advised President Obama against surging US forces in Afghanistan.[78] The president announced the surge the following December.
On March 14, 2014, Salesforce.com announced that Powell had joined its Board of Directors.[79]
Political views
A liberal Republican, Powell is well known for his willingness to support liberal or centrist causes.[80] He is pro-choice regarding abortion, and in favor of "reasonable" gun control.[80][clarification needed] He stated in his autobiography that he supports affirmative action that levels the playing field, without giving a leg up to undeserving persons because of racial issues. Powell was also instrumental in the 1993 implementation of the military's don't ask, don't tell policy,[80] though he later supported its repeal as proposed by Robert Gates and Admiral Mike Mullen in January 2010, saying "circumstances had changed".[81]

External video

 Booknotes interview with Powell on My American Journey, January 7, 1996, C-SPAN


The Vietnam War had a profound effect on Powell's views of the proper use of military force. These views are described in detail in the autobiography My American Journey. The Powell Doctrine, as the views became known, was a central component of U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf War (the first U.S. war in Iraq) and U.S. invasion of Afghanistan (the overthrow of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan following the September 11 attacks). The hallmark of both operations was strong international cooperation, and the use of overwhelming military force.
Powell was the subject of controversy in 2004 when, in a conversation with British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, he reportedly referred to neoconservatives within the Bush administration as "fucking crazies."[82] In addition to being reported in the press (although the expletive was generally censored in the U.S. press), the quotation was used by James Naughtie in his book, The Accidental American: Tony Blair and the Presidency, and by Chris Patten in his book, Cousins and Strangers: America, Britain, and Europe in a New Century.
In a September 2006 letter to Sen. John McCain, General Powell expressed opposition to President Bush's push for military tribunals of those formerly and currently classified as enemy combatants. Specifically, he objected to the effort in Congress to "redefine Common Article 3 of the Geneva Convention." He also asserted: "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of our fight against terrorism."[83]
Powell endorsed President Obama in 2008 and again in 2012. When asked why he is still a Republican on Meet the Press he said, "I’m still a Republican. And I think the Republican Party needs me more than the Democratic Party needs me. And you can be a Republican and still feel strongly about issues such as immigration, and improving our education system, and doing something about some of the social problems that exist in our society and our country. I don’t think there's anything inconsistent with this." [84]
Views on the Iraq War
While Powell was wary of a military solution, he supported the decision to invade Iraq after the Bush administration concluded that diplomatic efforts had failed. After his departure from the State Department, Powell repeatedly emphasized his continued support for American involvement in the Iraq War.
At the 2007 Aspen Ideas Festival in Colorado,[85] Powell revealed that he had spent two and a half hours explaining to President Bush "the consequences of going into an Arab country and becoming the occupiers." During this discussion, he insisted that the U.S. appeal to the United Nations first, but if diplomacy failed, he would support the invasion: "I also had to say to him that you are the President, you will have to make the ultimate judgment, and if the judgment is this isn't working and we don't think it is going to solve the problem, then if military action is undertaken I'm with you, I support you."[86]
In a 2008 interview on CNN, Powell reiterated his support for the 2003 decision to invade Iraq in the context of his endorsement of Barack Obama, stating: "My role has been very, very straightforward. I wanted to avoid a war. The president [Bush] agreed with me. We tried to do that. We couldn't get it through the U.N. and when the president made the decision, I supported that decision. And I've never blinked from that. I've never said I didn't support a decision to go to war."[87]
Powell's position on the Iraq War troop surge of 2007 has been less consistent. In December 2006, he expressed skepticism that the strategy would work and whether the U.S. military had enough troops to carry it out successfully. He stated: "I am not persuaded that another surge of troops into Baghdad for the purposes of suppressing this communitarian violence, this civil war, will work."[88] Following his endorsement of Barack Obama in October 2008, however, Powell praised General David Petraeus and U.S. troops, as well as the Iraqi government, concluding that "it's starting to turn around."[87] By mid-2009, he had concluded a surge of U.S. forces in Iraq should have come sooner, perhaps in late 2003.[89] Throughout this period, Powell consistently argued that Iraqi political progress was essential, not just military force.
Role in presidential election of 2008
Powell donated the maximum allowable amount to John McCain's campaign in the summer of 2007[90] and in early 2008, his name was listed as a possible running mate for Republican nominee McCain's bid during the 2008 U.S. presidential election.[91] However, on October 19, 2008, Powell announced his endorsement of Barack Obama during a Meet the Press interview, citing "his ability to inspire, because of the inclusive nature of his campaign, because he is reaching out all across America, because of who he is and his rhetorical abilities", in addition to his "style and substance." He additionally referred to Obama as a "transformational figure".[92][93] Powell further questioned McCain's judgment in appointing Sarah Palin as the vice presidential candidate, stating that despite the fact that she is admired, "now that we have had a chance to watch her for some seven weeks, I don't believe she's ready to be president of the United States, which is the job of the vice president." He said that Obama's choice for vice-president, Joe Biden, was ready to be president. He also added that he was "troubled" by the "false intimations that Obama was Muslim." Powell stated that "[Obama] is a Christian—he's always been a Christian... But the really right answer is, what if he is? Is there something wrong with being a Muslim in this country? The answer's no, that's not America." Powell then mentioned Kareem Rashad Sultan Khan, a Muslim American soldier in the U.S. Army who served and died in the Iraq War. He later stated, "Over the last seven weeks, the approach of the Republican Party has become narrower and narrower [...] I look at these kind of approaches to the campaign, and they trouble me."[92][93] Powell concluded his Sunday morning talk show comments, "It isn't easy for me to disappoint Sen. McCain in the way that I have this morning, and I regret that [...] I think we need a transformational figure. I think we need a president who is a generational change and that's why I'm supporting Barack Obama, not out of any lack of respect or admiration for Sen. John McCain."[94] Later in a December 12, 2008, CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Powell reiterated his belief that during the last few months of the campaign, Palin pushed the Republican party further to the right and had a polarizing impact on it.[95]
Views on the Obama administration
In a July 2009 CNN interview with John King, Powell expressed concern over President Obama growing the size of the federal government and the size of the federal budget deficit.[96] In September 2010, he criticized the Obama administration for not focusing "like a razor blade" on the economy and job creation. Powell reiterated that Obama was a "transformational figure."[97] In a video that aired on CNN.com in November 2011, Colin Powell said in reference to Barack Obama, "many of his decisions have been quite sound. The financial system was put back on a stable basis."[98]
On October 25, 2012, 12 days before the presidential election, he gave his endorsement to President Obama for re-election during a broadcast of CBS This Morning. He cited success and forward progress in foreign and domestic policy arenas under the Obama Administration, and made the following statement: "I voted for him in 2008 and I plan to stick with him in 2012 and I'll be voting for he [sic] and for Vice President Joe Biden next month."
As additional reason for his endorsement, Powell cited the changing positions and perceived lack of thoughtfulness of Mitt Romney on foreign affairs, and a concern for the validity of Romney's economic plans.[99]
In an interview with ABC's Diane Sawyer and George Stephanopoulos during ABC's coverage of President Obama's second inauguration, Powell criticized members of the Republican Party who "demonize[d] the president". He called on GOP leaders to publicly denounce such talk.[100]
2016 presidential election
Powell has been very vocal on the state of the Republican party. Speaking at a Washington Ideas forum in early October 2015, he warned the audience that the Republican party had begun a move to the fringe right, lessening the chances of a Republican White House in the future. He also remarked on Republican presidential contender Donald Trump's statements regarding immigrants, noting that there were many immigrants working in Trump hotels.[101]
In March 2016, Powell denounced the "nastiness" of the 2016 Republican primaries during an interview on CBS This Morning. He compared the race to a "reality show", and stated that the campaign had gone "into the mud".[102]
In August 2016, Powell accused the Clinton campaign of trying to pin Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton's email controversy on him. Speaking to People magazine, Powell said, "The truth is, she was using [the private email server] for a year before I sent her a memo telling her what I did."[103]
On September 13, 2016, emails were obtained that revealed Powell's private communications regarding both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton. Powell privately reiterated his comments regarding Clinton's email scandal, writing, "I have told Hillary's minions repeatedly that they are making a mistake trying to drag me in, yet they still try," and complaining that "Hillary’s mafia keeps trying to suck me into it" in another email.[104] In another email discussing Clinton's controversy, Powell noted that she should have told everyone what she did "two years ago", and said that she has not "been covering herself with glory." Writing on the 2012 Benghazi attack controversy surrounding Clinton, Powell said to then U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice, "Benghazi is a stupid witch hunt." Commenting on Clinton in a general sense, Powell mused that "Everything [Clinton] touches she kind of screws up with hubris", and in another email stated "I would rather not have to vote for her, although she is a friend I respect."[105]
Powell referred to Donald Trump as a "national disgrace", with "no sense of shame". He wrote candidly of Trump's role in the birther movement, which he referred to as "racist". Powell suggested that the media ignore Trump, saying, "To go on and call him an idiot just emboldens him." The emails were obtained by the media as the result of a hack.[106]
Powell endorsed Clinton on October 25, 2016, stating it was "because I think she's qualified, and the other gentleman is not qualified."[107]
Despite not running in the election, Powell received three electoral votes for president from faithless electors in Washington who had pledged to vote for Clinton, coming in third overall.[108] After Barack Obama, Powell was only the second African American to receive electoral votes in a presidential election. He was also the first Republican since 1984 to receive electoral votes from Washington in a presidential election, as well as the first Republican African American to do so.
Personal life
Powell married Alma Johnson on August 25, 1962. Their son, Michael Powell, was the chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) from 2001 to 2005. His daughters are Linda Powell, an actress, and Annemarie Powell. As a hobby, Powell restores old Volvo and Saab cars.[109][110] In 2013, he faced questions about a relationship with a Romanian diplomat, after a hacked AOL email account had been made public. He acknowledged a "very personal" email relationship but denied further involvement.[111]
Civilian awards and honors
Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medals of Freedom (the second with distinction), the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal, and the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country.

In 1988, Powell received the Academy of Achievement's Golden Plate Award.
In 1990, Powell received the U.S. Senator John Heinz Award for Greatest Public Service by an Elected or Appointed Official, an award given out annually by Jefferson Awards.[112]
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom by President George H. W. Bush.
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Spingarn Medal from the NAACP.[113]
In 1991, Powell was inducted into the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans,[114] which "honors the achievements of outstanding individuals in U.S. society who have succeeded in spite of adversity and of encouraging young people to pursue their dreams through higher education."
On September 30, 1993, Powell was awarded his second Presidential Medal of Freedom with distinction by President Bill Clinton.[35]
On November 9, 1993, Powell was awarded the second Ronald Reagan Freedom Award, by President Ronald Reagan. Powell served as Reagan's National Security Advisor from 1987–1989.[115]
On December 15, 1993, Colin Powell was created an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom.
In 1998, he was awarded the prestigious Sylvanus Thayer Award by the United States Military Academy for his commitment to the ideals of "Duty, Honor, Country."
The 2002 Liberty Medal was awarded to Colin Powell on July 4 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. In his acceptance speech, Powell reminded Americans that "It is for America, the Land of the Free and the Home of the Brave, to help freedom ring across the globe, unto all the peoples thereof. That is our solemn obligation, and we will not fail."[116]





Coat of arms



The Coat of Arms of Colin Powell was granted by the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh on February 4, 2004. Technically the grant was to Powell's father (a British subject) to be passed on by descent. Scotland's King of Arms is traditionally responsible for granting arms to Commonwealth citizens of Scottish descent. Blazoned as:

Azure, two swords in saltire points downwards between four mullets Argent, on a chief of the Second a lion passant Gules. On a wreath of the Liveries is set for Crest the head of an American bald-headed eagle erased Proper. And in an escrol over the same this motto, "DEVOTED TO PUBLIC SERVICE."

The swords and stars refer to the former general's career, as does the crest, which is the badge of the 101st Airborne (which he served as a brigade commander in the mid-1970s). The lion may be an allusion to Scotland. The shield can be shown surrounded by the insignia of an honorary Knight Commander of the Most Honorable Order of the Bath (KCB), an award the General received after the first Gulf War.
In 2005 Powell received the Bishop John T. Walker Distinguished Humanitarian Service Award for his contributions to Africa.
AARP honored Powell with the 2006 AARP Andrus Award, the Association's highest honor. This award, named in honor of AARP's founder, Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, is presented biennially to distinguished individuals who have generated positive social change in the world, and whose work and achievements reflect AARP's vision of bringing lifetimes of experience and leadership to serve all generations.
In 2005 Colin and Alma Powell were awarded the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service by the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution.
Colin Powell was initiated as an honorary brother in Sigma Phi Epsilon.
Powell is a recipient of the Silver Buffalo Award, the highest adult award given by the Boy Scouts of America.
A street in Gelnhausen, Germany was named after him: "General-Colin-Powell-Straße".[117]
In 2002, scholar Molefi Kete Asante listed Colin Powell on his list of 100 Greatest African Americans.[118]
In 2009, an elementary school named for Colin Powell opened in El Paso. It is in the El Paso Independent School District, located on Fort Bliss property, and serves a portion of Fort Bliss.[119] There is also a street in El Paso named for Powell, Colin Powell Drive.
Powell is an Honorary Board Member of the humanitarian organization Wings of Hope[120]
Since 2006, he is the chairman of the Board of Trustees for Eisenhower Fellowships[121]
In 2006, The Harry S. Truman Research Institute for the Advancement of Peace at The Hebrew University of Jerusalem awarded Colin Powell with the Truman Peace Prize for his efforts to conduct the "war against terrorism", through diplomatic as well as military means, and to avert regional and civil conflicts in many parts of the world.[122]
In September 2012 Union City, New Jersey opened Colin Powell Elementary School, which was named after Powell, and dedicated the school on February 7, 2013, with governor Chris Christie in attendance.[123] Powell himself visited the school on June 4, 2013.[124]
In 2014, Colin Powell was named to the National Board of Advisors for High Point University.[125]

See also


Biography portal
United States Army portal
Military of the United States portal



List of African-American United States Cabinet Secretaries
Plame affair
Pottery Barn rule
Republican and conservative support for Barack Obama in 2008

References


^ "Biographies of the Secretary of State:Colin Luther Powell". U.S. Department of State, Office of the Historian. Retrieved November 16, 2015. 
^ Preferred pronunciation rhymes with "bowel", not "bowl" (as in Charles Powell, Baron Powell of Bayswater) – see Alexander Chancellor, "You Say Tomato", New Yorker. August 9, 1993, p. 27.
^ The first African American secretary of state, Colin Powell, The African American Registry.
^ Biographies – Colin Powell: United States Secretary of State, African American History Month, US Department of Defense.
^ Colin Powell, Britannica Online Encyclopedia.
^ Profile: Colin Powell, BBC News.
^ a b c d "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell". The White House. Retrieved 24 December 2016.   This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.
^ Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Colin Powell". wargs.com. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Branigan, Tania (May 12, 2004). "Colin Powell claims Scottish coat of arms". The Guardian. London. 
^ "Colin Powell's Scottish Ancestry". Eastman's Online Genealogy Newsletter. 9 (20). May 17, 2004. 
^ CNN staff (March 30, 2016). "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. Retrieved September 30, 2016. 
^ Daly, Michael (August 2, 2000). "Powell's Old Nabe Boss a Big Backer". New York Daily News. Retrieved October 19, 2008. Powell explained that he had joined ROTC. He became an officer after graduation, leaving Sickser's with a smattering of Yiddish... 
^ "Former Secretary of State Gen. Colin Powell and Mario Cuomo, former governor of New York State, each a former Shabbos goy, both share fond recollections of their youth, when they were uniquely qualified to lend a Jewish neighbor a hand." Fertig, Avi. "Glatt Kosher Adventure To The Land Down Under", The Jewish Press, November 21, 2007.
^ a b "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. April 2, 2017. Education: City College of New York, B.S. in geology,1958; George Washington University, M.B.A.,1971; National War College, 1976 
^ "About Gen. Colin L. Powell, USA (Ret.)". The Colin Powell School for Civic and Global Leadership, The City College of New York. He attended New York City public schools and the City College of New York where he earned a B.S. in Geology. 
^ Schwab, Nikki (May 30, 2012). "Colin Powell: bad student". Washington Examiner. My cousins became lawyers and doctors and judges and I just sort of hung around," he recalled. "I had a straight C average all the way through high school and the City College of New York — I'm not sure how I got in. 
^ "Major Player: Gen. Colin L. Powell (Ret.)". Washington Post. July 28, 2000. Retrieved April 30, 2010. 
^ "Colin (Luther) Powell Biography (1937– )". The Biography Channel. A&E Television Networks. Retrieved May 31, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell Interview". achievement.org. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell (biography)". The White House. April 29, 2003. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b c "Colin Powell". CNN. 1996. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ Kearny, Cresson H. (1996). Jungle Snafus...And Remedies. Cave Junction, Oregon: Oregon Institute of Science & Medicine. p. 179. ISBN 978-1-884067-10-5. OCLC 41447083. 
^ Finlayson, Reggie (2003). Colin Powell. Biography (A & E). Twenty-First Century Books. p. 55. ISBN 9780822549666. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ "Interview on CNN's Larry King Live". New York: U.S. Department of State. May 4, 2004. Archived from the original on January 10, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brown, Warren; Wagner, Heather Lehr (1 Jan 2009). Colin Powell: Soldier and Statesman. Infobase Publishing. p. 41,43. 
^ "Online NewsHour: Colin Powell". Pbs.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "The 14 Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff". Joint History Office, U.S. Department of Defense. American Forces Press Service. August 10, 1999. Retrieved April 24, 2008. 
^ O'Sullivan, Christopher (2010). Colin Powell: A Political Biography. Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers. p. 100. ISBN 978-0-7425-5187-9. 
^ "Reluctant warrior", The Observer, September 30, 2001.
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (March 1991). "U.S. Sen. Kasten Pushing Effort To Award Powell With Historic Fifth Star". Jet. 79 (23). ISSN 0021-5996. Retrieved February 21, 2011. ...there is a movement afoot in the U.S. Senate to award an historic fifth star to the nation's first Black Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Colin L. Powell for his military proficiency. 
^ Italia, Bob (1991). Armed Forces: War in the Gulf. Abdo & Daughters. pp. 44–6. ISBN 978-1-56239-026-6. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Others want to make him a five-star general. [...] Congress is talking about giving him a fifth silver star, which is very rare. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (1999). All Too Human: A Political Education. Thorndike Press. pp. 330–1. ISBN 978-0-7862-2016-8. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Mack asked me to secretly research the procedure for awarding a fifth star to a general. [...] If Powell did challenge Clinton, the fifth star would forestall criticism of the general's military record. 
^ Hamilton, Nigel (2007). Bill Clinton: Mastering the Presidency. PublicAffairs. pp. 190, 399. ISBN 978-1-58648-516-0. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Moreover, for the very reason he admired Colin Powell as the most distinguished living black American, Clinton also feared the general as a potential rival. [...] Bill Clinton had denied Powell his rightful fifth star... 
^ Halberstam, David (2001). War in a Time of Peace: Bush, Clinton, and the Generals. Scribner. p. 190. ISBN 978-0-7432-0212-1. Retrieved February 22, 2011. They checked it out and found that the last general to get a fifth star was Omar Bradley forty-three years earlier. Powell, they decided, was not Bradley. Besides, as George Stephanopoulos noted, if they gave him one more star, it might help him one day politically. 
^ a b Clinton, W. J. (September 30, 1993). "Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia". University of California, Santa Barbara: The American Presidency Project. Retrieved September 18, 2016. In recognition of your legacy and service, of your courage and accomplishment, today, General Powell, I was honored to present you with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, with distinction. I want to tell all those here in attendance that this was the second Medal of Freedom you have received, the first from President Bush in 1991. And today, you became only the second American citizen in the history of the Republic to be the recipient of two Medals of Freedom. 
^ "Remarks With Bulgarian President Georgi Purvanov At Award Ceremony for the Stara Planina First Order Medal". Presidential Palace, Coat of Arms Hall, Sofia, Bulgaria: U.S. Department of State. December 7, 2004. 
^ "Parvanov-Powell". President of the Republic of Bulgaria. December 7, 2004. President Georgi Parvanov awarded US Secretary of State Colin Powell with the highest Bulgarian order "Stara Planina" for his extraordinary services to the advancement of Bulgarian-American relations and in connection with the 100th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between Bulgaria and the United States. 
^ Powell, Colin (2012). It Worked for Me. HarperCollins. pp. 3–4. ISBN 978-0-06-213512-4. 
^ McClimon, Tim (27 August 2012). "Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership". American Express. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ "Can we apply Colin Powell's 13 rules?" (PDF). Texas Child Care Quarterly. Summer 2012. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ Schram, Martin (January 21, 1995). "Don't Count Out Colin Powell". The Seattle Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Van Dyk, Ted (September 6, 1990). "Will Powell Run With Bush in '92?". The New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Lusane C. Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice: Foreign Policy, Race and the New American Century. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006, ISBN 0-275-98309-9, p. 46.
^ Apple, R. W. (October 28, 1995). "Life in Iowa May Not Have Changed, But the Political Turf Is Another Story". The New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Berke, Richard L. (October 19, 1995). "New Hampshire Poll Finds Powell With an Edge". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Clines, Francis X. (November 9, 1995). "The Powell Decision: The Announcement". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Plissner, Martin (February 7, 2007). "Ready for Obama Already". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ "NH US Vice President – R Primary Race". Our Campaigns. Feb 20, 1996. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Colin L. Powell Center for Public Policy". Retrieved 16 February 2013. 
^ "How Mccain Does It". 2000-03-06. Retrieved 2016-08-12. 
^ Kessler, Glenn (July 14, 2004). "Powell Flies in the Face of Tradition; The Secretary of State Is Least Traveled in 30 Years". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Warrick, Joby (April 12, 2006). "Lacking Biolabs, Trailers Carried Case for War; Administration Pushed Notion of Banned Iraqi Weapons Despite Evidence to Contrary". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Powell, Secretary Colin L. (February 5, 2003). "Remarks to the United Nations Security Council". New York City: U.S. Department of State. Archived from the original on January 9, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Lawless, Jill (February 7, 2003). "U.S. Scholar Uncredited in Iraq Report". Associated Press. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "UK accused of lifting dossier text". CNN. February 7, 2003. 
^ Charlie Rose. charlierose.com. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ Miller, Greg (July 15, 2004). "Flaws Cited in Powell's U.N. Speech on Iraq". Los Angeles Times. reprinted by CommonDreams.org. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b DeYoung, Karen (October 1, 2006). "Falling on His Sword: Colin Powell's most significant moment turned out to be his lowest". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell on Iraq, Race, and Hurricane Relief". ABC News: 20/20. September 8, 2005. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brancaccio, David (February 3, 2006). "Iraq Pre-War Intelligence". NOW. PBS. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Pincus, Walter (February 14, 2004). "Support for Intelligence Plan". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Remarks at the 2003 Groundhog Job Shadow Day Program, Secretary Colin L. Powell, Remarks and question and answer session with students, Washington, DC, January 31, 2003, excerpt on 1973 Chile coup, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell, Interview On Black Entertainment Television's Youth Town Hall, February 20, 2003, excerpt on 1973 U.S. covert action in Chile, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Sciolino, Elaine (November 18, 2004). "Exiles Add to Claims on Iran Nuclear Arms". New York Times. Retrieved February 8, 2007. 
^ Anderson, Cooper (December 31, 2004). "Transcripts: New Year's Eve Special". CNN. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ VandeHei, Jim; Robin Wright (April 22, 2005). "Powell Playing Quiet Role in Bolton Battle". Washington Post. 
^ Borger, Julian (April 23, 2005). "Powell's remarks harm Bolton's chances of UN job". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (April 28, 2005). "The good soldier's revenge". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Powell criticises storm response". BBC News. September 9, 2005. 
^ "Senators defy Bush on tribunals". BBC News. September 15, 2006. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Wilken, Dennis (September 7, 2008). "Down the Rabbit Hole". American Satellite Magazine. Retrieved October 10, 2008. 
^ "Board of Directors". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved December 6, 2007. 
^ "islanderspointblank.com". islanderspointblank.com. Archived from the original on July 13, 2011. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "nhl.com". nhl.com. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Powell, General Colin L, USA (Ret.) (July 8, 2008). "Keynote Address – A New Vision for America's Future: Young Leaders Shaping an International Agenda". CSIS Launch of Next America. Center for Strategic and International Studies. Archived from the original on July 31, 2008. Retrieved October 20, 2008. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ "Who Mentored Colin Powell?". President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2008. 
^ "Al Gore, Colin Powell, Caroline Kennedy in Obama's Administration? – Washington Whispers". usnews.com. November 11, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell advised against Afghan surge", Politico (September 27, 2009). http://www.politico.com/blogs/laurarozen/0909/Powell_advised_against_Afghan_surge.html
^ Ingrid Lunden. "General Colin Powell Joins Salesforce Board Of Directors, As CRM Giant Zeros In On Public Sector". TechCrunch. AOL. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ a b c Colin Powell's biography from 'On The Issues'.
^ DeYoung, Karen (February 3, 2010). "Colin Powell shifts stance on 'don't ask, don't tell' policy". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2010. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (November 18, 2004). "Colin and the crazies". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Sen. McCain Releases Letter from Gen. Colin Powell", Washington Post (September 14, 2006). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/graphic/2006/09/14/GR2006091400728.html
^ "Colin Powell: Republican Party Needs Me More Than The Democratic Party Needs Me". TheLonelyConservative.com. February 7, 2014. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ See Official website: Aspen Ideas Festival
^ "Conversation with Colin Powell" (PDF). Aspen Ideas Festival. July 2007. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell: Support for Obama doesn't mean Iraq war wrong", CNN (October 19, 2008). http://edition.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/10/19/powell.transcript/
^ James M. Klatell, "Powell: We Are Losing In Iraq", CBS (December 17, 2006). http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/12/17/ftn/main2274583.shtml
^ "Powell says Iraq surge should have come earlier", Seattle Times (July 5, 2009)
^ Henry, Ed (August 9, 2007). "Powell donates to McCain". CNN. Retrieved August 9, 2007. 
^ Holland, Steve (March 5, 2008). "McCain now has to pick a vice presidential nominee". Boston Globe. Reuters. Retrieved April 14, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell endorses Obama for president; Republican ex-Secretary of State calls Democrat 'transformational figure'". Meet the Press. MSNBC and NBC News. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ a b "Meet the Press' transcript for October 19, 2008". MSNBC. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Ohlemacher, Stephen (October 20, 2008). "Colin Powell endorses Barack Obama for president". USA Today. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell on Rush Limbaugh". CNN. July 16, 2010. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell airs doubts on Obama agenda". The Washington Times. July 3, 2009. Retrieved September 17, 2010. 
^ Carrie Budoff Brown, "Colin Powell critical of President Obama", Politico (September 19, 2010). http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0910/42381.html
^ "Video". CNN. 
^ [1] retrieved October 25, 2012.
^ "ABC News". Retrieved 2013-01-22. 
^ https://www.yahoo.com/news/colin-powell-slams-donald-trumps-immigration-plan-163454530.html. Colin Powell slams Donald Trump's immigration plan. October 1, 2015. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-gop-race_us_56dda980e4b0000de405301a Colin Powell: The GOP Race Has ‘Gone Into The Mud’. The Huffington Post. March 7, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.people.com/article/colin-powell-hillary-clinton-pinning-email-scandal-on-him Colin Powell Says Hillary Clinton's 'People Have Been Trying to Pin' Email Scandal on Him. People Magazine. August 21, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/09/13/colin-powell-hacked-emails/90341788/
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-hillary-clinton_us_57d96524e4b09d7a6880bf1c Colin Powell Attacked Hillary Clinton’s ‘Hubris’ In Leaked Emails. The Huffington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14th, 2016.
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/09/14/here-are-the-juiciest-colin-powell-comments-about-trump-and-clinton-from-his-leaked-emails/ Here are the juiciest Colin Powell comments about Trump and Clinton from his hacked emails. The Washington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ Colin Powell joins 67 Republican politicians, donors and officials who are supporting Hillary Clinton October 25, 2016
^ Four Washington electors break ranks and don’t vote for Clinton
^ Powell, Colin (October 17, 2005). "Interview transcript". Larry King Live (Interview). Interview with Larry King. CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Powell, Colin (August 2, 2004). "A Conversation with Colin Powell". The Atlantic (Interview). Interview with P. J. O'Rourke. Washington, D.C. Archived from the original on February 4, 2013. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Colin Powell insists ‘there was no affair then and there is not one now’ with diplomat. NY Daily News. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ National Winners | public service awards. Jefferson Awards.org. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ "Spingarn Medal Winners: 1915 to Today". naacp.org. Archived from the original on May 5, 2014. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Colin L. Powell". The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans. n.d. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "The Ronald Reagan Freedom Award". Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation & Library. Archived from the original on October 16, 2006. 
^ Powell, Colin (July 4, 2002). "2002 Liberty Medal Acceptance Speech". Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: National Constitution Center. 
^ "GEN Colin Powell". 2016-03-08. Retrieved 2017-07-01. 
^ Asante, Molefi Kete (2002). 100 Greatest African Americans: A Biographical Encyclopedia. Amherst, New York. Prometheus Books. ISBN 1-57392-963-8.
^ According to the Fort Bliss Bugle, as of 10/24/2013, nine schools have been named for Colin Powell.
^ ":.: The Official Wings Of Hope Homepage :.:". Wings-of-hope.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ efworld
^ "Powell: Friendship with Israel means friendship with Arabs" (PDF). afhu.org. 
^ McDonald, Terrence T. (February 8, 2013). "Gov. Christie visits Union City school opening, hears Democratic mayor praise him". NJ.com.
^ Wenik, Ian (June 9, 2013). "Saluting the general". The Union City Reporter. pp. 1 and 11.
^ "High Point University National Board of Advisors". 


Further reading

LaFeber, Walter, "The Rise and Fall of Colin Powell and the Powell Doctrine", Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Spring 2009), 71–93.
Powell, Colin A. and Joseph Persico, My American Journey, Ballantine Books, 1995. ISBN 0-345-40728-8.
Excerpts from My American Journey, TIME, September 18, 1995.
DeYoung, Karen, Soldier: The Life of Colin Powell, Alfred A. Knopf, 2006. ISBN 1-4000-4170-8.
"Alex Haley's Other Roots: African-Americans with Irish Ancestors". February 25, 2006. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
Powell, Colin; Koltz, Tony (2012). It Worked for Me: Lessons in Leadership and Life. Harper. ISBN 978-0062135124. 

External links

Find more aboutColin Powellat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Appearances on C-SPAN
Colin Powell on Charlie Rose
Colin Powell on IMDb
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The New York Times. 
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The Guardian.  
Works by or about Colin Powell in libraries (WorldCat catalog)
Colin Powell: America's Best Leaders from U.S. News & World Report
Issue positions and quotes at On the Issues
Colin Powell Quotes
African Americans in the U.S. Army
The American Presidency Project: Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia, September 30, 1993
Address to the National Summit on Africa, Washington, D.C., February 2000
Remarks to the United Nations Security Council, February 5, 2003
Complete text, audio, video of Colin Powell's Remarks to the UN Security Council AmericanRhetoric.com
"Curveball" Revelations Indicate falsified info used to start Iraq war and esp used for Powell's UN presentation on Iraq WMDs, November 5, 2007
Colin Powell demands answers over Curveball's WMD lies, Ed Pikington, Helen Pidd and Martin Chulov, The Guardian, February 16, 2011
WARGS: Ancestry of Gen. Colin Powell



Political offices


Preceded by
Peter Rodman
Deputy National Security Advisor
1987
Succeeded by
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci
National Security Advisor
1987–1989
Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright
United States Secretary of State
2001–2005
Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


Military offices


Preceded by
William Crowe
Chair of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
1989–1993
Succeeded by
David Jeremiah
Acting


Awards and achievements


Preceded by
Mikhail Gorbachev
Recipient of the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award
1993
Succeeded by
Yitzhak Rabin


Party political offices


Preceded by
Susan Molinari
Keynote Speaker of the Republican National Convention
2000
Served alongside: John McCain
Succeeded by
Zell Miller








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Cabinet of President George W. Bush (2001–09)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Colin Powell (2001–05)
Condoleezza Rice (2005–09)








Secretary of the Treasury



Paul H. O'Neill (2001–02)
John W. Snow (2003–06)
Henry Paulson (2006–09)





Secretary of Defense



Donald Rumsfeld (2001–06)
Robert Gates (2006–09)





Attorney General



John Ashcroft (2001–05)
Alberto Gonzales (2005–07)
Michael Mukasey (2007–09)





Secretary of the Interior



Gale Norton (2001–06)
Dirk Kempthorne (2006–09)





Secretary of Agriculture



Ann Veneman (2001–05)
Mike Johanns (2005–07)
Ed Schafer (2008–09)





Secretary of Commerce



Donald Evans (2001–05)
Carlos Gutierrez (2005–09)





Secretary of Labor



Elaine Chao (2001–09)





Secretary of Health and
Human Services



Tommy Thompson (2001–05)
Mike Leavitt (2005–09)





Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development



Mel Martinez (2001–03)
Alphonso Jackson (2003–08)
Steve Preston (2008–09)





Secretary of Transportation



Norman Mineta (2001–06)
Mary E. Peters (2006–09)





Secretary of Energy



Spencer Abraham (2001–05)
Samuel Bodman (2005–09)





Secretary of Education



Rod Paige (2001–05)
Margaret Spellings (2005–09)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Anthony Principi (2001–05)
Jim Nicholson (2005–07)
James Peake (2007–09)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Tom Ridge (2003–05)
Michael Chertoff (2005–09)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Dick Cheney (2001–09)





White House Chief of Staff



Andrew Card (2001–06)
Joshua Bolten (2006–09)





Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency



Christine Todd Whitman (2001–03)
Mike Leavitt (2003–05)
Stephen L. Johnson (2005–09)





Director of the Office of
Management and Budget



Mitch Daniels (2001–03)
Joshua Bolten (2003–06)
Rob Portman (2006–07)
Jim Nussle (2007–09)





Director of National Drug
Control Policy



John P. Walters (2001–09)





Trade Representative



Robert Zoellick (2001–05)
Rob Portman (2005–06)
Susan Schwab (2006–09)













Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff









Bradley
Radford
Twining
Lemnitzer
Taylor
Wheeler
Moorer
Brown
Jones
Vessey
Crowe
Powell
Jeremiah (acting)
Shalikashvili
Shelton
Myers
Pace
Mullen
Dempsey
Dunford















v
t
e


Assistants to the President for National Security Affairs






Cutler
Anderson
Jackson
Cutler
Gray
Bundy
Rostow
Kissinger
Scowcroft
Brzezinski
Allen
Clark
McFarlane
Poindexter
Carlucci
Powell
Scowcroft
Lake
Berger
C. Rice
Hadley
Jones
Donilon
S. Rice
Flynn
Kellogg (acting)
McMaster















v
t
e


Recipients of the Soldier's Medal






Marty Allen
Glenn Andreotta
Clift Andrus
Aaron Bank
James Leroy Bondsteel
Leonard Boswell
Allison Brooks
William Francis Buckley
Max Cleland
Lawrence Colburn
John Thomas Corley
Wayne A. Downing
Theodore Leslie Futch
John Galvin
Elmer Gedeon
Carl Genian
Hershel W. Gober
John F. Goodman
David E. Grange Jr.
Ed Grady
Edith Ellen Greenwood
Francis Grevemberg
Bo Gritz
William W. Hartzog
Mike Hayden
Anthony Herbert
Patrick J. Hessian
Don Holleder
Bob Hoover
Eli D. Hoyle
Otto Kerner Jr.
Darwin K. Kyle
Richard L. Lawson
Reis Leming
Charles Andrew MacGillivary
William A. Matheny
Charles J. McDonnell
Jack N. Merritt
Leo J. Meyer
Henry Mucci
José Antonio Muñiz
Thomas Alexander Parrott
Frank D. Peregory
Colin Powell
Edwin W. Rawlings
Richard Scholtes
Preston Schoyer
Stephen Silvasy Jr.
John K. Singlaub
Alek Skarlatos
Christopher Speer
Donn A. Starry
Joseph Warren Stilwell Jr.
Thomas Tackaberry
Hugh Thompson Jr.
Clarence L. Tinker
Alfred Valenzuela
Leon L. Van Autreve
David Wade
Ron Welch
Samuel Tankersley Williams
Walter K. Wilson Jr.






Names are in alphabetical order







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 79113153
LCCN: n87926095
ISNI: 0000 0001 0858 8433
GND: 119077817
SUDOC: 073950408
BNF: cb12496187m (data)
NDL: 00515602
NKC: jo2003163174
IATH: w68g9rsz










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Colin_Powell&oldid=790924136"					
Categories: 1937 birthsLiving people21st-century American politicians21st-century American writersAfrican-American diplomatsAfrican-American members of the Cabinet of the United StatesAfrican-American military personnelAfrican-American politiciansAfrican-American writersAmerican EpiscopaliansAmerican male writersAmerican memoiristsAmerican military personnel of the Gulf WarAmerican military personnel of the Vietnam WarAmerican people of Jamaican descentAmerican people of Scottish descentAmerican political writersAmerican politicians of Jamaican descentChairmen of the Joint Chiefs of StaffCity College of New York alumniCongressional Gold Medal recipientsFellows of the United States National Academy of Public AdministrationGeorge W. Bush administration cabinet membersGeorge Washington University School of Business alumniHonorary Knights Commander of the Order of the BathIraq and weapons of mass destructionKleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers peopleLégion d'honneur recipientsMilitary leaders of the Gulf WarMilitary personnel from New York CityMy Lai MassacreNational War College alumniNew York RepublicansPeople from HarlemPeople from the BronxPeople from McLean, VirginiaPershing RiflemenPolitical realistsPresidential Citizens Medal recipientsPresidential Medal of Freedom recipientsReagan administration personnelRecipients of the Air MedalRecipients of the Defense Distinguished Service MedalRecipients of the Defense Superior Service MedalRecipients of the Distinguished Service Medal (US Army)Recipients of the Legion of MeritRecipients of the Order of Saint MauriceRecipients of the Order of Skanderbeg (1990–)Recipients of the Order of Stara PlaninaRecipients of the Soldier's MedalSpingarn Medal winnersUnited States Army Command and General Staff College alumniUnited States Army Command and General Staff College facultyUnited States Army generalsUnited States National Security AdvisorsUnited States Secretaries of StateWhite House FellowsWriters from New York CityHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listWikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleUse mdy dates from March 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from October 2011Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიLatviešuLietuviųमराठीმარგალურიBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng ViệtYorùbá中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 00:21.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Colin Powell - Wikipedia




















 







Colin Powell

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the American politician. For the British soccer player, see Colin Powell (footballer).


Colin Powell








65th United States Secretary of State


In office
January 20, 2001 – January 26, 2005


President
George W. Bush


Deputy
Richard Armitage


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright


Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff


In office
October 1, 1989 – September 30, 1993


President
George H. W. Bush
Bill Clinton


Deputy
Robert Herres
David Jeremiah


Preceded by
William Crowe


Succeeded by
David Jeremiah (Acting)


16th National Security Advisor


In office
November 23, 1987 – January 20, 1989


President
Ronald Reagan


Deputy
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci


Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft





Personal details


Born
Colin Luther Powell
(1937-04-05) April 5, 1937 (age 80)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Alma Johnson (m. 1962)


Education
City University of New York, City College (BS)
George Washington University (MBA)


Signature



Military service


Allegiance
 United States


Service/branch
 United States Army


Years of service
1958–1993


Rank
 General


Unit
 3rd Armored Division
  23rd Infantry Division


Commands
 V Corps
 Joint Chiefs of Staff
  Army Forces Command


Battles/wars
Vietnam War
Invasion of Panama
Persian Gulf War


Colin Luther Powell (/ˈkoʊlᵻn/; born April 5, 1937)[1] is an American statesman and a retired four-star general in the United States Army.[2] Powell was born in Harlem as the son of Jamaican immigrants. During his military career, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989), as Commander of the U.S. Army Forces Command (1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Persian Gulf War. Powell was the first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State, serving under U.S. President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2005, the first African American to serve in that position.[3][4][5][6]
Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and was raised in the South Bronx. His parents, Luther and Maud Powell, immigrated to the United States from Jamaica. Powell was educated in the New York City public schools, graduating from the City College of New York (CCNY), where he earned a bachelor's degree in geology. He also participated in ROTC at CCNY and received a commission as an Army second lieutenant upon graduation in June 1958. His further academic achievements include a Master of Business Administration degree from George Washington University.[7]
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, during which time he held myriad command and staff positions and rose to the rank of 4-star General. His last assignment, from October 1, 1989 to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. He also formulated the Powell Doctrine.[7]
Following his military retirement, Powell wrote his best-selling autobiography, My American Journey. In addition, he pursued a career as a public speaker, addressing audiences across the country and abroad. Prior to his appointment as Secretary of State, Powell was the chairman of America's Promise - The Alliance for Youth, a national nonprofit organization dedicated to mobilizing people from every sector of American life to build the character and competence of young people. He was nominated by President Bush on December 16, 2000 as Secretary of State. After being unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate, he was sworn in as the 65th Secretary of State on January 20, 2001.[7]
Powell is the recipient of numerous U.S. and foreign military awards and decorations. Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medal of Freedom, the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, and the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country. Powell is married to the former Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama. The Powell family includes son Michael (ex-chairman of the Federal Communications Commission); daughters Linda and Anne; daughter-in-law Jane; and grandsons Jeffrey and Bryan.[7]
In 2016, while not a candidate for that year's election, Powell received three electoral votes for the office of President of the United States.



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Military career

2.1 Training
2.2 Vietnam War
2.3 After the Vietnam War
2.4 A "political general"
2.5 Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
2.6 Dates of rank
2.7 Awards and decorations

2.7.1 Badges
2.7.2 Medals and ribbons
2.7.3 Foreign decorations


2.8 13 Rules of Leadership


3 Potential presidential candidate
4 Secretary of State
5 Life after diplomatic service
6 Political views

6.1 Views on the Iraq War
6.2 Role in presidential election of 2008
6.3 Views on the Obama administration
6.4 2016 presidential election


7 Personal life
8 Civilian awards and honors
9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Early life and education
Powell was born on April 5, 1937,[8] in Harlem, a neighborhood in the New York City borough of Manhattan, to Jamaican immigrant parents Maud Arial (née McKoy) and Luther Theophilus Powell. His parents were both of mixed African and Scots ancestry.[9][10] Luther worked as a shipping clerk and Maud as a seamstress.[11] Powell was raised in the South Bronx and attended Morris High School, from which he graduated in 1954. (This school has since closed.)
While at school, Powell worked at a local baby furniture store, where he picked up Yiddish from the eastern European Jewish shopkeepers and some of the customers.[12] He also served as a Shabbos goy, helping Orthodox families with needed tasks on the Sabbath.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Geology from the City College of New York in 1958[14][15] and has said he was a 'C average' student.[16] He later earned an MBA degree from the George Washington University in 1971,[14] after his second tour in Vietnam.
Despite his parents' pronunciation of his name as /ˈkɒlᵻn/, Powell has pronounced his name /ˈkoʊlᵻn/ since childhood, after the heroic World War II flyer Colin P. Kelly Jr.[17] Public officials and radio and television reporters have used Powell's preferred pronunciation.
Military career
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, holding a variety of command and staff positions and rising to the rank of General.[18]
Training
Powell described joining the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) during college as one of the happiest experiences of his life; discovering something he loved and could do well, he felt he had "found himself." According to Powell:

It was only once I was in college, about six months into college when I found something that I liked, and that was ROTC, Reserve Officer Training Corps in the military. And I not only liked it, but I was pretty good at it. That's what you really have to look for in life, something that you like, and something that you think you're pretty good at. And if you can put those two things together, then you're on the right track, and just drive on.[19]

Cadet Powell joined the Pershing Rifles, the ROTC fraternal organization and drill team begun by General John Pershing. Even after he had become a general, Powell kept on his desk a pen set he had won for a drill team competition.
Upon graduation, he received a commission as an Army second lieutenant.[20] After attending basic training at Fort Benning, Powell was assigned to the 48th Infantry, in West Germany, as a platoon leader.[21]
Vietnam War
In his autobiography, Powell said he is haunted by the nightmare of the Vietnam War and felt that the leadership was very ineffective.
Captain Powell served a tour in Vietnam as a South Vietnamese Army (ARVN) advisor from 1962 to 1963. While on patrol in a Viet Cong-held area, he was wounded by stepping on a punji stake.[22] The large infection made it difficult for him to walk, and caused his foot to swell for a short time, shortening his first tour.
He returned to Vietnam as a major in 1968, serving in the 23rd Infantry Division, then as assistant chief of staff of operations for the Americal Division. During the second tour in Vietnam he was decorated for bravery after he survived a helicopter crash, single-handedly rescuing three others, including division commander Major General Charles Martin Gettys, from the burning wreckage.[21][23]
Powell was charged with investigating a detailed letter by 11th Light Infantry Brigade soldier Tom Glen, which backed up rumored allegations of the My Lai Massacre. He wrote: "In direct refutation of this portrayal is the fact that relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are excellent." Later, Powell's assessment would be described as whitewashing the news of the massacre, and questions would continue to remain undisclosed to the public. In May 2004 Powell said to television and radio host Larry King, "I was in a unit that was responsible for My Lai. I got there after My Lai happened. So, in war, these sorts of horrible things happen every now and again, but they are still to be deplored."[24]




Powell in April 1989, as the Commanding General of FORSCOM.


After the Vietnam War
Powell served a White House Fellowship under President Richard Nixon from 1972 to 1973. During 1975–1976 he attended the National War College, Washington, D.C.[25]
In his autobiography, My American Journey, Powell named several officers he served under who inspired and mentored him. As a lieutenant colonel serving in South Korea, Powell was very close to General Henry "Gunfighter" Emerson. Powell said he regarded Emerson as one of the most caring officers he ever met. Emerson insisted his troops train at night to fight a possible North Korean attack, and made them repeatedly watch the television film Brian's Song to promote racial harmony. Powell always professed that what set Emerson apart was his great love of his soldiers and concern for their welfare. After a race riot occurred, in which African American soldiers almost killed a Caucasian officer, Powell was charged by Emerson to crack down on black militants; Powell's efforts led to the discharge of one soldier, and other efforts to reduce racial tensions.[21]
A "political general"
In the early 1980s, Powell served at Fort Carson, Colorado. After he left Fort Carson, Powell became senior military assistant to Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, whom he assisted during the 1983 invasion of Grenada and the 1986 airstrike on Libya.




President Ronald Reagan and National Security Advisor Powell in 1988


In 1986, Powell took over the command of V Corps in Frankfurt, Germany, from Robert Lewis "Sam" Wetzel.
Following the Iran Contra scandal, Powell became, at the age of 49, Ronald Reagan's National Security Advisor, serving from 1987 to 1989 while retaining his Army commission as a lieutenant general.
In April 1989, after his tenure with the National Security Council, Powell was promoted to four-star general under President George H. W. Bush and briefly served as the Commander in Chief, Forces Command (FORSCOM), headquartered at Fort McPherson, Georgia, overseeing all Army, Army Reserve, and National Guard units in the Continental U.S., Alaska, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico. He became the third general since World War II to reach four-star rank without ever serving as a division commander, joining Dwight D. Eisenhower and Alexander Haig.
Later that year, President George H. W. Bush selected him as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.[26]
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff




Powell in November 1989, on his official Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff portrait.


Powell's last military assignment, from October 1, 1989, to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. At age 52, he became the youngest officer, and first Afro-Caribbean American, to serve in this position. Powell was also the first JCS Chair who received his commission through ROTC.[27]
During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including the invasion of Panama in 1989 to remove General Manuel Noriega from power and Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. During these events, Powell earned his nickname, "the reluctant warrior." He rarely advocated military intervention as the first solution to an international crisis, and instead usually prescribed diplomacy and containment.




General Colin Powell, Chairman, Joint Chiefs of Staff, waves from his motorcade during the Persian Gulf War Welcome Home Parade in New York City.


As a military strategist, Powell advocated an approach to military conflicts that maximizes the potential for success and minimizes casualties. A component of this approach is the use of overwhelming force, which he applied to Operation Desert Storm in 1991. His approach has been dubbed the "Powell Doctrine". Powell continued as chairman of the JCS into the Clinton presidency but as a dedicated "realist" he considered himself a bad fit for an administration largely made up of liberal internationalists.[28] He clashed with then-U.S. ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright over the Bosnian crisis, as he opposed any military interventions that didn't involve US interests.[29]
During his chairmanship of the JCS, there was discussion of awarding Powell a fifth star, granting him the rank of General of the Army. But even in the wake of public and Congressional pressure[30][31] to do so, Clinton-Gore presidential transition team staffers decided against it.[32][33][34]
Dates of rank

Promotions

Rank
Date


 General
April 4, 1989


 Lieutenant general
March 26, 1986


 Major general
August 1, 1983


 Brigadier general
June 1, 1979


 Colonel
February 1, 1976


 Lieutenant colonel
July 9, 1970


 Major
May 24, 1966


 Captain
June 2, 1962


 First lieutenant
December 30, 1959


 Second lieutenant
June 9, 1958


Awards and decorations
Badges







Combat Infantryman Badge









Expert Infantryman Badge









Ranger Tab









Parachutist Badge









Pathfinder Badge









Air Assault Badge









Presidential Service Badge









Secretary of Defense Identification Badge









Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge









Army Staff Identification Badge




Medals and ribbons











Defense Distinguished Service Medal with three oak leaf clusters









Distinguished Service Medal, Army with oak leaf cluster



Defense Superior Service Medal









Legion of Merit with oak leaf cluster



Soldier's Medal



Bronze Star



Purple Heart



Air Medal



Joint Service Commendation Medal










Army Commendation Medal with two oak leaf clusters



Presidential Medal of Freedom with Distinction (1993)[35]



Presidential Medal of Freedom (1991)



Presidential Citizens Medal









National Defense Service Medal with bronze service star









Vietnam Service Medal with silver service star



Army Service Ribbon



Army Overseas Service Ribbon with award numeral 4


Foreign decorations



Skanderbeg's Order (Albania)



Honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) (United Kingdom)



Légion d'honneur, Grand Cross (France)



Meritorious Service Cross (M.S.C.) (Canada)



Order of Stara Planina in the First Order (Bulgaria)[36][37]



Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation



Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal


13 Rules of Leadership
First printed in the August 13, 1989 issue of Parade magazine,[38] these are Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership.[39][40]

It ain't as bad as you think.
Get mad, then get over it.
Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.
It can be done.
Be careful what you choose. You may get it.
Don't let adverse facts stand in the way of a good decision.
You can't make someone else's choices.
Check small things.
Share credit.
Remain calm. Be kind.
Have a vision.
Don't take counsel of your fears or naysayers.
Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.

Potential presidential candidate
Powell's experience in military matters made him a very popular figure with both American political parties. Many Democrats admired his moderate stance on military matters, while many Republicans saw him as a great asset associated with the successes of past Republican administrations. Put forth as a potential Democratic Vice Presidential nominee in the 1992 U.S. presidential election[41] or even potentially replacing Vice President Dan Quayle as the Republican Vice Presidential nominee,[42] Powell eventually declared himself a Republican and began to campaign for Republican candidates in 1995.[43] He was touted as a possible opponent of Bill Clinton in the 1996 U.S. presidential election, possibly capitalizing on a split conservative vote in Iowa[44] and even leading New Hampshire polls for the GOP nomination,[45] but Powell declined, citing a lack of passion for politics.[46] Powell defeated Clinton 50–38 in a hypothetical match-up proposed to voters in the exit polls conducted on Election Day.[47] Despite not standing in the race, Powell won the Republican New Hampshire Vice-Presidential primary on write-in votes.[48]
In 1997 Powell founded America's Promise with the objective of helping children from all socioeconomic sectors. That same year saw the establishment of The Colin L. Powell Center for Leadership and Service. The mission of the Center is to "prepare new generations of publicly engaged leaders from populations previously underrepresented in public service and policy circles, to build a strong culture of civic engagement at City College, and to mobilize campus resources to meet pressing community needs and serve the public good." [49]
Powell was mentioned as a potential candidate in the 2000 U.S. presidential election, but decided against running.[50] Once Texas Governor George W. Bush secured the Republican nomination, Powell endorsed him for president and spoke at the 2000 Republican National Convention. Bush eventually won, and Powell was appointed Secretary of State.
In the electoral college vote count of 2016, Powell received three votes from faithless electors from Washington.
Secretary of State




Powell, National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice and Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld listen to President George W. Bush speak.


As Secretary of State in the Bush administration, Powell was perceived as moderate. Powell was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate. Over the course of his tenure he traveled less than any other U.S. Secretary of State in 30 years. [51]
On September 11, 2001, Powell was in Lima, Peru, meeting with President Alejandro Toledo and US Ambassador John Hamilton, and attending the special session of the OAS General Assembly that subsequently adopted the Inter-American Democratic Charter. After the September 11 attacks, Powell's job became of critical importance in managing America's relationships with foreign countries in order to secure a stable coalition in the War on Terrorism.
Powell came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 Invasion of Iraq. In a press statement on February 24, 2001, he had said that sanctions against Iraq had prevented the development of any weapons of mass destruction by Saddam Hussein. As was the case in the days leading up to the Persian Gulf War, Powell was initially opposed to a forcible overthrow of Saddam, preferring to continue a policy of containment. However, Powell eventually agreed to go along with the Bush administration's determination to remove Saddam. He had often clashed with others in the administration, who were reportedly planning an Iraq invasion even before the September 11 attacks, an insight supported by testimony by former terrorism czar Richard Clarke in front of the 9/11 Commission. The main concession Powell wanted before he would offer his full support for the Iraq War was the involvement of the international community in the invasion, as opposed to a unilateral approach. He was also successful in persuading Bush to take the case of Iraq to the United Nations, and in moderating other initiatives. Powell was placed at the forefront of this diplomatic campaign.




Computer-generated image of an alleged mobile production facility for biological weapons, presented by Powell at the UN Security Council. On May 27, 2003, US and UK experts examined the trailers and declared they had nothing to do with biological weapons.[52]






Powell holding a model vial of anthrax while giving a presentation to the United Nations Security Council in February 2003.


Powell's chief role was to garner international support for a multi-national coalition to mount the invasion. To this end, Powell addressed a plenary session of the United Nations Security Council on February 5, 2003, to argue in favor of military action. Citing numerous anonymous Iraqi defectors, Powell asserted that "there can be no doubt that Saddam Hussein has biological weapons and the capability to rapidly produce more, many more." Powell also stated that there was "no doubt in my mind" that Saddam was working to obtain key components to produce nuclear weapons.[53]
Most observers praised Powell's oratorical skills. However, Britain's Channel 4 News reported soon afterwards that a UK intelligence dossier that Powell had referred to as a "fine paper" during his presentation had been based on old material and plagiarized an essay by American graduate student Ibrahim al-Marashi.[54][55] A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
In an interview with Charlie Rose, Powell contended that prior to his UN presentation, he had merely four days to review the data concerning WMD in Iraq.[56]
A Senate report on intelligence failures would later detail the intense debate that went on behind the scenes on what to include in Powell's speech. State Department analysts had found dozens of factual problems in drafts of the speech. Some of the claims were taken out, but others were left in, such as claims based on the yellowcake forgery.[57] The administration came under fire for having acted on faulty intelligence, particularly what was single-sourced to the informant known as Curveball. Powell later recounted how Vice President Dick Cheney had joked with him before he gave the speech, telling him, "You've got high poll ratings; you can afford to lose a few points." Powell's longtime aide-de-camp and Chief of Staff from 1989–2003, Colonel Lawrence Wilkerson, later characterized Cheney's view of Powell's mission as to "go up there and sell it, and we'll have moved forward a peg or two. Fall on your damn sword and kill yourself, and I'll be happy, too."[58]
In September 2005, Powell was asked about the speech during an interview with Barbara Walters and responded that it was a "blot" on his record. He went on to say, "It will always be a part of my record. It was painful. It's painful now."[59]
Wilkerson said that he inadvertently participated in a hoax on the American people in preparing Powell's erroneous testimony before the United Nations Security Council.[60]
Because Powell was seen as more moderate than most figures in the administration, he was spared many of the attacks that have been leveled at more controversial advocates of the invasion, such as Donald Rumsfeld and Paul Wolfowitz. At times, infighting among the Powell-led State Department, the Rumsfeld-led Defense Department, and Cheney's office had the effect of polarizing the administration on crucial issues, such as what actions to take regarding Iran and North Korea.




Secretary Powell with NATO Secretary General Jaap de Hoop Scheffer


After Saddam Hussein had been deposed, Powell's new role was to once again establish a working international coalition, this time to assist in the rebuilding of post-war Iraq. On September 13, 2004, Powell testified before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee,[61] acknowledging that the sources who provided much of the information in his February 2003 UN presentation were "wrong" and that it was "unlikely" that any stockpiles of WMDs would be found. Claiming that he was unaware that some intelligence officials questioned the information prior to his presentation, Powell pushed for reform in the intelligence community, including the creation of a national intelligence director who would assure that "what one person knew, everyone else knew."
Additionally, Powell has been critical of other instances of U.S. foreign policy in the past, such as its support for the 1973 Chilean coup d'état. From two separate interviews in 2003, Powell stated in one about the 1973 event "I can't justify or explain the actions and decisions that were made at that time. It was a different time. There was a great deal of concern about communism in this part of the world. Communism was a threat to the democracies in this part of the world. It was a threat to the United States."[62] In another interview, however, he also simply stated "With respect to your earlier comment about Chile in the 1970s and what happened with Mr. Allende, it is not a part of American history that we're proud of."[63]
Powell announced his resignation as Secretary of State on November 15, 2004. According to The Washington Post, he had been asked to resign by the president's chief of staff, Andrew Card.[58] Powell announced that he would stay on until the end of Bush's first term or until his replacement's confirmation by Congress. The following day, Bush nominated National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice as Powell's successor. News of Powell's leaving the Administration spurred mixed reactions from politicians around the world — some upset at the loss of a statesman seen as a moderating factor within the Bush administration, but others hoping for Powell's successor to wield more influence within the cabinet.
In mid-November, Powell stated that he had seen new evidence suggesting that Iran was adapting missiles for a nuclear delivery system.[64] The accusation came at the same time as the settlement of an agreement between Iran, the IAEA, and the European Union.
On December 31, 2004, Powell rang in the New Year by pressing a button in Times Square with New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg to initiate the ball drop and 60 second countdown, ushering in the year 2005. He appeared on the networks that were broadcasting New Year's Eve specials and talked about this honor, as well as being a native of New York City.[65]
Life after diplomatic service
After retiring from the role of Secretary of State, Powell returned to private life. In April 2005, he was privately telephoned by Republican senators Lincoln Chafee and Chuck Hagel,[66] at which time Powell expressed reservations and mixed reviews about the nomination of John R. Bolton as ambassador to the United Nations, but refrained from advising the senators to oppose Bolton (Powell had clashed with Bolton during Bush's first term).[67] The decision was viewed as potentially dealing significant damage to Bolton's chances of confirmation. Bolton was put into the position via a recess appointment because of the strong opposition in the Senate.




Powell with Ban Ki-moon, 2004.


On April 28, 2005, an opinion piece in The Guardian by Sidney Blumenthal (a former top aide to President Bill Clinton) claimed that Powell was in fact "conducting a campaign" against Bolton because of the acrimonious battles they had had while working together, which among other things had resulted in Powell cutting Bolton out of talks with Iran and Libya after complaints about Bolton's involvement from the British. Blumenthal added that "The foreign relations committee has discovered that Bolton made a highly unusual request and gained access to 10 intercepts by the National Security Agency. Staff members on the committee believe that Bolton was probably spying on Powell, his senior advisors and other officials reporting to him on diplomatic initiatives that Bolton opposed."[68]
In July 2005, Powell joined Kleiner, Perkins, Caufield & Byers, a well-known Silicon Valley venture capital firm, with the title of "strategic limited partner."
In September 2005, Powell criticized the response to Hurricane Katrina.[69] Powell said that thousands of people were not properly protected, but because they were poor rather than because they were black.




Powell walks with newly crowned King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Vice President Dick Cheney, and former President George H. W. Bush, Saudi Arabia, August 2005.


On January 5, 2006, he participated in a meeting at the White House of former Secretaries of Defense and State to discuss United States foreign policy with Bush administration officials. In September 2006, Powell sided with more moderate Senate Republicans in supporting more rights for detainees and opposing President Bush's terrorism bill. He backed Senators John Warner, John McCain and Lindsey Graham in their statement that U.S. military and intelligence personnel in future wars will suffer for abuses committed in 2006 by the U.S. in the name of fighting terrorism. Powell stated that "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of [America's] fight against terrorism."[70]
Also in 2006, Powell began appearing as a speaker at a series of motivational events called Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani. In his speeches for the tour, he openly criticized the Bush Administration on a number of issues. Powell has been the recipient of mild criticism for his role with Get Motivated which has been called a "get-rich-quick-without-much-effort, feel-good schemology."[71]
In 2007 he joined the Board of Directors of Steve Case's new company Revolution Health. Powell also serves on the Council on Foreign Relations Board of directors.[72]
Powell, in honor of Martin Luther King Day, dropped the ceremonial first puck at a New York Islanders ice hockey game at Nassau Coliseum on January 21, 2008. On November 11, 2008, Powell again dropped the puck in recognition of Military Appreciation Day and Veterans Day.[73][74]
Recently, Powell has encouraged young people to continue to use new technologies to their advantage in the future. In a speech at the Center for Strategic and International Studies to a room of young professionals, he said, "That's your generation...a generation that is hard-wired digital, a generation that understands the power of the information revolution and how it is transforming the world. A generation that you represent, and you're coming together to share; to debate; to decide; to connect with each other."[75] At this event, he encouraged the next generation to involve themselves politically on the upcoming Next America Project, which uses online debate to provide policy recommendations for the upcoming administration.
In 2008, Powell served as a spokesperson for National Mentoring Month, a campaign held each January to recruit volunteer mentors for at-risk youth.[76]
Soon after Barack Obama's 2008 election, Powell began being mentioned as a possible cabinet member.[77] He was not nominated.
In September 2009, Powell advised President Obama against surging US forces in Afghanistan.[78] The president announced the surge the following December.
On March 14, 2014, Salesforce.com announced that Powell had joined its Board of Directors.[79]
Political views
A liberal Republican, Powell is well known for his willingness to support liberal or centrist causes.[80] He is pro-choice regarding abortion, and in favor of "reasonable" gun control.[80][clarification needed] He stated in his autobiography that he supports affirmative action that levels the playing field, without giving a leg up to undeserving persons because of racial issues. Powell was also instrumental in the 1993 implementation of the military's don't ask, don't tell policy,[80] though he later supported its repeal as proposed by Robert Gates and Admiral Mike Mullen in January 2010, saying "circumstances had changed".[81]

External video

 Booknotes interview with Powell on My American Journey, January 7, 1996, C-SPAN


The Vietnam War had a profound effect on Powell's views of the proper use of military force. These views are described in detail in the autobiography My American Journey. The Powell Doctrine, as the views became known, was a central component of U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf War (the first U.S. war in Iraq) and U.S. invasion of Afghanistan (the overthrow of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan following the September 11 attacks). The hallmark of both operations was strong international cooperation, and the use of overwhelming military force.
Powell was the subject of controversy in 2004 when, in a conversation with British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, he reportedly referred to neoconservatives within the Bush administration as "fucking crazies."[82] In addition to being reported in the press (although the expletive was generally censored in the U.S. press), the quotation was used by James Naughtie in his book, The Accidental American: Tony Blair and the Presidency, and by Chris Patten in his book, Cousins and Strangers: America, Britain, and Europe in a New Century.
In a September 2006 letter to Sen. John McCain, General Powell expressed opposition to President Bush's push for military tribunals of those formerly and currently classified as enemy combatants. Specifically, he objected to the effort in Congress to "redefine Common Article 3 of the Geneva Convention." He also asserted: "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of our fight against terrorism."[83]
Powell endorsed President Obama in 2008 and again in 2012. When asked why he is still a Republican on Meet the Press he said, "I’m still a Republican. And I think the Republican Party needs me more than the Democratic Party needs me. And you can be a Republican and still feel strongly about issues such as immigration, and improving our education system, and doing something about some of the social problems that exist in our society and our country. I don’t think there's anything inconsistent with this." [84]
Views on the Iraq War
While Powell was wary of a military solution, he supported the decision to invade Iraq after the Bush administration concluded that diplomatic efforts had failed. After his departure from the State Department, Powell repeatedly emphasized his continued support for American involvement in the Iraq War.
At the 2007 Aspen Ideas Festival in Colorado,[85] Powell revealed that he had spent two and a half hours explaining to President Bush "the consequences of going into an Arab country and becoming the occupiers." During this discussion, he insisted that the U.S. appeal to the United Nations first, but if diplomacy failed, he would support the invasion: "I also had to say to him that you are the President, you will have to make the ultimate judgment, and if the judgment is this isn't working and we don't think it is going to solve the problem, then if military action is undertaken I'm with you, I support you."[86]
In a 2008 interview on CNN, Powell reiterated his support for the 2003 decision to invade Iraq in the context of his endorsement of Barack Obama, stating: "My role has been very, very straightforward. I wanted to avoid a war. The president [Bush] agreed with me. We tried to do that. We couldn't get it through the U.N. and when the president made the decision, I supported that decision. And I've never blinked from that. I've never said I didn't support a decision to go to war."[87]
Powell's position on the Iraq War troop surge of 2007 has been less consistent. In December 2006, he expressed skepticism that the strategy would work and whether the U.S. military had enough troops to carry it out successfully. He stated: "I am not persuaded that another surge of troops into Baghdad for the purposes of suppressing this communitarian violence, this civil war, will work."[88] Following his endorsement of Barack Obama in October 2008, however, Powell praised General David Petraeus and U.S. troops, as well as the Iraqi government, concluding that "it's starting to turn around."[87] By mid-2009, he had concluded a surge of U.S. forces in Iraq should have come sooner, perhaps in late 2003.[89] Throughout this period, Powell consistently argued that Iraqi political progress was essential, not just military force.
Role in presidential election of 2008
Powell donated the maximum allowable amount to John McCain's campaign in the summer of 2007[90] and in early 2008, his name was listed as a possible running mate for Republican nominee McCain's bid during the 2008 U.S. presidential election.[91] However, on October 19, 2008, Powell announced his endorsement of Barack Obama during a Meet the Press interview, citing "his ability to inspire, because of the inclusive nature of his campaign, because he is reaching out all across America, because of who he is and his rhetorical abilities", in addition to his "style and substance." He additionally referred to Obama as a "transformational figure".[92][93] Powell further questioned McCain's judgment in appointing Sarah Palin as the vice presidential candidate, stating that despite the fact that she is admired, "now that we have had a chance to watch her for some seven weeks, I don't believe she's ready to be president of the United States, which is the job of the vice president." He said that Obama's choice for vice-president, Joe Biden, was ready to be president. He also added that he was "troubled" by the "false intimations that Obama was Muslim." Powell stated that "[Obama] is a Christian—he's always been a Christian... But the really right answer is, what if he is? Is there something wrong with being a Muslim in this country? The answer's no, that's not America." Powell then mentioned Kareem Rashad Sultan Khan, a Muslim American soldier in the U.S. Army who served and died in the Iraq War. He later stated, "Over the last seven weeks, the approach of the Republican Party has become narrower and narrower [...] I look at these kind of approaches to the campaign, and they trouble me."[92][93] Powell concluded his Sunday morning talk show comments, "It isn't easy for me to disappoint Sen. McCain in the way that I have this morning, and I regret that [...] I think we need a transformational figure. I think we need a president who is a generational change and that's why I'm supporting Barack Obama, not out of any lack of respect or admiration for Sen. John McCain."[94] Later in a December 12, 2008, CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Powell reiterated his belief that during the last few months of the campaign, Palin pushed the Republican party further to the right and had a polarizing impact on it.[95]
Views on the Obama administration
In a July 2009 CNN interview with John King, Powell expressed concern over President Obama growing the size of the federal government and the size of the federal budget deficit.[96] In September 2010, he criticized the Obama administration for not focusing "like a razor blade" on the economy and job creation. Powell reiterated that Obama was a "transformational figure."[97] In a video that aired on CNN.com in November 2011, Colin Powell said in reference to Barack Obama, "many of his decisions have been quite sound. The financial system was put back on a stable basis."[98]
On October 25, 2012, 12 days before the presidential election, he gave his endorsement to President Obama for re-election during a broadcast of CBS This Morning. He cited success and forward progress in foreign and domestic policy arenas under the Obama Administration, and made the following statement: "I voted for him in 2008 and I plan to stick with him in 2012 and I'll be voting for he [sic] and for Vice President Joe Biden next month."
As additional reason for his endorsement, Powell cited the changing positions and perceived lack of thoughtfulness of Mitt Romney on foreign affairs, and a concern for the validity of Romney's economic plans.[99]
In an interview with ABC's Diane Sawyer and George Stephanopoulos during ABC's coverage of President Obama's second inauguration, Powell criticized members of the Republican Party who "demonize[d] the president". He called on GOP leaders to publicly denounce such talk.[100]
2016 presidential election
Powell has been very vocal on the state of the Republican party. Speaking at a Washington Ideas forum in early October 2015, he warned the audience that the Republican party had begun a move to the fringe right, lessening the chances of a Republican White House in the future. He also remarked on Republican presidential contender Donald Trump's statements regarding immigrants, noting that there were many immigrants working in Trump hotels.[101]
In March 2016, Powell denounced the "nastiness" of the 2016 Republican primaries during an interview on CBS This Morning. He compared the race to a "reality show", and stated that the campaign had gone "into the mud".[102]
In August 2016, Powell accused the Clinton campaign of trying to pin Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton's email controversy on him. Speaking to People magazine, Powell said, "The truth is, she was using [the private email server] for a year before I sent her a memo telling her what I did."[103]
On September 13, 2016, emails were obtained that revealed Powell's private communications regarding both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton. Powell privately reiterated his comments regarding Clinton's email scandal, writing, "I have told Hillary's minions repeatedly that they are making a mistake trying to drag me in, yet they still try," and complaining that "Hillary’s mafia keeps trying to suck me into it" in another email.[104] In another email discussing Clinton's controversy, Powell noted that she should have told everyone what she did "two years ago", and said that she has not "been covering herself with glory." Writing on the 2012 Benghazi attack controversy surrounding Clinton, Powell said to then U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice, "Benghazi is a stupid witch hunt." Commenting on Clinton in a general sense, Powell mused that "Everything [Clinton] touches she kind of screws up with hubris", and in another email stated "I would rather not have to vote for her, although she is a friend I respect."[105]
Powell referred to Donald Trump as a "national disgrace", with "no sense of shame". He wrote candidly of Trump's role in the birther movement, which he referred to as "racist". Powell suggested that the media ignore Trump, saying, "To go on and call him an idiot just emboldens him." The emails were obtained by the media as the result of a hack.[106]
Powell endorsed Clinton on October 25, 2016, stating it was "because I think she's qualified, and the other gentleman is not qualified."[107]
Despite not running in the election, Powell received three electoral votes for president from faithless electors in Washington who had pledged to vote for Clinton, coming in third overall.[108] After Barack Obama, Powell was only the second African American to receive electoral votes in a presidential election. He was also the first Republican since 1984 to receive electoral votes from Washington in a presidential election, as well as the first Republican African American to do so.
Personal life
Powell married Alma Johnson on August 25, 1962. Their son, Michael Powell, was the chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) from 2001 to 2005. His daughters are Linda Powell, an actress, and Annemarie Powell. As a hobby, Powell restores old Volvo and Saab cars.[109][110] In 2013, he faced questions about a relationship with a Romanian diplomat, after a hacked AOL email account had been made public. He acknowledged a "very personal" email relationship but denied further involvement.[111]
Civilian awards and honors
Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medals of Freedom (the second with distinction), the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal, and the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country.

In 1988, Powell received the Academy of Achievement's Golden Plate Award.
In 1990, Powell received the U.S. Senator John Heinz Award for Greatest Public Service by an Elected or Appointed Official, an award given out annually by Jefferson Awards.[112]
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom by President George H. W. Bush.
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Spingarn Medal from the NAACP.[113]
In 1991, Powell was inducted into the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans,[114] which "honors the achievements of outstanding individuals in U.S. society who have succeeded in spite of adversity and of encouraging young people to pursue their dreams through higher education."
On September 30, 1993, Powell was awarded his second Presidential Medal of Freedom with distinction by President Bill Clinton.[35]
On November 9, 1993, Powell was awarded the second Ronald Reagan Freedom Award, by President Ronald Reagan. Powell served as Reagan's National Security Advisor from 1987–1989.[115]
On December 15, 1993, Colin Powell was created an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom.
In 1998, he was awarded the prestigious Sylvanus Thayer Award by the United States Military Academy for his commitment to the ideals of "Duty, Honor, Country."
The 2002 Liberty Medal was awarded to Colin Powell on July 4 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. In his acceptance speech, Powell reminded Americans that "It is for America, the Land of the Free and the Home of the Brave, to help freedom ring across the globe, unto all the peoples thereof. That is our solemn obligation, and we will not fail."[116]





Coat of arms



The Coat of Arms of Colin Powell was granted by the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh on February 4, 2004. Technically the grant was to Powell's father (a British subject) to be passed on by descent. Scotland's King of Arms is traditionally responsible for granting arms to Commonwealth citizens of Scottish descent. Blazoned as:

Azure, two swords in saltire points downwards between four mullets Argent, on a chief of the Second a lion passant Gules. On a wreath of the Liveries is set for Crest the head of an American bald-headed eagle erased Proper. And in an escrol over the same this motto, "DEVOTED TO PUBLIC SERVICE."

The swords and stars refer to the former general's career, as does the crest, which is the badge of the 101st Airborne (which he served as a brigade commander in the mid-1970s). The lion may be an allusion to Scotland. The shield can be shown surrounded by the insignia of an honorary Knight Commander of the Most Honorable Order of the Bath (KCB), an award the General received after the first Gulf War.
In 2005 Powell received the Bishop John T. Walker Distinguished Humanitarian Service Award for his contributions to Africa.
AARP honored Powell with the 2006 AARP Andrus Award, the Association's highest honor. This award, named in honor of AARP's founder, Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, is presented biennially to distinguished individuals who have generated positive social change in the world, and whose work and achievements reflect AARP's vision of bringing lifetimes of experience and leadership to serve all generations.
In 2005 Colin and Alma Powell were awarded the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service by the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution.
Colin Powell was initiated as an honorary brother in Sigma Phi Epsilon.
Powell is a recipient of the Silver Buffalo Award, the highest adult award given by the Boy Scouts of America.
A street in Gelnhausen, Germany was named after him: "General-Colin-Powell-Straße".[117]
In 2002, scholar Molefi Kete Asante listed Colin Powell on his list of 100 Greatest African Americans.[118]
In 2009, an elementary school named for Colin Powell opened in El Paso. It is in the El Paso Independent School District, located on Fort Bliss property, and serves a portion of Fort Bliss.[119] There is also a street in El Paso named for Powell, Colin Powell Drive.
Powell is an Honorary Board Member of the humanitarian organization Wings of Hope[120]
Since 2006, he is the chairman of the Board of Trustees for Eisenhower Fellowships[121]
In 2006, The Harry S. Truman Research Institute for the Advancement of Peace at The Hebrew University of Jerusalem awarded Colin Powell with the Truman Peace Prize for his efforts to conduct the "war against terrorism", through diplomatic as well as military means, and to avert regional and civil conflicts in many parts of the world.[122]
In September 2012 Union City, New Jersey opened Colin Powell Elementary School, which was named after Powell, and dedicated the school on February 7, 2013, with governor Chris Christie in attendance.[123] Powell himself visited the school on June 4, 2013.[124]
In 2014, Colin Powell was named to the National Board of Advisors for High Point University.[125]

See also


Biography portal
United States Army portal
Military of the United States portal



List of African-American United States Cabinet Secretaries
Plame affair
Pottery Barn rule
Republican and conservative support for Barack Obama in 2008

References


^ "Biographies of the Secretary of State:Colin Luther Powell". U.S. Department of State, Office of the Historian. Retrieved November 16, 2015. 
^ Preferred pronunciation rhymes with "bowel", not "bowl" (as in Charles Powell, Baron Powell of Bayswater) – see Alexander Chancellor, "You Say Tomato", New Yorker. August 9, 1993, p. 27.
^ The first African American secretary of state, Colin Powell, The African American Registry.
^ Biographies – Colin Powell: United States Secretary of State, African American History Month, US Department of Defense.
^ Colin Powell, Britannica Online Encyclopedia.
^ Profile: Colin Powell, BBC News.
^ a b c d "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell". The White House. Retrieved 24 December 2016.   This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.
^ Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Colin Powell". wargs.com. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Branigan, Tania (May 12, 2004). "Colin Powell claims Scottish coat of arms". The Guardian. London. 
^ "Colin Powell's Scottish Ancestry". Eastman's Online Genealogy Newsletter. 9 (20). May 17, 2004. 
^ CNN staff (March 30, 2016). "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. Retrieved September 30, 2016. 
^ Daly, Michael (August 2, 2000). "Powell's Old Nabe Boss a Big Backer". New York Daily News. Retrieved October 19, 2008. Powell explained that he had joined ROTC. He became an officer after graduation, leaving Sickser's with a smattering of Yiddish... 
^ "Former Secretary of State Gen. Colin Powell and Mario Cuomo, former governor of New York State, each a former Shabbos goy, both share fond recollections of their youth, when they were uniquely qualified to lend a Jewish neighbor a hand." Fertig, Avi. "Glatt Kosher Adventure To The Land Down Under", The Jewish Press, November 21, 2007.
^ a b "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. April 2, 2017. Education: City College of New York, B.S. in geology,1958; George Washington University, M.B.A.,1971; National War College, 1976 
^ "About Gen. Colin L. Powell, USA (Ret.)". The Colin Powell School for Civic and Global Leadership, The City College of New York. He attended New York City public schools and the City College of New York where he earned a B.S. in Geology. 
^ Schwab, Nikki (May 30, 2012). "Colin Powell: bad student". Washington Examiner. My cousins became lawyers and doctors and judges and I just sort of hung around," he recalled. "I had a straight C average all the way through high school and the City College of New York — I'm not sure how I got in. 
^ "Major Player: Gen. Colin L. Powell (Ret.)". Washington Post. July 28, 2000. Retrieved April 30, 2010. 
^ "Colin (Luther) Powell Biography (1937– )". The Biography Channel. A&E Television Networks. Retrieved May 31, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell Interview". achievement.org. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell (biography)". The White House. April 29, 2003. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b c "Colin Powell". CNN. 1996. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ Kearny, Cresson H. (1996). Jungle Snafus...And Remedies. Cave Junction, Oregon: Oregon Institute of Science & Medicine. p. 179. ISBN 978-1-884067-10-5. OCLC 41447083. 
^ Finlayson, Reggie (2003). Colin Powell. Biography (A & E). Twenty-First Century Books. p. 55. ISBN 9780822549666. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ "Interview on CNN's Larry King Live". New York: U.S. Department of State. May 4, 2004. Archived from the original on January 10, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brown, Warren; Wagner, Heather Lehr (1 Jan 2009). Colin Powell: Soldier and Statesman. Infobase Publishing. p. 41,43. 
^ "Online NewsHour: Colin Powell". Pbs.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "The 14 Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff". Joint History Office, U.S. Department of Defense. American Forces Press Service. August 10, 1999. Retrieved April 24, 2008. 
^ O'Sullivan, Christopher (2010). Colin Powell: A Political Biography. Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers. p. 100. ISBN 978-0-7425-5187-9. 
^ "Reluctant warrior", The Observer, September 30, 2001.
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (March 1991). "U.S. Sen. Kasten Pushing Effort To Award Powell With Historic Fifth Star". Jet. 79 (23). ISSN 0021-5996. Retrieved February 21, 2011. ...there is a movement afoot in the U.S. Senate to award an historic fifth star to the nation's first Black Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Colin L. Powell for his military proficiency. 
^ Italia, Bob (1991). Armed Forces: War in the Gulf. Abdo & Daughters. pp. 44–6. ISBN 978-1-56239-026-6. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Others want to make him a five-star general. [...] Congress is talking about giving him a fifth silver star, which is very rare. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (1999). All Too Human: A Political Education. Thorndike Press. pp. 330–1. ISBN 978-0-7862-2016-8. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Mack asked me to secretly research the procedure for awarding a fifth star to a general. [...] If Powell did challenge Clinton, the fifth star would forestall criticism of the general's military record. 
^ Hamilton, Nigel (2007). Bill Clinton: Mastering the Presidency. PublicAffairs. pp. 190, 399. ISBN 978-1-58648-516-0. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Moreover, for the very reason he admired Colin Powell as the most distinguished living black American, Clinton also feared the general as a potential rival. [...] Bill Clinton had denied Powell his rightful fifth star... 
^ Halberstam, David (2001). War in a Time of Peace: Bush, Clinton, and the Generals. Scribner. p. 190. ISBN 978-0-7432-0212-1. Retrieved February 22, 2011. They checked it out and found that the last general to get a fifth star was Omar Bradley forty-three years earlier. Powell, they decided, was not Bradley. Besides, as George Stephanopoulos noted, if they gave him one more star, it might help him one day politically. 
^ a b Clinton, W. J. (September 30, 1993). "Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia". University of California, Santa Barbara: The American Presidency Project. Retrieved September 18, 2016. In recognition of your legacy and service, of your courage and accomplishment, today, General Powell, I was honored to present you with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, with distinction. I want to tell all those here in attendance that this was the second Medal of Freedom you have received, the first from President Bush in 1991. And today, you became only the second American citizen in the history of the Republic to be the recipient of two Medals of Freedom. 
^ "Remarks With Bulgarian President Georgi Purvanov At Award Ceremony for the Stara Planina First Order Medal". Presidential Palace, Coat of Arms Hall, Sofia, Bulgaria: U.S. Department of State. December 7, 2004. 
^ "Parvanov-Powell". President of the Republic of Bulgaria. December 7, 2004. President Georgi Parvanov awarded US Secretary of State Colin Powell with the highest Bulgarian order "Stara Planina" for his extraordinary services to the advancement of Bulgarian-American relations and in connection with the 100th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between Bulgaria and the United States. 
^ Powell, Colin (2012). It Worked for Me. HarperCollins. pp. 3–4. ISBN 978-0-06-213512-4. 
^ McClimon, Tim (27 August 2012). "Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership". American Express. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ "Can we apply Colin Powell's 13 rules?" (PDF). Texas Child Care Quarterly. Summer 2012. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ Schram, Martin (January 21, 1995). "Don't Count Out Colin Powell". The Seattle Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Van Dyk, Ted (September 6, 1990). "Will Powell Run With Bush in '92?". The New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Lusane C. Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice: Foreign Policy, Race and the New American Century. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006, ISBN 0-275-98309-9, p. 46.
^ Apple, R. W. (October 28, 1995). "Life in Iowa May Not Have Changed, But the Political Turf Is Another Story". The New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Berke, Richard L. (October 19, 1995). "New Hampshire Poll Finds Powell With an Edge". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Clines, Francis X. (November 9, 1995). "The Powell Decision: The Announcement". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Plissner, Martin (February 7, 2007). "Ready for Obama Already". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ "NH US Vice President – R Primary Race". Our Campaigns. Feb 20, 1996. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Colin L. Powell Center for Public Policy". Retrieved 16 February 2013. 
^ "How Mccain Does It". 2000-03-06. Retrieved 2016-08-12. 
^ Kessler, Glenn (July 14, 2004). "Powell Flies in the Face of Tradition; The Secretary of State Is Least Traveled in 30 Years". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Warrick, Joby (April 12, 2006). "Lacking Biolabs, Trailers Carried Case for War; Administration Pushed Notion of Banned Iraqi Weapons Despite Evidence to Contrary". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Powell, Secretary Colin L. (February 5, 2003). "Remarks to the United Nations Security Council". New York City: U.S. Department of State. Archived from the original on January 9, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Lawless, Jill (February 7, 2003). "U.S. Scholar Uncredited in Iraq Report". Associated Press. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "UK accused of lifting dossier text". CNN. February 7, 2003. 
^ Charlie Rose. charlierose.com. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ Miller, Greg (July 15, 2004). "Flaws Cited in Powell's U.N. Speech on Iraq". Los Angeles Times. reprinted by CommonDreams.org. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b DeYoung, Karen (October 1, 2006). "Falling on His Sword: Colin Powell's most significant moment turned out to be his lowest". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell on Iraq, Race, and Hurricane Relief". ABC News: 20/20. September 8, 2005. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brancaccio, David (February 3, 2006). "Iraq Pre-War Intelligence". NOW. PBS. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Pincus, Walter (February 14, 2004). "Support for Intelligence Plan". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Remarks at the 2003 Groundhog Job Shadow Day Program, Secretary Colin L. Powell, Remarks and question and answer session with students, Washington, DC, January 31, 2003, excerpt on 1973 Chile coup, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell, Interview On Black Entertainment Television's Youth Town Hall, February 20, 2003, excerpt on 1973 U.S. covert action in Chile, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Sciolino, Elaine (November 18, 2004). "Exiles Add to Claims on Iran Nuclear Arms". New York Times. Retrieved February 8, 2007. 
^ Anderson, Cooper (December 31, 2004). "Transcripts: New Year's Eve Special". CNN. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ VandeHei, Jim; Robin Wright (April 22, 2005). "Powell Playing Quiet Role in Bolton Battle". Washington Post. 
^ Borger, Julian (April 23, 2005). "Powell's remarks harm Bolton's chances of UN job". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (April 28, 2005). "The good soldier's revenge". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Powell criticises storm response". BBC News. September 9, 2005. 
^ "Senators defy Bush on tribunals". BBC News. September 15, 2006. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Wilken, Dennis (September 7, 2008). "Down the Rabbit Hole". American Satellite Magazine. Retrieved October 10, 2008. 
^ "Board of Directors". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved December 6, 2007. 
^ "islanderspointblank.com". islanderspointblank.com. Archived from the original on July 13, 2011. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "nhl.com". nhl.com. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Powell, General Colin L, USA (Ret.) (July 8, 2008). "Keynote Address – A New Vision for America's Future: Young Leaders Shaping an International Agenda". CSIS Launch of Next America. Center for Strategic and International Studies. Archived from the original on July 31, 2008. Retrieved October 20, 2008. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ "Who Mentored Colin Powell?". President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2008. 
^ "Al Gore, Colin Powell, Caroline Kennedy in Obama's Administration? – Washington Whispers". usnews.com. November 11, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell advised against Afghan surge", Politico (September 27, 2009). http://www.politico.com/blogs/laurarozen/0909/Powell_advised_against_Afghan_surge.html
^ Ingrid Lunden. "General Colin Powell Joins Salesforce Board Of Directors, As CRM Giant Zeros In On Public Sector". TechCrunch. AOL. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ a b c Colin Powell's biography from 'On The Issues'.
^ DeYoung, Karen (February 3, 2010). "Colin Powell shifts stance on 'don't ask, don't tell' policy". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2010. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (November 18, 2004). "Colin and the crazies". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Sen. McCain Releases Letter from Gen. Colin Powell", Washington Post (September 14, 2006). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/graphic/2006/09/14/GR2006091400728.html
^ "Colin Powell: Republican Party Needs Me More Than The Democratic Party Needs Me". TheLonelyConservative.com. February 7, 2014. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ See Official website: Aspen Ideas Festival
^ "Conversation with Colin Powell" (PDF). Aspen Ideas Festival. July 2007. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell: Support for Obama doesn't mean Iraq war wrong", CNN (October 19, 2008). http://edition.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/10/19/powell.transcript/
^ James M. Klatell, "Powell: We Are Losing In Iraq", CBS (December 17, 2006). http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/12/17/ftn/main2274583.shtml
^ "Powell says Iraq surge should have come earlier", Seattle Times (July 5, 2009)
^ Henry, Ed (August 9, 2007). "Powell donates to McCain". CNN. Retrieved August 9, 2007. 
^ Holland, Steve (March 5, 2008). "McCain now has to pick a vice presidential nominee". Boston Globe. Reuters. Retrieved April 14, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell endorses Obama for president; Republican ex-Secretary of State calls Democrat 'transformational figure'". Meet the Press. MSNBC and NBC News. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ a b "Meet the Press' transcript for October 19, 2008". MSNBC. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Ohlemacher, Stephen (October 20, 2008). "Colin Powell endorses Barack Obama for president". USA Today. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell on Rush Limbaugh". CNN. July 16, 2010. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell airs doubts on Obama agenda". The Washington Times. July 3, 2009. Retrieved September 17, 2010. 
^ Carrie Budoff Brown, "Colin Powell critical of President Obama", Politico (September 19, 2010). http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0910/42381.html
^ "Video". CNN. 
^ [1] retrieved October 25, 2012.
^ "ABC News". Retrieved 2013-01-22. 
^ https://www.yahoo.com/news/colin-powell-slams-donald-trumps-immigration-plan-163454530.html. Colin Powell slams Donald Trump's immigration plan. October 1, 2015. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-gop-race_us_56dda980e4b0000de405301a Colin Powell: The GOP Race Has ‘Gone Into The Mud’. The Huffington Post. March 7, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.people.com/article/colin-powell-hillary-clinton-pinning-email-scandal-on-him Colin Powell Says Hillary Clinton's 'People Have Been Trying to Pin' Email Scandal on Him. People Magazine. August 21, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/09/13/colin-powell-hacked-emails/90341788/
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-hillary-clinton_us_57d96524e4b09d7a6880bf1c Colin Powell Attacked Hillary Clinton’s ‘Hubris’ In Leaked Emails. The Huffington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14th, 2016.
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/09/14/here-are-the-juiciest-colin-powell-comments-about-trump-and-clinton-from-his-leaked-emails/ Here are the juiciest Colin Powell comments about Trump and Clinton from his hacked emails. The Washington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ Colin Powell joins 67 Republican politicians, donors and officials who are supporting Hillary Clinton October 25, 2016
^ Four Washington electors break ranks and don’t vote for Clinton
^ Powell, Colin (October 17, 2005). "Interview transcript". Larry King Live (Interview). Interview with Larry King. CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Powell, Colin (August 2, 2004). "A Conversation with Colin Powell". The Atlantic (Interview). Interview with P. J. O'Rourke. Washington, D.C. Archived from the original on February 4, 2013. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Colin Powell insists ‘there was no affair then and there is not one now’ with diplomat. NY Daily News. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ National Winners | public service awards. Jefferson Awards.org. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ "Spingarn Medal Winners: 1915 to Today". naacp.org. Archived from the original on May 5, 2014. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Colin L. Powell". The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans. n.d. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "The Ronald Reagan Freedom Award". Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation & Library. Archived from the original on October 16, 2006. 
^ Powell, Colin (July 4, 2002). "2002 Liberty Medal Acceptance Speech". Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: National Constitution Center. 
^ "GEN Colin Powell". 2016-03-08. Retrieved 2017-07-01. 
^ Asante, Molefi Kete (2002). 100 Greatest African Americans: A Biographical Encyclopedia. Amherst, New York. Prometheus Books. ISBN 1-57392-963-8.
^ According to the Fort Bliss Bugle, as of 10/24/2013, nine schools have been named for Colin Powell.
^ ":.: The Official Wings Of Hope Homepage :.:". Wings-of-hope.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ efworld
^ "Powell: Friendship with Israel means friendship with Arabs" (PDF). afhu.org. 
^ McDonald, Terrence T. (February 8, 2013). "Gov. Christie visits Union City school opening, hears Democratic mayor praise him". NJ.com.
^ Wenik, Ian (June 9, 2013). "Saluting the general". The Union City Reporter. pp. 1 and 11.
^ "High Point University National Board of Advisors". 


Further reading

LaFeber, Walter, "The Rise and Fall of Colin Powell and the Powell Doctrine", Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Spring 2009), 71–93.
Powell, Colin A. and Joseph Persico, My American Journey, Ballantine Books, 1995. ISBN 0-345-40728-8.
Excerpts from My American Journey, TIME, September 18, 1995.
DeYoung, Karen, Soldier: The Life of Colin Powell, Alfred A. Knopf, 2006. ISBN 1-4000-4170-8.
"Alex Haley's Other Roots: African-Americans with Irish Ancestors". February 25, 2006. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
Powell, Colin; Koltz, Tony (2012). It Worked for Me: Lessons in Leadership and Life. Harper. ISBN 978-0062135124. 

External links

Find more aboutColin Powellat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Appearances on C-SPAN
Colin Powell on Charlie Rose
Colin Powell on IMDb
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The New York Times. 
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The Guardian.  
Works by or about Colin Powell in libraries (WorldCat catalog)
Colin Powell: America's Best Leaders from U.S. News & World Report
Issue positions and quotes at On the Issues
Colin Powell Quotes
African Americans in the U.S. Army
The American Presidency Project: Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia, September 30, 1993
Address to the National Summit on Africa, Washington, D.C., February 2000
Remarks to the United Nations Security Council, February 5, 2003
Complete text, audio, video of Colin Powell's Remarks to the UN Security Council AmericanRhetoric.com
"Curveball" Revelations Indicate falsified info used to start Iraq war and esp used for Powell's UN presentation on Iraq WMDs, November 5, 2007
Colin Powell demands answers over Curveball's WMD lies, Ed Pikington, Helen Pidd and Martin Chulov, The Guardian, February 16, 2011
WARGS: Ancestry of Gen. Colin Powell



Political offices


Preceded by
Peter Rodman
Deputy National Security Advisor
1987
Succeeded by
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci
National Security Advisor
1987–1989
Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright
United States Secretary of State
2001–2005
Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


Military offices


Preceded by
William Crowe
Chair of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
1989–1993
Succeeded by
David Jeremiah
Acting


Awards and achievements


Preceded by
Mikhail Gorbachev
Recipient of the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award
1993
Succeeded by
Yitzhak Rabin


Party political offices


Preceded by
Susan Molinari
Keynote Speaker of the Republican National Convention
2000
Served alongside: John McCain
Succeeded by
Zell Miller








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Cabinet of President George W. Bush (2001–09)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Colin Powell (2001–05)
Condoleezza Rice (2005–09)








Secretary of the Treasury



Paul H. O'Neill (2001–02)
John W. Snow (2003–06)
Henry Paulson (2006–09)





Secretary of Defense



Donald Rumsfeld (2001–06)
Robert Gates (2006–09)





Attorney General



John Ashcroft (2001–05)
Alberto Gonzales (2005–07)
Michael Mukasey (2007–09)





Secretary of the Interior



Gale Norton (2001–06)
Dirk Kempthorne (2006–09)





Secretary of Agriculture



Ann Veneman (2001–05)
Mike Johanns (2005–07)
Ed Schafer (2008–09)





Secretary of Commerce



Donald Evans (2001–05)
Carlos Gutierrez (2005–09)





Secretary of Labor



Elaine Chao (2001–09)





Secretary of Health and
Human Services



Tommy Thompson (2001–05)
Mike Leavitt (2005–09)





Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development



Mel Martinez (2001–03)
Alphonso Jackson (2003–08)
Steve Preston (2008–09)





Secretary of Transportation



Norman Mineta (2001–06)
Mary E. Peters (2006–09)





Secretary of Energy



Spencer Abraham (2001–05)
Samuel Bodman (2005–09)





Secretary of Education



Rod Paige (2001–05)
Margaret Spellings (2005–09)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Anthony Principi (2001–05)
Jim Nicholson (2005–07)
James Peake (2007–09)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Tom Ridge (2003–05)
Michael Chertoff (2005–09)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Dick Cheney (2001–09)





White House Chief of Staff



Andrew Card (2001–06)
Joshua Bolten (2006–09)





Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency



Christine Todd Whitman (2001–03)
Mike Leavitt (2003–05)
Stephen L. Johnson (2005–09)





Director of the Office of
Management and Budget



Mitch Daniels (2001–03)
Joshua Bolten (2003–06)
Rob Portman (2006–07)
Jim Nussle (2007–09)





Director of National Drug
Control Policy



John P. Walters (2001–09)





Trade Representative



Robert Zoellick (2001–05)
Rob Portman (2005–06)
Susan Schwab (2006–09)













Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff









Bradley
Radford
Twining
Lemnitzer
Taylor
Wheeler
Moorer
Brown
Jones
Vessey
Crowe
Powell
Jeremiah (acting)
Shalikashvili
Shelton
Myers
Pace
Mullen
Dempsey
Dunford















v
t
e


Assistants to the President for National Security Affairs






Cutler
Anderson
Jackson
Cutler
Gray
Bundy
Rostow
Kissinger
Scowcroft
Brzezinski
Allen
Clark
McFarlane
Poindexter
Carlucci
Powell
Scowcroft
Lake
Berger
C. Rice
Hadley
Jones
Donilon
S. Rice
Flynn
Kellogg (acting)
McMaster















v
t
e


Recipients of the Soldier's Medal






Marty Allen
Glenn Andreotta
Clift Andrus
Aaron Bank
James Leroy Bondsteel
Leonard Boswell
Allison Brooks
William Francis Buckley
Max Cleland
Lawrence Colburn
John Thomas Corley
Wayne A. Downing
Theodore Leslie Futch
John Galvin
Elmer Gedeon
Carl Genian
Hershel W. Gober
John F. Goodman
David E. Grange Jr.
Ed Grady
Edith Ellen Greenwood
Francis Grevemberg
Bo Gritz
William W. Hartzog
Mike Hayden
Anthony Herbert
Patrick J. Hessian
Don Holleder
Bob Hoover
Eli D. Hoyle
Otto Kerner Jr.
Darwin K. Kyle
Richard L. Lawson
Reis Leming
Charles Andrew MacGillivary
William A. Matheny
Charles J. McDonnell
Jack N. Merritt
Leo J. Meyer
Henry Mucci
José Antonio Muñiz
Thomas Alexander Parrott
Frank D. Peregory
Colin Powell
Edwin W. Rawlings
Richard Scholtes
Preston Schoyer
Stephen Silvasy Jr.
John K. Singlaub
Alek Skarlatos
Christopher Speer
Donn A. Starry
Joseph Warren Stilwell Jr.
Thomas Tackaberry
Hugh Thompson Jr.
Clarence L. Tinker
Alfred Valenzuela
Leon L. Van Autreve
David Wade
Ron Welch
Samuel Tankersley Williams
Walter K. Wilson Jr.






Names are in alphabetical order







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 79113153
LCCN: n87926095
ISNI: 0000 0001 0858 8433
GND: 119077817
SUDOC: 073950408
BNF: cb12496187m (data)
NDL: 00515602
NKC: jo2003163174
IATH: w68g9rsz










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Colin_Powell&oldid=790924136"					
Categories: 1937 birthsLiving people21st-century American politicians21st-century American writersAfrican-American diplomatsAfrican-American members of the Cabinet of the United StatesAfrican-American military personnelAfrican-American politiciansAfrican-American writersAmerican EpiscopaliansAmerican male writersAmerican memoiristsAmerican military personnel of the Gulf WarAmerican military personnel of the Vietnam WarAmerican people of Jamaican descentAmerican people of Scottish descentAmerican political writersAmerican politicians of Jamaican descentChairmen of the Joint Chiefs of StaffCity College of New York alumniCongressional Gold Medal recipientsFellows of the United States National Academy of Public AdministrationGeorge W. Bush administration cabinet membersGeorge Washington University School of Business alumniHonorary Knights Commander of the Order of the BathIraq and weapons of mass destructionKleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers peopleLégion d'honneur recipientsMilitary leaders of the Gulf WarMilitary personnel from New York CityMy Lai MassacreNational War College alumniNew York RepublicansPeople from HarlemPeople from the BronxPeople from McLean, VirginiaPershing RiflemenPolitical realistsPresidential Citizens Medal recipientsPresidential Medal of Freedom recipientsReagan administration personnelRecipients of the Air MedalRecipients of the Defense Distinguished Service MedalRecipients of the Defense Superior Service MedalRecipients of the Distinguished Service Medal (US Army)Recipients of the Legion of MeritRecipients of the Order of Saint MauriceRecipients of the Order of Skanderbeg (1990–)Recipients of the Order of Stara PlaninaRecipients of the Soldier's MedalSpingarn Medal winnersUnited States Army Command and General Staff College alumniUnited States Army Command and General Staff College facultyUnited States Army generalsUnited States National Security AdvisorsUnited States Secretaries of StateWhite House FellowsWriters from New York CityHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listWikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleUse mdy dates from March 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from October 2011Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიLatviešuLietuviųमराठीმარგალურიBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng ViệtYorùbá中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 00:21.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          










Colin Powell - Wikipedia




















 







Colin Powell

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the American politician. For the British soccer player, see Colin Powell (footballer).


Colin Powell








65th United States Secretary of State


In office
January 20, 2001 – January 26, 2005


President
George W. Bush


Deputy
Richard Armitage


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright


Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff


In office
October 1, 1989 – September 30, 1993


President
George H. W. Bush
Bill Clinton


Deputy
Robert Herres
David Jeremiah


Preceded by
William Crowe


Succeeded by
David Jeremiah (Acting)


16th National Security Advisor


In office
November 23, 1987 – January 20, 1989


President
Ronald Reagan


Deputy
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci


Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft





Personal details


Born
Colin Luther Powell
(1937-04-05) April 5, 1937 (age 80)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Alma Johnson (m. 1962)


Education
City University of New York, City College (BS)
George Washington University (MBA)


Signature



Military service


Allegiance
 United States


Service/branch
 United States Army


Years of service
1958–1993


Rank
 General


Unit
 3rd Armored Division
  23rd Infantry Division


Commands
 V Corps
 Joint Chiefs of Staff
  Army Forces Command


Battles/wars
Vietnam War
Invasion of Panama
Persian Gulf War


Colin Luther Powell (/ˈkoʊlᵻn/; born April 5, 1937)[1] is an American statesman and a retired four-star general in the United States Army.[2] Powell was born in Harlem as the son of Jamaican immigrants. During his military career, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989), as Commander of the U.S. Army Forces Command (1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Persian Gulf War. Powell was the first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State, serving under U.S. President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2005, the first African American to serve in that position.[3][4][5][6]
Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and was raised in the South Bronx. His parents, Luther and Maud Powell, immigrated to the United States from Jamaica. Powell was educated in the New York City public schools, graduating from the City College of New York (CCNY), where he earned a bachelor's degree in geology. He also participated in ROTC at CCNY and received a commission as an Army second lieutenant upon graduation in June 1958. His further academic achievements include a Master of Business Administration degree from George Washington University.[7]
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, during which time he held myriad command and staff positions and rose to the rank of 4-star General. His last assignment, from October 1, 1989 to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. He also formulated the Powell Doctrine.[7]
Following his military retirement, Powell wrote his best-selling autobiography, My American Journey. In addition, he pursued a career as a public speaker, addressing audiences across the country and abroad. Prior to his appointment as Secretary of State, Powell was the chairman of America's Promise - The Alliance for Youth, a national nonprofit organization dedicated to mobilizing people from every sector of American life to build the character and competence of young people. He was nominated by President Bush on December 16, 2000 as Secretary of State. After being unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate, he was sworn in as the 65th Secretary of State on January 20, 2001.[7]
Powell is the recipient of numerous U.S. and foreign military awards and decorations. Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medal of Freedom, the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, and the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country. Powell is married to the former Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama. The Powell family includes son Michael (ex-chairman of the Federal Communications Commission); daughters Linda and Anne; daughter-in-law Jane; and grandsons Jeffrey and Bryan.[7]
In 2016, while not a candidate for that year's election, Powell received three electoral votes for the office of President of the United States.



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Military career

2.1 Training
2.2 Vietnam War
2.3 After the Vietnam War
2.4 A "political general"
2.5 Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
2.6 Dates of rank
2.7 Awards and decorations

2.7.1 Badges
2.7.2 Medals and ribbons
2.7.3 Foreign decorations


2.8 13 Rules of Leadership


3 Potential presidential candidate
4 Secretary of State
5 Life after diplomatic service
6 Political views

6.1 Views on the Iraq War
6.2 Role in presidential election of 2008
6.3 Views on the Obama administration
6.4 2016 presidential election


7 Personal life
8 Civilian awards and honors
9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Early life and education
Powell was born on April 5, 1937,[8] in Harlem, a neighborhood in the New York City borough of Manhattan, to Jamaican immigrant parents Maud Arial (née McKoy) and Luther Theophilus Powell. His parents were both of mixed African and Scots ancestry.[9][10] Luther worked as a shipping clerk and Maud as a seamstress.[11] Powell was raised in the South Bronx and attended Morris High School, from which he graduated in 1954. (This school has since closed.)
While at school, Powell worked at a local baby furniture store, where he picked up Yiddish from the eastern European Jewish shopkeepers and some of the customers.[12] He also served as a Shabbos goy, helping Orthodox families with needed tasks on the Sabbath.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Geology from the City College of New York in 1958[14][15] and has said he was a 'C average' student.[16] He later earned an MBA degree from the George Washington University in 1971,[14] after his second tour in Vietnam.
Despite his parents' pronunciation of his name as /ˈkɒlᵻn/, Powell has pronounced his name /ˈkoʊlᵻn/ since childhood, after the heroic World War II flyer Colin P. Kelly Jr.[17] Public officials and radio and television reporters have used Powell's preferred pronunciation.
Military career
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, holding a variety of command and staff positions and rising to the rank of General.[18]
Training
Powell described joining the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) during college as one of the happiest experiences of his life; discovering something he loved and could do well, he felt he had "found himself." According to Powell:

It was only once I was in college, about six months into college when I found something that I liked, and that was ROTC, Reserve Officer Training Corps in the military. And I not only liked it, but I was pretty good at it. That's what you really have to look for in life, something that you like, and something that you think you're pretty good at. And if you can put those two things together, then you're on the right track, and just drive on.[19]

Cadet Powell joined the Pershing Rifles, the ROTC fraternal organization and drill team begun by General John Pershing. Even after he had become a general, Powell kept on his desk a pen set he had won for a drill team competition.
Upon graduation, he received a commission as an Army second lieutenant.[20] After attending basic training at Fort Benning, Powell was assigned to the 48th Infantry, in West Germany, as a platoon leader.[21]
Vietnam War
In his autobiography, Powell said he is haunted by the nightmare of the Vietnam War and felt that the leadership was very ineffective.
Captain Powell served a tour in Vietnam as a South Vietnamese Army (ARVN) advisor from 1962 to 1963. While on patrol in a Viet Cong-held area, he was wounded by stepping on a punji stake.[22] The large infection made it difficult for him to walk, and caused his foot to swell for a short time, shortening his first tour.
He returned to Vietnam as a major in 1968, serving in the 23rd Infantry Division, then as assistant chief of staff of operations for the Americal Division. During the second tour in Vietnam he was decorated for bravery after he survived a helicopter crash, single-handedly rescuing three others, including division commander Major General Charles Martin Gettys, from the burning wreckage.[21][23]
Powell was charged with investigating a detailed letter by 11th Light Infantry Brigade soldier Tom Glen, which backed up rumored allegations of the My Lai Massacre. He wrote: "In direct refutation of this portrayal is the fact that relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are excellent." Later, Powell's assessment would be described as whitewashing the news of the massacre, and questions would continue to remain undisclosed to the public. In May 2004 Powell said to television and radio host Larry King, "I was in a unit that was responsible for My Lai. I got there after My Lai happened. So, in war, these sorts of horrible things happen every now and again, but they are still to be deplored."[24]




Powell in April 1989, as the Commanding General of FORSCOM.


After the Vietnam War
Powell served a White House Fellowship under President Richard Nixon from 1972 to 1973. During 1975–1976 he attended the National War College, Washington, D.C.[25]
In his autobiography, My American Journey, Powell named several officers he served under who inspired and mentored him. As a lieutenant colonel serving in South Korea, Powell was very close to General Henry "Gunfighter" Emerson. Powell said he regarded Emerson as one of the most caring officers he ever met. Emerson insisted his troops train at night to fight a possible North Korean attack, and made them repeatedly watch the television film Brian's Song to promote racial harmony. Powell always professed that what set Emerson apart was his great love of his soldiers and concern for their welfare. After a race riot occurred, in which African American soldiers almost killed a Caucasian officer, Powell was charged by Emerson to crack down on black militants; Powell's efforts led to the discharge of one soldier, and other efforts to reduce racial tensions.[21]
A "political general"
In the early 1980s, Powell served at Fort Carson, Colorado. After he left Fort Carson, Powell became senior military assistant to Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, whom he assisted during the 1983 invasion of Grenada and the 1986 airstrike on Libya.




President Ronald Reagan and National Security Advisor Powell in 1988


In 1986, Powell took over the command of V Corps in Frankfurt, Germany, from Robert Lewis "Sam" Wetzel.
Following the Iran Contra scandal, Powell became, at the age of 49, Ronald Reagan's National Security Advisor, serving from 1987 to 1989 while retaining his Army commission as a lieutenant general.
In April 1989, after his tenure with the National Security Council, Powell was promoted to four-star general under President George H. W. Bush and briefly served as the Commander in Chief, Forces Command (FORSCOM), headquartered at Fort McPherson, Georgia, overseeing all Army, Army Reserve, and National Guard units in the Continental U.S., Alaska, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico. He became the third general since World War II to reach four-star rank without ever serving as a division commander, joining Dwight D. Eisenhower and Alexander Haig.
Later that year, President George H. W. Bush selected him as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.[26]
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff




Powell in November 1989, on his official Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff portrait.


Powell's last military assignment, from October 1, 1989, to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. At age 52, he became the youngest officer, and first Afro-Caribbean American, to serve in this position. Powell was also the first JCS Chair who received his commission through ROTC.[27]
During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including the invasion of Panama in 1989 to remove General Manuel Noriega from power and Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. During these events, Powell earned his nickname, "the reluctant warrior." He rarely advocated military intervention as the first solution to an international crisis, and instead usually prescribed diplomacy and containment.




General Colin Powell, Chairman, Joint Chiefs of Staff, waves from his motorcade during the Persian Gulf War Welcome Home Parade in New York City.


As a military strategist, Powell advocated an approach to military conflicts that maximizes the potential for success and minimizes casualties. A component of this approach is the use of overwhelming force, which he applied to Operation Desert Storm in 1991. His approach has been dubbed the "Powell Doctrine". Powell continued as chairman of the JCS into the Clinton presidency but as a dedicated "realist" he considered himself a bad fit for an administration largely made up of liberal internationalists.[28] He clashed with then-U.S. ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright over the Bosnian crisis, as he opposed any military interventions that didn't involve US interests.[29]
During his chairmanship of the JCS, there was discussion of awarding Powell a fifth star, granting him the rank of General of the Army. But even in the wake of public and Congressional pressure[30][31] to do so, Clinton-Gore presidential transition team staffers decided against it.[32][33][34]
Dates of rank

Promotions

Rank
Date


 General
April 4, 1989


 Lieutenant general
March 26, 1986


 Major general
August 1, 1983


 Brigadier general
June 1, 1979


 Colonel
February 1, 1976


 Lieutenant colonel
July 9, 1970


 Major
May 24, 1966


 Captain
June 2, 1962


 First lieutenant
December 30, 1959


 Second lieutenant
June 9, 1958


Awards and decorations
Badges







Combat Infantryman Badge









Expert Infantryman Badge









Ranger Tab









Parachutist Badge









Pathfinder Badge









Air Assault Badge









Presidential Service Badge









Secretary of Defense Identification Badge









Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge









Army Staff Identification Badge




Medals and ribbons











Defense Distinguished Service Medal with three oak leaf clusters









Distinguished Service Medal, Army with oak leaf cluster



Defense Superior Service Medal









Legion of Merit with oak leaf cluster



Soldier's Medal



Bronze Star



Purple Heart



Air Medal



Joint Service Commendation Medal










Army Commendation Medal with two oak leaf clusters



Presidential Medal of Freedom with Distinction (1993)[35]



Presidential Medal of Freedom (1991)



Presidential Citizens Medal









National Defense Service Medal with bronze service star









Vietnam Service Medal with silver service star



Army Service Ribbon



Army Overseas Service Ribbon with award numeral 4


Foreign decorations



Skanderbeg's Order (Albania)



Honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) (United Kingdom)



Légion d'honneur, Grand Cross (France)



Meritorious Service Cross (M.S.C.) (Canada)



Order of Stara Planina in the First Order (Bulgaria)[36][37]



Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation



Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal


13 Rules of Leadership
First printed in the August 13, 1989 issue of Parade magazine,[38] these are Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership.[39][40]

It ain't as bad as you think.
Get mad, then get over it.
Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.
It can be done.
Be careful what you choose. You may get it.
Don't let adverse facts stand in the way of a good decision.
You can't make someone else's choices.
Check small things.
Share credit.
Remain calm. Be kind.
Have a vision.
Don't take counsel of your fears or naysayers.
Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.

Potential presidential candidate
Powell's experience in military matters made him a very popular figure with both American political parties. Many Democrats admired his moderate stance on military matters, while many Republicans saw him as a great asset associated with the successes of past Republican administrations. Put forth as a potential Democratic Vice Presidential nominee in the 1992 U.S. presidential election[41] or even potentially replacing Vice President Dan Quayle as the Republican Vice Presidential nominee,[42] Powell eventually declared himself a Republican and began to campaign for Republican candidates in 1995.[43] He was touted as a possible opponent of Bill Clinton in the 1996 U.S. presidential election, possibly capitalizing on a split conservative vote in Iowa[44] and even leading New Hampshire polls for the GOP nomination,[45] but Powell declined, citing a lack of passion for politics.[46] Powell defeated Clinton 50–38 in a hypothetical match-up proposed to voters in the exit polls conducted on Election Day.[47] Despite not standing in the race, Powell won the Republican New Hampshire Vice-Presidential primary on write-in votes.[48]
In 1997 Powell founded America's Promise with the objective of helping children from all socioeconomic sectors. That same year saw the establishment of The Colin L. Powell Center for Leadership and Service. The mission of the Center is to "prepare new generations of publicly engaged leaders from populations previously underrepresented in public service and policy circles, to build a strong culture of civic engagement at City College, and to mobilize campus resources to meet pressing community needs and serve the public good." [49]
Powell was mentioned as a potential candidate in the 2000 U.S. presidential election, but decided against running.[50] Once Texas Governor George W. Bush secured the Republican nomination, Powell endorsed him for president and spoke at the 2000 Republican National Convention. Bush eventually won, and Powell was appointed Secretary of State.
In the electoral college vote count of 2016, Powell received three votes from faithless electors from Washington.
Secretary of State




Powell, National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice and Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld listen to President George W. Bush speak.


As Secretary of State in the Bush administration, Powell was perceived as moderate. Powell was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate. Over the course of his tenure he traveled less than any other U.S. Secretary of State in 30 years. [51]
On September 11, 2001, Powell was in Lima, Peru, meeting with President Alejandro Toledo and US Ambassador John Hamilton, and attending the special session of the OAS General Assembly that subsequently adopted the Inter-American Democratic Charter. After the September 11 attacks, Powell's job became of critical importance in managing America's relationships with foreign countries in order to secure a stable coalition in the War on Terrorism.
Powell came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 Invasion of Iraq. In a press statement on February 24, 2001, he had said that sanctions against Iraq had prevented the development of any weapons of mass destruction by Saddam Hussein. As was the case in the days leading up to the Persian Gulf War, Powell was initially opposed to a forcible overthrow of Saddam, preferring to continue a policy of containment. However, Powell eventually agreed to go along with the Bush administration's determination to remove Saddam. He had often clashed with others in the administration, who were reportedly planning an Iraq invasion even before the September 11 attacks, an insight supported by testimony by former terrorism czar Richard Clarke in front of the 9/11 Commission. The main concession Powell wanted before he would offer his full support for the Iraq War was the involvement of the international community in the invasion, as opposed to a unilateral approach. He was also successful in persuading Bush to take the case of Iraq to the United Nations, and in moderating other initiatives. Powell was placed at the forefront of this diplomatic campaign.




Computer-generated image of an alleged mobile production facility for biological weapons, presented by Powell at the UN Security Council. On May 27, 2003, US and UK experts examined the trailers and declared they had nothing to do with biological weapons.[52]






Powell holding a model vial of anthrax while giving a presentation to the United Nations Security Council in February 2003.


Powell's chief role was to garner international support for a multi-national coalition to mount the invasion. To this end, Powell addressed a plenary session of the United Nations Security Council on February 5, 2003, to argue in favor of military action. Citing numerous anonymous Iraqi defectors, Powell asserted that "there can be no doubt that Saddam Hussein has biological weapons and the capability to rapidly produce more, many more." Powell also stated that there was "no doubt in my mind" that Saddam was working to obtain key components to produce nuclear weapons.[53]
Most observers praised Powell's oratorical skills. However, Britain's Channel 4 News reported soon afterwards that a UK intelligence dossier that Powell had referred to as a "fine paper" during his presentation had been based on old material and plagiarized an essay by American graduate student Ibrahim al-Marashi.[54][55] A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
In an interview with Charlie Rose, Powell contended that prior to his UN presentation, he had merely four days to review the data concerning WMD in Iraq.[56]
A Senate report on intelligence failures would later detail the intense debate that went on behind the scenes on what to include in Powell's speech. State Department analysts had found dozens of factual problems in drafts of the speech. Some of the claims were taken out, but others were left in, such as claims based on the yellowcake forgery.[57] The administration came under fire for having acted on faulty intelligence, particularly what was single-sourced to the informant known as Curveball. Powell later recounted how Vice President Dick Cheney had joked with him before he gave the speech, telling him, "You've got high poll ratings; you can afford to lose a few points." Powell's longtime aide-de-camp and Chief of Staff from 1989–2003, Colonel Lawrence Wilkerson, later characterized Cheney's view of Powell's mission as to "go up there and sell it, and we'll have moved forward a peg or two. Fall on your damn sword and kill yourself, and I'll be happy, too."[58]
In September 2005, Powell was asked about the speech during an interview with Barbara Walters and responded that it was a "blot" on his record. He went on to say, "It will always be a part of my record. It was painful. It's painful now."[59]
Wilkerson said that he inadvertently participated in a hoax on the American people in preparing Powell's erroneous testimony before the United Nations Security Council.[60]
Because Powell was seen as more moderate than most figures in the administration, he was spared many of the attacks that have been leveled at more controversial advocates of the invasion, such as Donald Rumsfeld and Paul Wolfowitz. At times, infighting among the Powell-led State Department, the Rumsfeld-led Defense Department, and Cheney's office had the effect of polarizing the administration on crucial issues, such as what actions to take regarding Iran and North Korea.




Secretary Powell with NATO Secretary General Jaap de Hoop Scheffer


After Saddam Hussein had been deposed, Powell's new role was to once again establish a working international coalition, this time to assist in the rebuilding of post-war Iraq. On September 13, 2004, Powell testified before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee,[61] acknowledging that the sources who provided much of the information in his February 2003 UN presentation were "wrong" and that it was "unlikely" that any stockpiles of WMDs would be found. Claiming that he was unaware that some intelligence officials questioned the information prior to his presentation, Powell pushed for reform in the intelligence community, including the creation of a national intelligence director who would assure that "what one person knew, everyone else knew."
Additionally, Powell has been critical of other instances of U.S. foreign policy in the past, such as its support for the 1973 Chilean coup d'état. From two separate interviews in 2003, Powell stated in one about the 1973 event "I can't justify or explain the actions and decisions that were made at that time. It was a different time. There was a great deal of concern about communism in this part of the world. Communism was a threat to the democracies in this part of the world. It was a threat to the United States."[62] In another interview, however, he also simply stated "With respect to your earlier comment about Chile in the 1970s and what happened with Mr. Allende, it is not a part of American history that we're proud of."[63]
Powell announced his resignation as Secretary of State on November 15, 2004. According to The Washington Post, he had been asked to resign by the president's chief of staff, Andrew Card.[58] Powell announced that he would stay on until the end of Bush's first term or until his replacement's confirmation by Congress. The following day, Bush nominated National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice as Powell's successor. News of Powell's leaving the Administration spurred mixed reactions from politicians around the world — some upset at the loss of a statesman seen as a moderating factor within the Bush administration, but others hoping for Powell's successor to wield more influence within the cabinet.
In mid-November, Powell stated that he had seen new evidence suggesting that Iran was adapting missiles for a nuclear delivery system.[64] The accusation came at the same time as the settlement of an agreement between Iran, the IAEA, and the European Union.
On December 31, 2004, Powell rang in the New Year by pressing a button in Times Square with New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg to initiate the ball drop and 60 second countdown, ushering in the year 2005. He appeared on the networks that were broadcasting New Year's Eve specials and talked about this honor, as well as being a native of New York City.[65]
Life after diplomatic service
After retiring from the role of Secretary of State, Powell returned to private life. In April 2005, he was privately telephoned by Republican senators Lincoln Chafee and Chuck Hagel,[66] at which time Powell expressed reservations and mixed reviews about the nomination of John R. Bolton as ambassador to the United Nations, but refrained from advising the senators to oppose Bolton (Powell had clashed with Bolton during Bush's first term).[67] The decision was viewed as potentially dealing significant damage to Bolton's chances of confirmation. Bolton was put into the position via a recess appointment because of the strong opposition in the Senate.




Powell with Ban Ki-moon, 2004.


On April 28, 2005, an opinion piece in The Guardian by Sidney Blumenthal (a former top aide to President Bill Clinton) claimed that Powell was in fact "conducting a campaign" against Bolton because of the acrimonious battles they had had while working together, which among other things had resulted in Powell cutting Bolton out of talks with Iran and Libya after complaints about Bolton's involvement from the British. Blumenthal added that "The foreign relations committee has discovered that Bolton made a highly unusual request and gained access to 10 intercepts by the National Security Agency. Staff members on the committee believe that Bolton was probably spying on Powell, his senior advisors and other officials reporting to him on diplomatic initiatives that Bolton opposed."[68]
In July 2005, Powell joined Kleiner, Perkins, Caufield & Byers, a well-known Silicon Valley venture capital firm, with the title of "strategic limited partner."
In September 2005, Powell criticized the response to Hurricane Katrina.[69] Powell said that thousands of people were not properly protected, but because they were poor rather than because they were black.




Powell walks with newly crowned King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Vice President Dick Cheney, and former President George H. W. Bush, Saudi Arabia, August 2005.


On January 5, 2006, he participated in a meeting at the White House of former Secretaries of Defense and State to discuss United States foreign policy with Bush administration officials. In September 2006, Powell sided with more moderate Senate Republicans in supporting more rights for detainees and opposing President Bush's terrorism bill. He backed Senators John Warner, John McCain and Lindsey Graham in their statement that U.S. military and intelligence personnel in future wars will suffer for abuses committed in 2006 by the U.S. in the name of fighting terrorism. Powell stated that "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of [America's] fight against terrorism."[70]
Also in 2006, Powell began appearing as a speaker at a series of motivational events called Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani. In his speeches for the tour, he openly criticized the Bush Administration on a number of issues. Powell has been the recipient of mild criticism for his role with Get Motivated which has been called a "get-rich-quick-without-much-effort, feel-good schemology."[71]
In 2007 he joined the Board of Directors of Steve Case's new company Revolution Health. Powell also serves on the Council on Foreign Relations Board of directors.[72]
Powell, in honor of Martin Luther King Day, dropped the ceremonial first puck at a New York Islanders ice hockey game at Nassau Coliseum on January 21, 2008. On November 11, 2008, Powell again dropped the puck in recognition of Military Appreciation Day and Veterans Day.[73][74]
Recently, Powell has encouraged young people to continue to use new technologies to their advantage in the future. In a speech at the Center for Strategic and International Studies to a room of young professionals, he said, "That's your generation...a generation that is hard-wired digital, a generation that understands the power of the information revolution and how it is transforming the world. A generation that you represent, and you're coming together to share; to debate; to decide; to connect with each other."[75] At this event, he encouraged the next generation to involve themselves politically on the upcoming Next America Project, which uses online debate to provide policy recommendations for the upcoming administration.
In 2008, Powell served as a spokesperson for National Mentoring Month, a campaign held each January to recruit volunteer mentors for at-risk youth.[76]
Soon after Barack Obama's 2008 election, Powell began being mentioned as a possible cabinet member.[77] He was not nominated.
In September 2009, Powell advised President Obama against surging US forces in Afghanistan.[78] The president announced the surge the following December.
On March 14, 2014, Salesforce.com announced that Powell had joined its Board of Directors.[79]
Political views
A liberal Republican, Powell is well known for his willingness to support liberal or centrist causes.[80] He is pro-choice regarding abortion, and in favor of "reasonable" gun control.[80][clarification needed] He stated in his autobiography that he supports affirmative action that levels the playing field, without giving a leg up to undeserving persons because of racial issues. Powell was also instrumental in the 1993 implementation of the military's don't ask, don't tell policy,[80] though he later supported its repeal as proposed by Robert Gates and Admiral Mike Mullen in January 2010, saying "circumstances had changed".[81]

External video

 Booknotes interview with Powell on My American Journey, January 7, 1996, C-SPAN


The Vietnam War had a profound effect on Powell's views of the proper use of military force. These views are described in detail in the autobiography My American Journey. The Powell Doctrine, as the views became known, was a central component of U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf War (the first U.S. war in Iraq) and U.S. invasion of Afghanistan (the overthrow of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan following the September 11 attacks). The hallmark of both operations was strong international cooperation, and the use of overwhelming military force.
Powell was the subject of controversy in 2004 when, in a conversation with British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, he reportedly referred to neoconservatives within the Bush administration as "fucking crazies."[82] In addition to being reported in the press (although the expletive was generally censored in the U.S. press), the quotation was used by James Naughtie in his book, The Accidental American: Tony Blair and the Presidency, and by Chris Patten in his book, Cousins and Strangers: America, Britain, and Europe in a New Century.
In a September 2006 letter to Sen. John McCain, General Powell expressed opposition to President Bush's push for military tribunals of those formerly and currently classified as enemy combatants. Specifically, he objected to the effort in Congress to "redefine Common Article 3 of the Geneva Convention." He also asserted: "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of our fight against terrorism."[83]
Powell endorsed President Obama in 2008 and again in 2012. When asked why he is still a Republican on Meet the Press he said, "I’m still a Republican. And I think the Republican Party needs me more than the Democratic Party needs me. And you can be a Republican and still feel strongly about issues such as immigration, and improving our education system, and doing something about some of the social problems that exist in our society and our country. I don’t think there's anything inconsistent with this." [84]
Views on the Iraq War
While Powell was wary of a military solution, he supported the decision to invade Iraq after the Bush administration concluded that diplomatic efforts had failed. After his departure from the State Department, Powell repeatedly emphasized his continued support for American involvement in the Iraq War.
At the 2007 Aspen Ideas Festival in Colorado,[85] Powell revealed that he had spent two and a half hours explaining to President Bush "the consequences of going into an Arab country and becoming the occupiers." During this discussion, he insisted that the U.S. appeal to the United Nations first, but if diplomacy failed, he would support the invasion: "I also had to say to him that you are the President, you will have to make the ultimate judgment, and if the judgment is this isn't working and we don't think it is going to solve the problem, then if military action is undertaken I'm with you, I support you."[86]
In a 2008 interview on CNN, Powell reiterated his support for the 2003 decision to invade Iraq in the context of his endorsement of Barack Obama, stating: "My role has been very, very straightforward. I wanted to avoid a war. The president [Bush] agreed with me. We tried to do that. We couldn't get it through the U.N. and when the president made the decision, I supported that decision. And I've never blinked from that. I've never said I didn't support a decision to go to war."[87]
Powell's position on the Iraq War troop surge of 2007 has been less consistent. In December 2006, he expressed skepticism that the strategy would work and whether the U.S. military had enough troops to carry it out successfully. He stated: "I am not persuaded that another surge of troops into Baghdad for the purposes of suppressing this communitarian violence, this civil war, will work."[88] Following his endorsement of Barack Obama in October 2008, however, Powell praised General David Petraeus and U.S. troops, as well as the Iraqi government, concluding that "it's starting to turn around."[87] By mid-2009, he had concluded a surge of U.S. forces in Iraq should have come sooner, perhaps in late 2003.[89] Throughout this period, Powell consistently argued that Iraqi political progress was essential, not just military force.
Role in presidential election of 2008
Powell donated the maximum allowable amount to John McCain's campaign in the summer of 2007[90] and in early 2008, his name was listed as a possible running mate for Republican nominee McCain's bid during the 2008 U.S. presidential election.[91] However, on October 19, 2008, Powell announced his endorsement of Barack Obama during a Meet the Press interview, citing "his ability to inspire, because of the inclusive nature of his campaign, because he is reaching out all across America, because of who he is and his rhetorical abilities", in addition to his "style and substance." He additionally referred to Obama as a "transformational figure".[92][93] Powell further questioned McCain's judgment in appointing Sarah Palin as the vice presidential candidate, stating that despite the fact that she is admired, "now that we have had a chance to watch her for some seven weeks, I don't believe she's ready to be president of the United States, which is the job of the vice president." He said that Obama's choice for vice-president, Joe Biden, was ready to be president. He also added that he was "troubled" by the "false intimations that Obama was Muslim." Powell stated that "[Obama] is a Christian—he's always been a Christian... But the really right answer is, what if he is? Is there something wrong with being a Muslim in this country? The answer's no, that's not America." Powell then mentioned Kareem Rashad Sultan Khan, a Muslim American soldier in the U.S. Army who served and died in the Iraq War. He later stated, "Over the last seven weeks, the approach of the Republican Party has become narrower and narrower [...] I look at these kind of approaches to the campaign, and they trouble me."[92][93] Powell concluded his Sunday morning talk show comments, "It isn't easy for me to disappoint Sen. McCain in the way that I have this morning, and I regret that [...] I think we need a transformational figure. I think we need a president who is a generational change and that's why I'm supporting Barack Obama, not out of any lack of respect or admiration for Sen. John McCain."[94] Later in a December 12, 2008, CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Powell reiterated his belief that during the last few months of the campaign, Palin pushed the Republican party further to the right and had a polarizing impact on it.[95]
Views on the Obama administration
In a July 2009 CNN interview with John King, Powell expressed concern over President Obama growing the size of the federal government and the size of the federal budget deficit.[96] In September 2010, he criticized the Obama administration for not focusing "like a razor blade" on the economy and job creation. Powell reiterated that Obama was a "transformational figure."[97] In a video that aired on CNN.com in November 2011, Colin Powell said in reference to Barack Obama, "many of his decisions have been quite sound. The financial system was put back on a stable basis."[98]
On October 25, 2012, 12 days before the presidential election, he gave his endorsement to President Obama for re-election during a broadcast of CBS This Morning. He cited success and forward progress in foreign and domestic policy arenas under the Obama Administration, and made the following statement: "I voted for him in 2008 and I plan to stick with him in 2012 and I'll be voting for he [sic] and for Vice President Joe Biden next month."
As additional reason for his endorsement, Powell cited the changing positions and perceived lack of thoughtfulness of Mitt Romney on foreign affairs, and a concern for the validity of Romney's economic plans.[99]
In an interview with ABC's Diane Sawyer and George Stephanopoulos during ABC's coverage of President Obama's second inauguration, Powell criticized members of the Republican Party who "demonize[d] the president". He called on GOP leaders to publicly denounce such talk.[100]
2016 presidential election
Powell has been very vocal on the state of the Republican party. Speaking at a Washington Ideas forum in early October 2015, he warned the audience that the Republican party had begun a move to the fringe right, lessening the chances of a Republican White House in the future. He also remarked on Republican presidential contender Donald Trump's statements regarding immigrants, noting that there were many immigrants working in Trump hotels.[101]
In March 2016, Powell denounced the "nastiness" of the 2016 Republican primaries during an interview on CBS This Morning. He compared the race to a "reality show", and stated that the campaign had gone "into the mud".[102]
In August 2016, Powell accused the Clinton campaign of trying to pin Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton's email controversy on him. Speaking to People magazine, Powell said, "The truth is, she was using [the private email server] for a year before I sent her a memo telling her what I did."[103]
On September 13, 2016, emails were obtained that revealed Powell's private communications regarding both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton. Powell privately reiterated his comments regarding Clinton's email scandal, writing, "I have told Hillary's minions repeatedly that they are making a mistake trying to drag me in, yet they still try," and complaining that "Hillary’s mafia keeps trying to suck me into it" in another email.[104] In another email discussing Clinton's controversy, Powell noted that she should have told everyone what she did "two years ago", and said that she has not "been covering herself with glory." Writing on the 2012 Benghazi attack controversy surrounding Clinton, Powell said to then U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice, "Benghazi is a stupid witch hunt." Commenting on Clinton in a general sense, Powell mused that "Everything [Clinton] touches she kind of screws up with hubris", and in another email stated "I would rather not have to vote for her, although she is a friend I respect."[105]
Powell referred to Donald Trump as a "national disgrace", with "no sense of shame". He wrote candidly of Trump's role in the birther movement, which he referred to as "racist". Powell suggested that the media ignore Trump, saying, "To go on and call him an idiot just emboldens him." The emails were obtained by the media as the result of a hack.[106]
Powell endorsed Clinton on October 25, 2016, stating it was "because I think she's qualified, and the other gentleman is not qualified."[107]
Despite not running in the election, Powell received three electoral votes for president from faithless electors in Washington who had pledged to vote for Clinton, coming in third overall.[108] After Barack Obama, Powell was only the second African American to receive electoral votes in a presidential election. He was also the first Republican since 1984 to receive electoral votes from Washington in a presidential election, as well as the first Republican African American to do so.
Personal life
Powell married Alma Johnson on August 25, 1962. Their son, Michael Powell, was the chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) from 2001 to 2005. His daughters are Linda Powell, an actress, and Annemarie Powell. As a hobby, Powell restores old Volvo and Saab cars.[109][110] In 2013, he faced questions about a relationship with a Romanian diplomat, after a hacked AOL email account had been made public. He acknowledged a "very personal" email relationship but denied further involvement.[111]
Civilian awards and honors
Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medals of Freedom (the second with distinction), the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal, and the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country.

In 1988, Powell received the Academy of Achievement's Golden Plate Award.
In 1990, Powell received the U.S. Senator John Heinz Award for Greatest Public Service by an Elected or Appointed Official, an award given out annually by Jefferson Awards.[112]
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom by President George H. W. Bush.
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Spingarn Medal from the NAACP.[113]
In 1991, Powell was inducted into the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans,[114] which "honors the achievements of outstanding individuals in U.S. society who have succeeded in spite of adversity and of encouraging young people to pursue their dreams through higher education."
On September 30, 1993, Powell was awarded his second Presidential Medal of Freedom with distinction by President Bill Clinton.[35]
On November 9, 1993, Powell was awarded the second Ronald Reagan Freedom Award, by President Ronald Reagan. Powell served as Reagan's National Security Advisor from 1987–1989.[115]
On December 15, 1993, Colin Powell was created an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom.
In 1998, he was awarded the prestigious Sylvanus Thayer Award by the United States Military Academy for his commitment to the ideals of "Duty, Honor, Country."
The 2002 Liberty Medal was awarded to Colin Powell on July 4 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. In his acceptance speech, Powell reminded Americans that "It is for America, the Land of the Free and the Home of the Brave, to help freedom ring across the globe, unto all the peoples thereof. That is our solemn obligation, and we will not fail."[116]





Coat of arms



The Coat of Arms of Colin Powell was granted by the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh on February 4, 2004. Technically the grant was to Powell's father (a British subject) to be passed on by descent. Scotland's King of Arms is traditionally responsible for granting arms to Commonwealth citizens of Scottish descent. Blazoned as:

Azure, two swords in saltire points downwards between four mullets Argent, on a chief of the Second a lion passant Gules. On a wreath of the Liveries is set for Crest the head of an American bald-headed eagle erased Proper. And in an escrol over the same this motto, "DEVOTED TO PUBLIC SERVICE."

The swords and stars refer to the former general's career, as does the crest, which is the badge of the 101st Airborne (which he served as a brigade commander in the mid-1970s). The lion may be an allusion to Scotland. The shield can be shown surrounded by the insignia of an honorary Knight Commander of the Most Honorable Order of the Bath (KCB), an award the General received after the first Gulf War.
In 2005 Powell received the Bishop John T. Walker Distinguished Humanitarian Service Award for his contributions to Africa.
AARP honored Powell with the 2006 AARP Andrus Award, the Association's highest honor. This award, named in honor of AARP's founder, Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, is presented biennially to distinguished individuals who have generated positive social change in the world, and whose work and achievements reflect AARP's vision of bringing lifetimes of experience and leadership to serve all generations.
In 2005 Colin and Alma Powell were awarded the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service by the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution.
Colin Powell was initiated as an honorary brother in Sigma Phi Epsilon.
Powell is a recipient of the Silver Buffalo Award, the highest adult award given by the Boy Scouts of America.
A street in Gelnhausen, Germany was named after him: "General-Colin-Powell-Straße".[117]
In 2002, scholar Molefi Kete Asante listed Colin Powell on his list of 100 Greatest African Americans.[118]
In 2009, an elementary school named for Colin Powell opened in El Paso. It is in the El Paso Independent School District, located on Fort Bliss property, and serves a portion of Fort Bliss.[119] There is also a street in El Paso named for Powell, Colin Powell Drive.
Powell is an Honorary Board Member of the humanitarian organization Wings of Hope[120]
Since 2006, he is the chairman of the Board of Trustees for Eisenhower Fellowships[121]
In 2006, The Harry S. Truman Research Institute for the Advancement of Peace at The Hebrew University of Jerusalem awarded Colin Powell with the Truman Peace Prize for his efforts to conduct the "war against terrorism", through diplomatic as well as military means, and to avert regional and civil conflicts in many parts of the world.[122]
In September 2012 Union City, New Jersey opened Colin Powell Elementary School, which was named after Powell, and dedicated the school on February 7, 2013, with governor Chris Christie in attendance.[123] Powell himself visited the school on June 4, 2013.[124]
In 2014, Colin Powell was named to the National Board of Advisors for High Point University.[125]

See also


Biography portal
United States Army portal
Military of the United States portal



List of African-American United States Cabinet Secretaries
Plame affair
Pottery Barn rule
Republican and conservative support for Barack Obama in 2008

References


^ "Biographies of the Secretary of State:Colin Luther Powell". U.S. Department of State, Office of the Historian. Retrieved November 16, 2015. 
^ Preferred pronunciation rhymes with "bowel", not "bowl" (as in Charles Powell, Baron Powell of Bayswater) – see Alexander Chancellor, "You Say Tomato", New Yorker. August 9, 1993, p. 27.
^ The first African American secretary of state, Colin Powell, The African American Registry.
^ Biographies – Colin Powell: United States Secretary of State, African American History Month, US Department of Defense.
^ Colin Powell, Britannica Online Encyclopedia.
^ Profile: Colin Powell, BBC News.
^ a b c d "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell". The White House. Retrieved 24 December 2016.   This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.
^ Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Colin Powell". wargs.com. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Branigan, Tania (May 12, 2004). "Colin Powell claims Scottish coat of arms". The Guardian. London. 
^ "Colin Powell's Scottish Ancestry". Eastman's Online Genealogy Newsletter. 9 (20). May 17, 2004. 
^ CNN staff (March 30, 2016). "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. Retrieved September 30, 2016. 
^ Daly, Michael (August 2, 2000). "Powell's Old Nabe Boss a Big Backer". New York Daily News. Retrieved October 19, 2008. Powell explained that he had joined ROTC. He became an officer after graduation, leaving Sickser's with a smattering of Yiddish... 
^ "Former Secretary of State Gen. Colin Powell and Mario Cuomo, former governor of New York State, each a former Shabbos goy, both share fond recollections of their youth, when they were uniquely qualified to lend a Jewish neighbor a hand." Fertig, Avi. "Glatt Kosher Adventure To The Land Down Under", The Jewish Press, November 21, 2007.
^ a b "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. April 2, 2017. Education: City College of New York, B.S. in geology,1958; George Washington University, M.B.A.,1971; National War College, 1976 
^ "About Gen. Colin L. Powell, USA (Ret.)". The Colin Powell School for Civic and Global Leadership, The City College of New York. He attended New York City public schools and the City College of New York where he earned a B.S. in Geology. 
^ Schwab, Nikki (May 30, 2012). "Colin Powell: bad student". Washington Examiner. My cousins became lawyers and doctors and judges and I just sort of hung around," he recalled. "I had a straight C average all the way through high school and the City College of New York — I'm not sure how I got in. 
^ "Major Player: Gen. Colin L. Powell (Ret.)". Washington Post. July 28, 2000. Retrieved April 30, 2010. 
^ "Colin (Luther) Powell Biography (1937– )". The Biography Channel. A&E Television Networks. Retrieved May 31, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell Interview". achievement.org. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell (biography)". The White House. April 29, 2003. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b c "Colin Powell". CNN. 1996. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ Kearny, Cresson H. (1996). Jungle Snafus...And Remedies. Cave Junction, Oregon: Oregon Institute of Science & Medicine. p. 179. ISBN 978-1-884067-10-5. OCLC 41447083. 
^ Finlayson, Reggie (2003). Colin Powell. Biography (A & E). Twenty-First Century Books. p. 55. ISBN 9780822549666. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ "Interview on CNN's Larry King Live". New York: U.S. Department of State. May 4, 2004. Archived from the original on January 10, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brown, Warren; Wagner, Heather Lehr (1 Jan 2009). Colin Powell: Soldier and Statesman. Infobase Publishing. p. 41,43. 
^ "Online NewsHour: Colin Powell". Pbs.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "The 14 Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff". Joint History Office, U.S. Department of Defense. American Forces Press Service. August 10, 1999. Retrieved April 24, 2008. 
^ O'Sullivan, Christopher (2010). Colin Powell: A Political Biography. Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers. p. 100. ISBN 978-0-7425-5187-9. 
^ "Reluctant warrior", The Observer, September 30, 2001.
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (March 1991). "U.S. Sen. Kasten Pushing Effort To Award Powell With Historic Fifth Star". Jet. 79 (23). ISSN 0021-5996. Retrieved February 21, 2011. ...there is a movement afoot in the U.S. Senate to award an historic fifth star to the nation's first Black Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Colin L. Powell for his military proficiency. 
^ Italia, Bob (1991). Armed Forces: War in the Gulf. Abdo & Daughters. pp. 44–6. ISBN 978-1-56239-026-6. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Others want to make him a five-star general. [...] Congress is talking about giving him a fifth silver star, which is very rare. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (1999). All Too Human: A Political Education. Thorndike Press. pp. 330–1. ISBN 978-0-7862-2016-8. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Mack asked me to secretly research the procedure for awarding a fifth star to a general. [...] If Powell did challenge Clinton, the fifth star would forestall criticism of the general's military record. 
^ Hamilton, Nigel (2007). Bill Clinton: Mastering the Presidency. PublicAffairs. pp. 190, 399. ISBN 978-1-58648-516-0. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Moreover, for the very reason he admired Colin Powell as the most distinguished living black American, Clinton also feared the general as a potential rival. [...] Bill Clinton had denied Powell his rightful fifth star... 
^ Halberstam, David (2001). War in a Time of Peace: Bush, Clinton, and the Generals. Scribner. p. 190. ISBN 978-0-7432-0212-1. Retrieved February 22, 2011. They checked it out and found that the last general to get a fifth star was Omar Bradley forty-three years earlier. Powell, they decided, was not Bradley. Besides, as George Stephanopoulos noted, if they gave him one more star, it might help him one day politically. 
^ a b Clinton, W. J. (September 30, 1993). "Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia". University of California, Santa Barbara: The American Presidency Project. Retrieved September 18, 2016. In recognition of your legacy and service, of your courage and accomplishment, today, General Powell, I was honored to present you with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, with distinction. I want to tell all those here in attendance that this was the second Medal of Freedom you have received, the first from President Bush in 1991. And today, you became only the second American citizen in the history of the Republic to be the recipient of two Medals of Freedom. 
^ "Remarks With Bulgarian President Georgi Purvanov At Award Ceremony for the Stara Planina First Order Medal". Presidential Palace, Coat of Arms Hall, Sofia, Bulgaria: U.S. Department of State. December 7, 2004. 
^ "Parvanov-Powell". President of the Republic of Bulgaria. December 7, 2004. President Georgi Parvanov awarded US Secretary of State Colin Powell with the highest Bulgarian order "Stara Planina" for his extraordinary services to the advancement of Bulgarian-American relations and in connection with the 100th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between Bulgaria and the United States. 
^ Powell, Colin (2012). It Worked for Me. HarperCollins. pp. 3–4. ISBN 978-0-06-213512-4. 
^ McClimon, Tim (27 August 2012). "Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership". American Express. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ "Can we apply Colin Powell's 13 rules?" (PDF). Texas Child Care Quarterly. Summer 2012. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ Schram, Martin (January 21, 1995). "Don't Count Out Colin Powell". The Seattle Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Van Dyk, Ted (September 6, 1990). "Will Powell Run With Bush in '92?". The New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Lusane C. Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice: Foreign Policy, Race and the New American Century. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006, ISBN 0-275-98309-9, p. 46.
^ Apple, R. W. (October 28, 1995). "Life in Iowa May Not Have Changed, But the Political Turf Is Another Story". The New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Berke, Richard L. (October 19, 1995). "New Hampshire Poll Finds Powell With an Edge". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Clines, Francis X. (November 9, 1995). "The Powell Decision: The Announcement". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Plissner, Martin (February 7, 2007). "Ready for Obama Already". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ "NH US Vice President – R Primary Race". Our Campaigns. Feb 20, 1996. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Colin L. Powell Center for Public Policy". Retrieved 16 February 2013. 
^ "How Mccain Does It". 2000-03-06. Retrieved 2016-08-12. 
^ Kessler, Glenn (July 14, 2004). "Powell Flies in the Face of Tradition; The Secretary of State Is Least Traveled in 30 Years". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Warrick, Joby (April 12, 2006). "Lacking Biolabs, Trailers Carried Case for War; Administration Pushed Notion of Banned Iraqi Weapons Despite Evidence to Contrary". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Powell, Secretary Colin L. (February 5, 2003). "Remarks to the United Nations Security Council". New York City: U.S. Department of State. Archived from the original on January 9, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Lawless, Jill (February 7, 2003). "U.S. Scholar Uncredited in Iraq Report". Associated Press. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "UK accused of lifting dossier text". CNN. February 7, 2003. 
^ Charlie Rose. charlierose.com. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ Miller, Greg (July 15, 2004). "Flaws Cited in Powell's U.N. Speech on Iraq". Los Angeles Times. reprinted by CommonDreams.org. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b DeYoung, Karen (October 1, 2006). "Falling on His Sword: Colin Powell's most significant moment turned out to be his lowest". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell on Iraq, Race, and Hurricane Relief". ABC News: 20/20. September 8, 2005. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brancaccio, David (February 3, 2006). "Iraq Pre-War Intelligence". NOW. PBS. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Pincus, Walter (February 14, 2004). "Support for Intelligence Plan". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Remarks at the 2003 Groundhog Job Shadow Day Program, Secretary Colin L. Powell, Remarks and question and answer session with students, Washington, DC, January 31, 2003, excerpt on 1973 Chile coup, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell, Interview On Black Entertainment Television's Youth Town Hall, February 20, 2003, excerpt on 1973 U.S. covert action in Chile, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Sciolino, Elaine (November 18, 2004). "Exiles Add to Claims on Iran Nuclear Arms". New York Times. Retrieved February 8, 2007. 
^ Anderson, Cooper (December 31, 2004). "Transcripts: New Year's Eve Special". CNN. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ VandeHei, Jim; Robin Wright (April 22, 2005). "Powell Playing Quiet Role in Bolton Battle". Washington Post. 
^ Borger, Julian (April 23, 2005). "Powell's remarks harm Bolton's chances of UN job". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (April 28, 2005). "The good soldier's revenge". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Powell criticises storm response". BBC News. September 9, 2005. 
^ "Senators defy Bush on tribunals". BBC News. September 15, 2006. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Wilken, Dennis (September 7, 2008). "Down the Rabbit Hole". American Satellite Magazine. Retrieved October 10, 2008. 
^ "Board of Directors". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved December 6, 2007. 
^ "islanderspointblank.com". islanderspointblank.com. Archived from the original on July 13, 2011. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "nhl.com". nhl.com. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Powell, General Colin L, USA (Ret.) (July 8, 2008). "Keynote Address – A New Vision for America's Future: Young Leaders Shaping an International Agenda". CSIS Launch of Next America. Center for Strategic and International Studies. Archived from the original on July 31, 2008. Retrieved October 20, 2008. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ "Who Mentored Colin Powell?". President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2008. 
^ "Al Gore, Colin Powell, Caroline Kennedy in Obama's Administration? – Washington Whispers". usnews.com. November 11, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell advised against Afghan surge", Politico (September 27, 2009). http://www.politico.com/blogs/laurarozen/0909/Powell_advised_against_Afghan_surge.html
^ Ingrid Lunden. "General Colin Powell Joins Salesforce Board Of Directors, As CRM Giant Zeros In On Public Sector". TechCrunch. AOL. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ a b c Colin Powell's biography from 'On The Issues'.
^ DeYoung, Karen (February 3, 2010). "Colin Powell shifts stance on 'don't ask, don't tell' policy". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2010. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (November 18, 2004). "Colin and the crazies". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Sen. McCain Releases Letter from Gen. Colin Powell", Washington Post (September 14, 2006). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/graphic/2006/09/14/GR2006091400728.html
^ "Colin Powell: Republican Party Needs Me More Than The Democratic Party Needs Me". TheLonelyConservative.com. February 7, 2014. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ See Official website: Aspen Ideas Festival
^ "Conversation with Colin Powell" (PDF). Aspen Ideas Festival. July 2007. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell: Support for Obama doesn't mean Iraq war wrong", CNN (October 19, 2008). http://edition.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/10/19/powell.transcript/
^ James M. Klatell, "Powell: We Are Losing In Iraq", CBS (December 17, 2006). http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/12/17/ftn/main2274583.shtml
^ "Powell says Iraq surge should have come earlier", Seattle Times (July 5, 2009)
^ Henry, Ed (August 9, 2007). "Powell donates to McCain". CNN. Retrieved August 9, 2007. 
^ Holland, Steve (March 5, 2008). "McCain now has to pick a vice presidential nominee". Boston Globe. Reuters. Retrieved April 14, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell endorses Obama for president; Republican ex-Secretary of State calls Democrat 'transformational figure'". Meet the Press. MSNBC and NBC News. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ a b "Meet the Press' transcript for October 19, 2008". MSNBC. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Ohlemacher, Stephen (October 20, 2008). "Colin Powell endorses Barack Obama for president". USA Today. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell on Rush Limbaugh". CNN. July 16, 2010. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell airs doubts on Obama agenda". The Washington Times. July 3, 2009. Retrieved September 17, 2010. 
^ Carrie Budoff Brown, "Colin Powell critical of President Obama", Politico (September 19, 2010). http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0910/42381.html
^ "Video". CNN. 
^ [1] retrieved October 25, 2012.
^ "ABC News". Retrieved 2013-01-22. 
^ https://www.yahoo.com/news/colin-powell-slams-donald-trumps-immigration-plan-163454530.html. Colin Powell slams Donald Trump's immigration plan. October 1, 2015. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-gop-race_us_56dda980e4b0000de405301a Colin Powell: The GOP Race Has ‘Gone Into The Mud’. The Huffington Post. March 7, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.people.com/article/colin-powell-hillary-clinton-pinning-email-scandal-on-him Colin Powell Says Hillary Clinton's 'People Have Been Trying to Pin' Email Scandal on Him. People Magazine. August 21, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/09/13/colin-powell-hacked-emails/90341788/
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-hillary-clinton_us_57d96524e4b09d7a6880bf1c Colin Powell Attacked Hillary Clinton’s ‘Hubris’ In Leaked Emails. The Huffington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14th, 2016.
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/09/14/here-are-the-juiciest-colin-powell-comments-about-trump-and-clinton-from-his-leaked-emails/ Here are the juiciest Colin Powell comments about Trump and Clinton from his hacked emails. The Washington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ Colin Powell joins 67 Republican politicians, donors and officials who are supporting Hillary Clinton October 25, 2016
^ Four Washington electors break ranks and don’t vote for Clinton
^ Powell, Colin (October 17, 2005). "Interview transcript". Larry King Live (Interview). Interview with Larry King. CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Powell, Colin (August 2, 2004). "A Conversation with Colin Powell". The Atlantic (Interview). Interview with P. J. O'Rourke. Washington, D.C. Archived from the original on February 4, 2013. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Colin Powell insists ‘there was no affair then and there is not one now’ with diplomat. NY Daily News. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ National Winners | public service awards. Jefferson Awards.org. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ "Spingarn Medal Winners: 1915 to Today". naacp.org. Archived from the original on May 5, 2014. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Colin L. Powell". The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans. n.d. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "The Ronald Reagan Freedom Award". Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation & Library. Archived from the original on October 16, 2006. 
^ Powell, Colin (July 4, 2002). "2002 Liberty Medal Acceptance Speech". Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: National Constitution Center. 
^ "GEN Colin Powell". 2016-03-08. Retrieved 2017-07-01. 
^ Asante, Molefi Kete (2002). 100 Greatest African Americans: A Biographical Encyclopedia. Amherst, New York. Prometheus Books. ISBN 1-57392-963-8.
^ According to the Fort Bliss Bugle, as of 10/24/2013, nine schools have been named for Colin Powell.
^ ":.: The Official Wings Of Hope Homepage :.:". Wings-of-hope.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ efworld
^ "Powell: Friendship with Israel means friendship with Arabs" (PDF). afhu.org. 
^ McDonald, Terrence T. (February 8, 2013). "Gov. Christie visits Union City school opening, hears Democratic mayor praise him". NJ.com.
^ Wenik, Ian (June 9, 2013). "Saluting the general". The Union City Reporter. pp. 1 and 11.
^ "High Point University National Board of Advisors". 


Further reading

LaFeber, Walter, "The Rise and Fall of Colin Powell and the Powell Doctrine", Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Spring 2009), 71–93.
Powell, Colin A. and Joseph Persico, My American Journey, Ballantine Books, 1995. ISBN 0-345-40728-8.
Excerpts from My American Journey, TIME, September 18, 1995.
DeYoung, Karen, Soldier: The Life of Colin Powell, Alfred A. Knopf, 2006. ISBN 1-4000-4170-8.
"Alex Haley's Other Roots: African-Americans with Irish Ancestors". February 25, 2006. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
Powell, Colin; Koltz, Tony (2012). It Worked for Me: Lessons in Leadership and Life. Harper. ISBN 978-0062135124. 

External links

Find more aboutColin Powellat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Appearances on C-SPAN
Colin Powell on Charlie Rose
Colin Powell on IMDb
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The New York Times. 
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The Guardian.  
Works by or about Colin Powell in libraries (WorldCat catalog)
Colin Powell: America's Best Leaders from U.S. News & World Report
Issue positions and quotes at On the Issues
Colin Powell Quotes
African Americans in the U.S. Army
The American Presidency Project: Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia, September 30, 1993
Address to the National Summit on Africa, Washington, D.C., February 2000
Remarks to the United Nations Security Council, February 5, 2003
Complete text, audio, video of Colin Powell's Remarks to the UN Security Council AmericanRhetoric.com
"Curveball" Revelations Indicate falsified info used to start Iraq war and esp used for Powell's UN presentation on Iraq WMDs, November 5, 2007
Colin Powell demands answers over Curveball's WMD lies, Ed Pikington, Helen Pidd and Martin Chulov, The Guardian, February 16, 2011
WARGS: Ancestry of Gen. Colin Powell



Political offices


Preceded by
Peter Rodman
Deputy National Security Advisor
1987
Succeeded by
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci
National Security Advisor
1987–1989
Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright
United States Secretary of State
2001–2005
Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


Military offices


Preceded by
William Crowe
Chair of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
1989–1993
Succeeded by
David Jeremiah
Acting


Awards and achievements


Preceded by
Mikhail Gorbachev
Recipient of the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award
1993
Succeeded by
Yitzhak Rabin


Party political offices


Preceded by
Susan Molinari
Keynote Speaker of the Republican National Convention
2000
Served alongside: John McCain
Succeeded by
Zell Miller








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Cabinet of President George W. Bush (2001–09)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Colin Powell (2001–05)
Condoleezza Rice (2005–09)








Secretary of the Treasury



Paul H. O'Neill (2001–02)
John W. Snow (2003–06)
Henry Paulson (2006–09)





Secretary of Defense



Donald Rumsfeld (2001–06)
Robert Gates (2006–09)





Attorney General



John Ashcroft (2001–05)
Alberto Gonzales (2005–07)
Michael Mukasey (2007–09)





Secretary of the Interior



Gale Norton (2001–06)
Dirk Kempthorne (2006–09)





Secretary of Agriculture



Ann Veneman (2001–05)
Mike Johanns (2005–07)
Ed Schafer (2008–09)





Secretary of Commerce



Donald Evans (2001–05)
Carlos Gutierrez (2005–09)





Secretary of Labor



Elaine Chao (2001–09)





Secretary of Health and
Human Services



Tommy Thompson (2001–05)
Mike Leavitt (2005–09)





Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development



Mel Martinez (2001–03)
Alphonso Jackson (2003–08)
Steve Preston (2008–09)





Secretary of Transportation



Norman Mineta (2001–06)
Mary E. Peters (2006–09)





Secretary of Energy



Spencer Abraham (2001–05)
Samuel Bodman (2005–09)





Secretary of Education



Rod Paige (2001–05)
Margaret Spellings (2005–09)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Anthony Principi (2001–05)
Jim Nicholson (2005–07)
James Peake (2007–09)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Tom Ridge (2003–05)
Michael Chertoff (2005–09)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Dick Cheney (2001–09)





White House Chief of Staff



Andrew Card (2001–06)
Joshua Bolten (2006–09)





Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency



Christine Todd Whitman (2001–03)
Mike Leavitt (2003–05)
Stephen L. Johnson (2005–09)





Director of the Office of
Management and Budget



Mitch Daniels (2001–03)
Joshua Bolten (2003–06)
Rob Portman (2006–07)
Jim Nussle (2007–09)





Director of National Drug
Control Policy



John P. Walters (2001–09)





Trade Representative



Robert Zoellick (2001–05)
Rob Portman (2005–06)
Susan Schwab (2006–09)













Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff









Bradley
Radford
Twining
Lemnitzer
Taylor
Wheeler
Moorer
Brown
Jones
Vessey
Crowe
Powell
Jeremiah (acting)
Shalikashvili
Shelton
Myers
Pace
Mullen
Dempsey
Dunford















v
t
e


Assistants to the President for National Security Affairs






Cutler
Anderson
Jackson
Cutler
Gray
Bundy
Rostow
Kissinger
Scowcroft
Brzezinski
Allen
Clark
McFarlane
Poindexter
Carlucci
Powell
Scowcroft
Lake
Berger
C. Rice
Hadley
Jones
Donilon
S. Rice
Flynn
Kellogg (acting)
McMaster















v
t
e


Recipients of the Soldier's Medal






Marty Allen
Glenn Andreotta
Clift Andrus
Aaron Bank
James Leroy Bondsteel
Leonard Boswell
Allison Brooks
William Francis Buckley
Max Cleland
Lawrence Colburn
John Thomas Corley
Wayne A. Downing
Theodore Leslie Futch
John Galvin
Elmer Gedeon
Carl Genian
Hershel W. Gober
John F. Goodman
David E. Grange Jr.
Ed Grady
Edith Ellen Greenwood
Francis Grevemberg
Bo Gritz
William W. Hartzog
Mike Hayden
Anthony Herbert
Patrick J. Hessian
Don Holleder
Bob Hoover
Eli D. Hoyle
Otto Kerner Jr.
Darwin K. Kyle
Richard L. Lawson
Reis Leming
Charles Andrew MacGillivary
William A. Matheny
Charles J. McDonnell
Jack N. Merritt
Leo J. Meyer
Henry Mucci
José Antonio Muñiz
Thomas Alexander Parrott
Frank D. Peregory
Colin Powell
Edwin W. Rawlings
Richard Scholtes
Preston Schoyer
Stephen Silvasy Jr.
John K. Singlaub
Alek Skarlatos
Christopher Speer
Donn A. Starry
Joseph Warren Stilwell Jr.
Thomas Tackaberry
Hugh Thompson Jr.
Clarence L. Tinker
Alfred Valenzuela
Leon L. Van Autreve
David Wade
Ron Welch
Samuel Tankersley Williams
Walter K. Wilson Jr.






Names are in alphabetical order







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 79113153
LCCN: n87926095
ISNI: 0000 0001 0858 8433
GND: 119077817
SUDOC: 073950408
BNF: cb12496187m (data)
NDL: 00515602
NKC: jo2003163174
IATH: w68g9rsz










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Colin_Powell&oldid=790924136"					
Categories: 1937 birthsLiving people21st-century American politicians21st-century American writersAfrican-American diplomatsAfrican-American members of the Cabinet of the United StatesAfrican-American military personnelAfrican-American politiciansAfrican-American writersAmerican EpiscopaliansAmerican male writersAmerican memoiristsAmerican military personnel of the Gulf WarAmerican military personnel of the Vietnam WarAmerican people of Jamaican descentAmerican people of Scottish descentAmerican political writersAmerican politicians of Jamaican descentChairmen of the Joint Chiefs of StaffCity College of New York alumniCongressional Gold Medal recipientsFellows of the United States National Academy of Public AdministrationGeorge W. Bush administration cabinet membersGeorge Washington University School of Business alumniHonorary Knights Commander of the Order of the BathIraq and weapons of mass destructionKleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers peopleLégion d'honneur recipientsMilitary leaders of the Gulf WarMilitary personnel from New York CityMy Lai MassacreNational War College alumniNew York RepublicansPeople from HarlemPeople from the BronxPeople from McLean, VirginiaPershing RiflemenPolitical realistsPresidential Citizens Medal recipientsPresidential Medal of Freedom recipientsReagan administration personnelRecipients of the Air MedalRecipients of the Defense Distinguished Service MedalRecipients of the Defense Superior Service MedalRecipients of the Distinguished Service Medal (US Army)Recipients of the Legion of MeritRecipients of the Order of Saint MauriceRecipients of the Order of Skanderbeg (1990–)Recipients of the Order of Stara PlaninaRecipients of the Soldier's MedalSpingarn Medal winnersUnited States Army Command and General Staff College alumniUnited States Army Command and General Staff College facultyUnited States Army generalsUnited States National Security AdvisorsUnited States Secretaries of StateWhite House FellowsWriters from New York CityHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listWikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleUse mdy dates from March 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from October 2011Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიLatviešuLietuviųमराठीმარგალურიBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng ViệtYorùbá中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 00:21.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Colin Powell - Wikipedia




















 







Colin Powell

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the American politician. For the British soccer player, see Colin Powell (footballer).


Colin Powell








65th United States Secretary of State


In office
January 20, 2001 – January 26, 2005


President
George W. Bush


Deputy
Richard Armitage


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright


Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff


In office
October 1, 1989 – September 30, 1993


President
George H. W. Bush
Bill Clinton


Deputy
Robert Herres
David Jeremiah


Preceded by
William Crowe


Succeeded by
David Jeremiah (Acting)


16th National Security Advisor


In office
November 23, 1987 – January 20, 1989


President
Ronald Reagan


Deputy
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci


Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft





Personal details


Born
Colin Luther Powell
(1937-04-05) April 5, 1937 (age 80)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Alma Johnson (m. 1962)


Education
City University of New York, City College (BS)
George Washington University (MBA)


Signature



Military service


Allegiance
 United States


Service/branch
 United States Army


Years of service
1958–1993


Rank
 General


Unit
 3rd Armored Division
  23rd Infantry Division


Commands
 V Corps
 Joint Chiefs of Staff
  Army Forces Command


Battles/wars
Vietnam War
Invasion of Panama
Persian Gulf War


Colin Luther Powell (/ˈkoʊlᵻn/; born April 5, 1937)[1] is an American statesman and a retired four-star general in the United States Army.[2] Powell was born in Harlem as the son of Jamaican immigrants. During his military career, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989), as Commander of the U.S. Army Forces Command (1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Persian Gulf War. Powell was the first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State, serving under U.S. President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2005, the first African American to serve in that position.[3][4][5][6]
Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and was raised in the South Bronx. His parents, Luther and Maud Powell, immigrated to the United States from Jamaica. Powell was educated in the New York City public schools, graduating from the City College of New York (CCNY), where he earned a bachelor's degree in geology. He also participated in ROTC at CCNY and received a commission as an Army second lieutenant upon graduation in June 1958. His further academic achievements include a Master of Business Administration degree from George Washington University.[7]
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, during which time he held myriad command and staff positions and rose to the rank of 4-star General. His last assignment, from October 1, 1989 to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. He also formulated the Powell Doctrine.[7]
Following his military retirement, Powell wrote his best-selling autobiography, My American Journey. In addition, he pursued a career as a public speaker, addressing audiences across the country and abroad. Prior to his appointment as Secretary of State, Powell was the chairman of America's Promise - The Alliance for Youth, a national nonprofit organization dedicated to mobilizing people from every sector of American life to build the character and competence of young people. He was nominated by President Bush on December 16, 2000 as Secretary of State. After being unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate, he was sworn in as the 65th Secretary of State on January 20, 2001.[7]
Powell is the recipient of numerous U.S. and foreign military awards and decorations. Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medal of Freedom, the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, and the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country. Powell is married to the former Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama. The Powell family includes son Michael (ex-chairman of the Federal Communications Commission); daughters Linda and Anne; daughter-in-law Jane; and grandsons Jeffrey and Bryan.[7]
In 2016, while not a candidate for that year's election, Powell received three electoral votes for the office of President of the United States.



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Military career

2.1 Training
2.2 Vietnam War
2.3 After the Vietnam War
2.4 A "political general"
2.5 Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
2.6 Dates of rank
2.7 Awards and decorations

2.7.1 Badges
2.7.2 Medals and ribbons
2.7.3 Foreign decorations


2.8 13 Rules of Leadership


3 Potential presidential candidate
4 Secretary of State
5 Life after diplomatic service
6 Political views

6.1 Views on the Iraq War
6.2 Role in presidential election of 2008
6.3 Views on the Obama administration
6.4 2016 presidential election


7 Personal life
8 Civilian awards and honors
9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Early life and education
Powell was born on April 5, 1937,[8] in Harlem, a neighborhood in the New York City borough of Manhattan, to Jamaican immigrant parents Maud Arial (née McKoy) and Luther Theophilus Powell. His parents were both of mixed African and Scots ancestry.[9][10] Luther worked as a shipping clerk and Maud as a seamstress.[11] Powell was raised in the South Bronx and attended Morris High School, from which he graduated in 1954. (This school has since closed.)
While at school, Powell worked at a local baby furniture store, where he picked up Yiddish from the eastern European Jewish shopkeepers and some of the customers.[12] He also served as a Shabbos goy, helping Orthodox families with needed tasks on the Sabbath.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Geology from the City College of New York in 1958[14][15] and has said he was a 'C average' student.[16] He later earned an MBA degree from the George Washington University in 1971,[14] after his second tour in Vietnam.
Despite his parents' pronunciation of his name as /ˈkɒlᵻn/, Powell has pronounced his name /ˈkoʊlᵻn/ since childhood, after the heroic World War II flyer Colin P. Kelly Jr.[17] Public officials and radio and television reporters have used Powell's preferred pronunciation.
Military career
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, holding a variety of command and staff positions and rising to the rank of General.[18]
Training
Powell described joining the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) during college as one of the happiest experiences of his life; discovering something he loved and could do well, he felt he had "found himself." According to Powell:

It was only once I was in college, about six months into college when I found something that I liked, and that was ROTC, Reserve Officer Training Corps in the military. And I not only liked it, but I was pretty good at it. That's what you really have to look for in life, something that you like, and something that you think you're pretty good at. And if you can put those two things together, then you're on the right track, and just drive on.[19]

Cadet Powell joined the Pershing Rifles, the ROTC fraternal organization and drill team begun by General John Pershing. Even after he had become a general, Powell kept on his desk a pen set he had won for a drill team competition.
Upon graduation, he received a commission as an Army second lieutenant.[20] After attending basic training at Fort Benning, Powell was assigned to the 48th Infantry, in West Germany, as a platoon leader.[21]
Vietnam War
In his autobiography, Powell said he is haunted by the nightmare of the Vietnam War and felt that the leadership was very ineffective.
Captain Powell served a tour in Vietnam as a South Vietnamese Army (ARVN) advisor from 1962 to 1963. While on patrol in a Viet Cong-held area, he was wounded by stepping on a punji stake.[22] The large infection made it difficult for him to walk, and caused his foot to swell for a short time, shortening his first tour.
He returned to Vietnam as a major in 1968, serving in the 23rd Infantry Division, then as assistant chief of staff of operations for the Americal Division. During the second tour in Vietnam he was decorated for bravery after he survived a helicopter crash, single-handedly rescuing three others, including division commander Major General Charles Martin Gettys, from the burning wreckage.[21][23]
Powell was charged with investigating a detailed letter by 11th Light Infantry Brigade soldier Tom Glen, which backed up rumored allegations of the My Lai Massacre. He wrote: "In direct refutation of this portrayal is the fact that relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are excellent." Later, Powell's assessment would be described as whitewashing the news of the massacre, and questions would continue to remain undisclosed to the public. In May 2004 Powell said to television and radio host Larry King, "I was in a unit that was responsible for My Lai. I got there after My Lai happened. So, in war, these sorts of horrible things happen every now and again, but they are still to be deplored."[24]




Powell in April 1989, as the Commanding General of FORSCOM.


After the Vietnam War
Powell served a White House Fellowship under President Richard Nixon from 1972 to 1973. During 1975–1976 he attended the National War College, Washington, D.C.[25]
In his autobiography, My American Journey, Powell named several officers he served under who inspired and mentored him. As a lieutenant colonel serving in South Korea, Powell was very close to General Henry "Gunfighter" Emerson. Powell said he regarded Emerson as one of the most caring officers he ever met. Emerson insisted his troops train at night to fight a possible North Korean attack, and made them repeatedly watch the television film Brian's Song to promote racial harmony. Powell always professed that what set Emerson apart was his great love of his soldiers and concern for their welfare. After a race riot occurred, in which African American soldiers almost killed a Caucasian officer, Powell was charged by Emerson to crack down on black militants; Powell's efforts led to the discharge of one soldier, and other efforts to reduce racial tensions.[21]
A "political general"
In the early 1980s, Powell served at Fort Carson, Colorado. After he left Fort Carson, Powell became senior military assistant to Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, whom he assisted during the 1983 invasion of Grenada and the 1986 airstrike on Libya.




President Ronald Reagan and National Security Advisor Powell in 1988


In 1986, Powell took over the command of V Corps in Frankfurt, Germany, from Robert Lewis "Sam" Wetzel.
Following the Iran Contra scandal, Powell became, at the age of 49, Ronald Reagan's National Security Advisor, serving from 1987 to 1989 while retaining his Army commission as a lieutenant general.
In April 1989, after his tenure with the National Security Council, Powell was promoted to four-star general under President George H. W. Bush and briefly served as the Commander in Chief, Forces Command (FORSCOM), headquartered at Fort McPherson, Georgia, overseeing all Army, Army Reserve, and National Guard units in the Continental U.S., Alaska, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico. He became the third general since World War II to reach four-star rank without ever serving as a division commander, joining Dwight D. Eisenhower and Alexander Haig.
Later that year, President George H. W. Bush selected him as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.[26]
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff




Powell in November 1989, on his official Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff portrait.


Powell's last military assignment, from October 1, 1989, to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. At age 52, he became the youngest officer, and first Afro-Caribbean American, to serve in this position. Powell was also the first JCS Chair who received his commission through ROTC.[27]
During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including the invasion of Panama in 1989 to remove General Manuel Noriega from power and Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. During these events, Powell earned his nickname, "the reluctant warrior." He rarely advocated military intervention as the first solution to an international crisis, and instead usually prescribed diplomacy and containment.




General Colin Powell, Chairman, Joint Chiefs of Staff, waves from his motorcade during the Persian Gulf War Welcome Home Parade in New York City.


As a military strategist, Powell advocated an approach to military conflicts that maximizes the potential for success and minimizes casualties. A component of this approach is the use of overwhelming force, which he applied to Operation Desert Storm in 1991. His approach has been dubbed the "Powell Doctrine". Powell continued as chairman of the JCS into the Clinton presidency but as a dedicated "realist" he considered himself a bad fit for an administration largely made up of liberal internationalists.[28] He clashed with then-U.S. ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright over the Bosnian crisis, as he opposed any military interventions that didn't involve US interests.[29]
During his chairmanship of the JCS, there was discussion of awarding Powell a fifth star, granting him the rank of General of the Army. But even in the wake of public and Congressional pressure[30][31] to do so, Clinton-Gore presidential transition team staffers decided against it.[32][33][34]
Dates of rank

Promotions

Rank
Date


 General
April 4, 1989


 Lieutenant general
March 26, 1986


 Major general
August 1, 1983


 Brigadier general
June 1, 1979


 Colonel
February 1, 1976


 Lieutenant colonel
July 9, 1970


 Major
May 24, 1966


 Captain
June 2, 1962


 First lieutenant
December 30, 1959


 Second lieutenant
June 9, 1958


Awards and decorations
Badges







Combat Infantryman Badge









Expert Infantryman Badge









Ranger Tab









Parachutist Badge









Pathfinder Badge









Air Assault Badge









Presidential Service Badge









Secretary of Defense Identification Badge









Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge









Army Staff Identification Badge




Medals and ribbons











Defense Distinguished Service Medal with three oak leaf clusters









Distinguished Service Medal, Army with oak leaf cluster



Defense Superior Service Medal









Legion of Merit with oak leaf cluster



Soldier's Medal



Bronze Star



Purple Heart



Air Medal



Joint Service Commendation Medal










Army Commendation Medal with two oak leaf clusters



Presidential Medal of Freedom with Distinction (1993)[35]



Presidential Medal of Freedom (1991)



Presidential Citizens Medal









National Defense Service Medal with bronze service star









Vietnam Service Medal with silver service star



Army Service Ribbon



Army Overseas Service Ribbon with award numeral 4


Foreign decorations



Skanderbeg's Order (Albania)



Honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) (United Kingdom)



Légion d'honneur, Grand Cross (France)



Meritorious Service Cross (M.S.C.) (Canada)



Order of Stara Planina in the First Order (Bulgaria)[36][37]



Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation



Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal


13 Rules of Leadership
First printed in the August 13, 1989 issue of Parade magazine,[38] these are Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership.[39][40]

It ain't as bad as you think.
Get mad, then get over it.
Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.
It can be done.
Be careful what you choose. You may get it.
Don't let adverse facts stand in the way of a good decision.
You can't make someone else's choices.
Check small things.
Share credit.
Remain calm. Be kind.
Have a vision.
Don't take counsel of your fears or naysayers.
Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.

Potential presidential candidate
Powell's experience in military matters made him a very popular figure with both American political parties. Many Democrats admired his moderate stance on military matters, while many Republicans saw him as a great asset associated with the successes of past Republican administrations. Put forth as a potential Democratic Vice Presidential nominee in the 1992 U.S. presidential election[41] or even potentially replacing Vice President Dan Quayle as the Republican Vice Presidential nominee,[42] Powell eventually declared himself a Republican and began to campaign for Republican candidates in 1995.[43] He was touted as a possible opponent of Bill Clinton in the 1996 U.S. presidential election, possibly capitalizing on a split conservative vote in Iowa[44] and even leading New Hampshire polls for the GOP nomination,[45] but Powell declined, citing a lack of passion for politics.[46] Powell defeated Clinton 50–38 in a hypothetical match-up proposed to voters in the exit polls conducted on Election Day.[47] Despite not standing in the race, Powell won the Republican New Hampshire Vice-Presidential primary on write-in votes.[48]
In 1997 Powell founded America's Promise with the objective of helping children from all socioeconomic sectors. That same year saw the establishment of The Colin L. Powell Center for Leadership and Service. The mission of the Center is to "prepare new generations of publicly engaged leaders from populations previously underrepresented in public service and policy circles, to build a strong culture of civic engagement at City College, and to mobilize campus resources to meet pressing community needs and serve the public good." [49]
Powell was mentioned as a potential candidate in the 2000 U.S. presidential election, but decided against running.[50] Once Texas Governor George W. Bush secured the Republican nomination, Powell endorsed him for president and spoke at the 2000 Republican National Convention. Bush eventually won, and Powell was appointed Secretary of State.
In the electoral college vote count of 2016, Powell received three votes from faithless electors from Washington.
Secretary of State




Powell, National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice and Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld listen to President George W. Bush speak.


As Secretary of State in the Bush administration, Powell was perceived as moderate. Powell was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate. Over the course of his tenure he traveled less than any other U.S. Secretary of State in 30 years. [51]
On September 11, 2001, Powell was in Lima, Peru, meeting with President Alejandro Toledo and US Ambassador John Hamilton, and attending the special session of the OAS General Assembly that subsequently adopted the Inter-American Democratic Charter. After the September 11 attacks, Powell's job became of critical importance in managing America's relationships with foreign countries in order to secure a stable coalition in the War on Terrorism.
Powell came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 Invasion of Iraq. In a press statement on February 24, 2001, he had said that sanctions against Iraq had prevented the development of any weapons of mass destruction by Saddam Hussein. As was the case in the days leading up to the Persian Gulf War, Powell was initially opposed to a forcible overthrow of Saddam, preferring to continue a policy of containment. However, Powell eventually agreed to go along with the Bush administration's determination to remove Saddam. He had often clashed with others in the administration, who were reportedly planning an Iraq invasion even before the September 11 attacks, an insight supported by testimony by former terrorism czar Richard Clarke in front of the 9/11 Commission. The main concession Powell wanted before he would offer his full support for the Iraq War was the involvement of the international community in the invasion, as opposed to a unilateral approach. He was also successful in persuading Bush to take the case of Iraq to the United Nations, and in moderating other initiatives. Powell was placed at the forefront of this diplomatic campaign.




Computer-generated image of an alleged mobile production facility for biological weapons, presented by Powell at the UN Security Council. On May 27, 2003, US and UK experts examined the trailers and declared they had nothing to do with biological weapons.[52]






Powell holding a model vial of anthrax while giving a presentation to the United Nations Security Council in February 2003.


Powell's chief role was to garner international support for a multi-national coalition to mount the invasion. To this end, Powell addressed a plenary session of the United Nations Security Council on February 5, 2003, to argue in favor of military action. Citing numerous anonymous Iraqi defectors, Powell asserted that "there can be no doubt that Saddam Hussein has biological weapons and the capability to rapidly produce more, many more." Powell also stated that there was "no doubt in my mind" that Saddam was working to obtain key components to produce nuclear weapons.[53]
Most observers praised Powell's oratorical skills. However, Britain's Channel 4 News reported soon afterwards that a UK intelligence dossier that Powell had referred to as a "fine paper" during his presentation had been based on old material and plagiarized an essay by American graduate student Ibrahim al-Marashi.[54][55] A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
In an interview with Charlie Rose, Powell contended that prior to his UN presentation, he had merely four days to review the data concerning WMD in Iraq.[56]
A Senate report on intelligence failures would later detail the intense debate that went on behind the scenes on what to include in Powell's speech. State Department analysts had found dozens of factual problems in drafts of the speech. Some of the claims were taken out, but others were left in, such as claims based on the yellowcake forgery.[57] The administration came under fire for having acted on faulty intelligence, particularly what was single-sourced to the informant known as Curveball. Powell later recounted how Vice President Dick Cheney had joked with him before he gave the speech, telling him, "You've got high poll ratings; you can afford to lose a few points." Powell's longtime aide-de-camp and Chief of Staff from 1989–2003, Colonel Lawrence Wilkerson, later characterized Cheney's view of Powell's mission as to "go up there and sell it, and we'll have moved forward a peg or two. Fall on your damn sword and kill yourself, and I'll be happy, too."[58]
In September 2005, Powell was asked about the speech during an interview with Barbara Walters and responded that it was a "blot" on his record. He went on to say, "It will always be a part of my record. It was painful. It's painful now."[59]
Wilkerson said that he inadvertently participated in a hoax on the American people in preparing Powell's erroneous testimony before the United Nations Security Council.[60]
Because Powell was seen as more moderate than most figures in the administration, he was spared many of the attacks that have been leveled at more controversial advocates of the invasion, such as Donald Rumsfeld and Paul Wolfowitz. At times, infighting among the Powell-led State Department, the Rumsfeld-led Defense Department, and Cheney's office had the effect of polarizing the administration on crucial issues, such as what actions to take regarding Iran and North Korea.




Secretary Powell with NATO Secretary General Jaap de Hoop Scheffer


After Saddam Hussein had been deposed, Powell's new role was to once again establish a working international coalition, this time to assist in the rebuilding of post-war Iraq. On September 13, 2004, Powell testified before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee,[61] acknowledging that the sources who provided much of the information in his February 2003 UN presentation were "wrong" and that it was "unlikely" that any stockpiles of WMDs would be found. Claiming that he was unaware that some intelligence officials questioned the information prior to his presentation, Powell pushed for reform in the intelligence community, including the creation of a national intelligence director who would assure that "what one person knew, everyone else knew."
Additionally, Powell has been critical of other instances of U.S. foreign policy in the past, such as its support for the 1973 Chilean coup d'état. From two separate interviews in 2003, Powell stated in one about the 1973 event "I can't justify or explain the actions and decisions that were made at that time. It was a different time. There was a great deal of concern about communism in this part of the world. Communism was a threat to the democracies in this part of the world. It was a threat to the United States."[62] In another interview, however, he also simply stated "With respect to your earlier comment about Chile in the 1970s and what happened with Mr. Allende, it is not a part of American history that we're proud of."[63]
Powell announced his resignation as Secretary of State on November 15, 2004. According to The Washington Post, he had been asked to resign by the president's chief of staff, Andrew Card.[58] Powell announced that he would stay on until the end of Bush's first term or until his replacement's confirmation by Congress. The following day, Bush nominated National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice as Powell's successor. News of Powell's leaving the Administration spurred mixed reactions from politicians around the world — some upset at the loss of a statesman seen as a moderating factor within the Bush administration, but others hoping for Powell's successor to wield more influence within the cabinet.
In mid-November, Powell stated that he had seen new evidence suggesting that Iran was adapting missiles for a nuclear delivery system.[64] The accusation came at the same time as the settlement of an agreement between Iran, the IAEA, and the European Union.
On December 31, 2004, Powell rang in the New Year by pressing a button in Times Square with New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg to initiate the ball drop and 60 second countdown, ushering in the year 2005. He appeared on the networks that were broadcasting New Year's Eve specials and talked about this honor, as well as being a native of New York City.[65]
Life after diplomatic service
After retiring from the role of Secretary of State, Powell returned to private life. In April 2005, he was privately telephoned by Republican senators Lincoln Chafee and Chuck Hagel,[66] at which time Powell expressed reservations and mixed reviews about the nomination of John R. Bolton as ambassador to the United Nations, but refrained from advising the senators to oppose Bolton (Powell had clashed with Bolton during Bush's first term).[67] The decision was viewed as potentially dealing significant damage to Bolton's chances of confirmation. Bolton was put into the position via a recess appointment because of the strong opposition in the Senate.




Powell with Ban Ki-moon, 2004.


On April 28, 2005, an opinion piece in The Guardian by Sidney Blumenthal (a former top aide to President Bill Clinton) claimed that Powell was in fact "conducting a campaign" against Bolton because of the acrimonious battles they had had while working together, which among other things had resulted in Powell cutting Bolton out of talks with Iran and Libya after complaints about Bolton's involvement from the British. Blumenthal added that "The foreign relations committee has discovered that Bolton made a highly unusual request and gained access to 10 intercepts by the National Security Agency. Staff members on the committee believe that Bolton was probably spying on Powell, his senior advisors and other officials reporting to him on diplomatic initiatives that Bolton opposed."[68]
In July 2005, Powell joined Kleiner, Perkins, Caufield & Byers, a well-known Silicon Valley venture capital firm, with the title of "strategic limited partner."
In September 2005, Powell criticized the response to Hurricane Katrina.[69] Powell said that thousands of people were not properly protected, but because they were poor rather than because they were black.




Powell walks with newly crowned King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Vice President Dick Cheney, and former President George H. W. Bush, Saudi Arabia, August 2005.


On January 5, 2006, he participated in a meeting at the White House of former Secretaries of Defense and State to discuss United States foreign policy with Bush administration officials. In September 2006, Powell sided with more moderate Senate Republicans in supporting more rights for detainees and opposing President Bush's terrorism bill. He backed Senators John Warner, John McCain and Lindsey Graham in their statement that U.S. military and intelligence personnel in future wars will suffer for abuses committed in 2006 by the U.S. in the name of fighting terrorism. Powell stated that "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of [America's] fight against terrorism."[70]
Also in 2006, Powell began appearing as a speaker at a series of motivational events called Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani. In his speeches for the tour, he openly criticized the Bush Administration on a number of issues. Powell has been the recipient of mild criticism for his role with Get Motivated which has been called a "get-rich-quick-without-much-effort, feel-good schemology."[71]
In 2007 he joined the Board of Directors of Steve Case's new company Revolution Health. Powell also serves on the Council on Foreign Relations Board of directors.[72]
Powell, in honor of Martin Luther King Day, dropped the ceremonial first puck at a New York Islanders ice hockey game at Nassau Coliseum on January 21, 2008. On November 11, 2008, Powell again dropped the puck in recognition of Military Appreciation Day and Veterans Day.[73][74]
Recently, Powell has encouraged young people to continue to use new technologies to their advantage in the future. In a speech at the Center for Strategic and International Studies to a room of young professionals, he said, "That's your generation...a generation that is hard-wired digital, a generation that understands the power of the information revolution and how it is transforming the world. A generation that you represent, and you're coming together to share; to debate; to decide; to connect with each other."[75] At this event, he encouraged the next generation to involve themselves politically on the upcoming Next America Project, which uses online debate to provide policy recommendations for the upcoming administration.
In 2008, Powell served as a spokesperson for National Mentoring Month, a campaign held each January to recruit volunteer mentors for at-risk youth.[76]
Soon after Barack Obama's 2008 election, Powell began being mentioned as a possible cabinet member.[77] He was not nominated.
In September 2009, Powell advised President Obama against surging US forces in Afghanistan.[78] The president announced the surge the following December.
On March 14, 2014, Salesforce.com announced that Powell had joined its Board of Directors.[79]
Political views
A liberal Republican, Powell is well known for his willingness to support liberal or centrist causes.[80] He is pro-choice regarding abortion, and in favor of "reasonable" gun control.[80][clarification needed] He stated in his autobiography that he supports affirmative action that levels the playing field, without giving a leg up to undeserving persons because of racial issues. Powell was also instrumental in the 1993 implementation of the military's don't ask, don't tell policy,[80] though he later supported its repeal as proposed by Robert Gates and Admiral Mike Mullen in January 2010, saying "circumstances had changed".[81]

External video

 Booknotes interview with Powell on My American Journey, January 7, 1996, C-SPAN


The Vietnam War had a profound effect on Powell's views of the proper use of military force. These views are described in detail in the autobiography My American Journey. The Powell Doctrine, as the views became known, was a central component of U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf War (the first U.S. war in Iraq) and U.S. invasion of Afghanistan (the overthrow of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan following the September 11 attacks). The hallmark of both operations was strong international cooperation, and the use of overwhelming military force.
Powell was the subject of controversy in 2004 when, in a conversation with British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, he reportedly referred to neoconservatives within the Bush administration as "fucking crazies."[82] In addition to being reported in the press (although the expletive was generally censored in the U.S. press), the quotation was used by James Naughtie in his book, The Accidental American: Tony Blair and the Presidency, and by Chris Patten in his book, Cousins and Strangers: America, Britain, and Europe in a New Century.
In a September 2006 letter to Sen. John McCain, General Powell expressed opposition to President Bush's push for military tribunals of those formerly and currently classified as enemy combatants. Specifically, he objected to the effort in Congress to "redefine Common Article 3 of the Geneva Convention." He also asserted: "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of our fight against terrorism."[83]
Powell endorsed President Obama in 2008 and again in 2012. When asked why he is still a Republican on Meet the Press he said, "I’m still a Republican. And I think the Republican Party needs me more than the Democratic Party needs me. And you can be a Republican and still feel strongly about issues such as immigration, and improving our education system, and doing something about some of the social problems that exist in our society and our country. I don’t think there's anything inconsistent with this." [84]
Views on the Iraq War
While Powell was wary of a military solution, he supported the decision to invade Iraq after the Bush administration concluded that diplomatic efforts had failed. After his departure from the State Department, Powell repeatedly emphasized his continued support for American involvement in the Iraq War.
At the 2007 Aspen Ideas Festival in Colorado,[85] Powell revealed that he had spent two and a half hours explaining to President Bush "the consequences of going into an Arab country and becoming the occupiers." During this discussion, he insisted that the U.S. appeal to the United Nations first, but if diplomacy failed, he would support the invasion: "I also had to say to him that you are the President, you will have to make the ultimate judgment, and if the judgment is this isn't working and we don't think it is going to solve the problem, then if military action is undertaken I'm with you, I support you."[86]
In a 2008 interview on CNN, Powell reiterated his support for the 2003 decision to invade Iraq in the context of his endorsement of Barack Obama, stating: "My role has been very, very straightforward. I wanted to avoid a war. The president [Bush] agreed with me. We tried to do that. We couldn't get it through the U.N. and when the president made the decision, I supported that decision. And I've never blinked from that. I've never said I didn't support a decision to go to war."[87]
Powell's position on the Iraq War troop surge of 2007 has been less consistent. In December 2006, he expressed skepticism that the strategy would work and whether the U.S. military had enough troops to carry it out successfully. He stated: "I am not persuaded that another surge of troops into Baghdad for the purposes of suppressing this communitarian violence, this civil war, will work."[88] Following his endorsement of Barack Obama in October 2008, however, Powell praised General David Petraeus and U.S. troops, as well as the Iraqi government, concluding that "it's starting to turn around."[87] By mid-2009, he had concluded a surge of U.S. forces in Iraq should have come sooner, perhaps in late 2003.[89] Throughout this period, Powell consistently argued that Iraqi political progress was essential, not just military force.
Role in presidential election of 2008
Powell donated the maximum allowable amount to John McCain's campaign in the summer of 2007[90] and in early 2008, his name was listed as a possible running mate for Republican nominee McCain's bid during the 2008 U.S. presidential election.[91] However, on October 19, 2008, Powell announced his endorsement of Barack Obama during a Meet the Press interview, citing "his ability to inspire, because of the inclusive nature of his campaign, because he is reaching out all across America, because of who he is and his rhetorical abilities", in addition to his "style and substance." He additionally referred to Obama as a "transformational figure".[92][93] Powell further questioned McCain's judgment in appointing Sarah Palin as the vice presidential candidate, stating that despite the fact that she is admired, "now that we have had a chance to watch her for some seven weeks, I don't believe she's ready to be president of the United States, which is the job of the vice president." He said that Obama's choice for vice-president, Joe Biden, was ready to be president. He also added that he was "troubled" by the "false intimations that Obama was Muslim." Powell stated that "[Obama] is a Christian—he's always been a Christian... But the really right answer is, what if he is? Is there something wrong with being a Muslim in this country? The answer's no, that's not America." Powell then mentioned Kareem Rashad Sultan Khan, a Muslim American soldier in the U.S. Army who served and died in the Iraq War. He later stated, "Over the last seven weeks, the approach of the Republican Party has become narrower and narrower [...] I look at these kind of approaches to the campaign, and they trouble me."[92][93] Powell concluded his Sunday morning talk show comments, "It isn't easy for me to disappoint Sen. McCain in the way that I have this morning, and I regret that [...] I think we need a transformational figure. I think we need a president who is a generational change and that's why I'm supporting Barack Obama, not out of any lack of respect or admiration for Sen. John McCain."[94] Later in a December 12, 2008, CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Powell reiterated his belief that during the last few months of the campaign, Palin pushed the Republican party further to the right and had a polarizing impact on it.[95]
Views on the Obama administration
In a July 2009 CNN interview with John King, Powell expressed concern over President Obama growing the size of the federal government and the size of the federal budget deficit.[96] In September 2010, he criticized the Obama administration for not focusing "like a razor blade" on the economy and job creation. Powell reiterated that Obama was a "transformational figure."[97] In a video that aired on CNN.com in November 2011, Colin Powell said in reference to Barack Obama, "many of his decisions have been quite sound. The financial system was put back on a stable basis."[98]
On October 25, 2012, 12 days before the presidential election, he gave his endorsement to President Obama for re-election during a broadcast of CBS This Morning. He cited success and forward progress in foreign and domestic policy arenas under the Obama Administration, and made the following statement: "I voted for him in 2008 and I plan to stick with him in 2012 and I'll be voting for he [sic] and for Vice President Joe Biden next month."
As additional reason for his endorsement, Powell cited the changing positions and perceived lack of thoughtfulness of Mitt Romney on foreign affairs, and a concern for the validity of Romney's economic plans.[99]
In an interview with ABC's Diane Sawyer and George Stephanopoulos during ABC's coverage of President Obama's second inauguration, Powell criticized members of the Republican Party who "demonize[d] the president". He called on GOP leaders to publicly denounce such talk.[100]
2016 presidential election
Powell has been very vocal on the state of the Republican party. Speaking at a Washington Ideas forum in early October 2015, he warned the audience that the Republican party had begun a move to the fringe right, lessening the chances of a Republican White House in the future. He also remarked on Republican presidential contender Donald Trump's statements regarding immigrants, noting that there were many immigrants working in Trump hotels.[101]
In March 2016, Powell denounced the "nastiness" of the 2016 Republican primaries during an interview on CBS This Morning. He compared the race to a "reality show", and stated that the campaign had gone "into the mud".[102]
In August 2016, Powell accused the Clinton campaign of trying to pin Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton's email controversy on him. Speaking to People magazine, Powell said, "The truth is, she was using [the private email server] for a year before I sent her a memo telling her what I did."[103]
On September 13, 2016, emails were obtained that revealed Powell's private communications regarding both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton. Powell privately reiterated his comments regarding Clinton's email scandal, writing, "I have told Hillary's minions repeatedly that they are making a mistake trying to drag me in, yet they still try," and complaining that "Hillary’s mafia keeps trying to suck me into it" in another email.[104] In another email discussing Clinton's controversy, Powell noted that she should have told everyone what she did "two years ago", and said that she has not "been covering herself with glory." Writing on the 2012 Benghazi attack controversy surrounding Clinton, Powell said to then U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice, "Benghazi is a stupid witch hunt." Commenting on Clinton in a general sense, Powell mused that "Everything [Clinton] touches she kind of screws up with hubris", and in another email stated "I would rather not have to vote for her, although she is a friend I respect."[105]
Powell referred to Donald Trump as a "national disgrace", with "no sense of shame". He wrote candidly of Trump's role in the birther movement, which he referred to as "racist". Powell suggested that the media ignore Trump, saying, "To go on and call him an idiot just emboldens him." The emails were obtained by the media as the result of a hack.[106]
Powell endorsed Clinton on October 25, 2016, stating it was "because I think she's qualified, and the other gentleman is not qualified."[107]
Despite not running in the election, Powell received three electoral votes for president from faithless electors in Washington who had pledged to vote for Clinton, coming in third overall.[108] After Barack Obama, Powell was only the second African American to receive electoral votes in a presidential election. He was also the first Republican since 1984 to receive electoral votes from Washington in a presidential election, as well as the first Republican African American to do so.
Personal life
Powell married Alma Johnson on August 25, 1962. Their son, Michael Powell, was the chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) from 2001 to 2005. His daughters are Linda Powell, an actress, and Annemarie Powell. As a hobby, Powell restores old Volvo and Saab cars.[109][110] In 2013, he faced questions about a relationship with a Romanian diplomat, after a hacked AOL email account had been made public. He acknowledged a "very personal" email relationship but denied further involvement.[111]
Civilian awards and honors
Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medals of Freedom (the second with distinction), the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal, and the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country.

In 1988, Powell received the Academy of Achievement's Golden Plate Award.
In 1990, Powell received the U.S. Senator John Heinz Award for Greatest Public Service by an Elected or Appointed Official, an award given out annually by Jefferson Awards.[112]
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom by President George H. W. Bush.
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Spingarn Medal from the NAACP.[113]
In 1991, Powell was inducted into the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans,[114] which "honors the achievements of outstanding individuals in U.S. society who have succeeded in spite of adversity and of encouraging young people to pursue their dreams through higher education."
On September 30, 1993, Powell was awarded his second Presidential Medal of Freedom with distinction by President Bill Clinton.[35]
On November 9, 1993, Powell was awarded the second Ronald Reagan Freedom Award, by President Ronald Reagan. Powell served as Reagan's National Security Advisor from 1987–1989.[115]
On December 15, 1993, Colin Powell was created an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom.
In 1998, he was awarded the prestigious Sylvanus Thayer Award by the United States Military Academy for his commitment to the ideals of "Duty, Honor, Country."
The 2002 Liberty Medal was awarded to Colin Powell on July 4 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. In his acceptance speech, Powell reminded Americans that "It is for America, the Land of the Free and the Home of the Brave, to help freedom ring across the globe, unto all the peoples thereof. That is our solemn obligation, and we will not fail."[116]





Coat of arms



The Coat of Arms of Colin Powell was granted by the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh on February 4, 2004. Technically the grant was to Powell's father (a British subject) to be passed on by descent. Scotland's King of Arms is traditionally responsible for granting arms to Commonwealth citizens of Scottish descent. Blazoned as:

Azure, two swords in saltire points downwards between four mullets Argent, on a chief of the Second a lion passant Gules. On a wreath of the Liveries is set for Crest the head of an American bald-headed eagle erased Proper. And in an escrol over the same this motto, "DEVOTED TO PUBLIC SERVICE."

The swords and stars refer to the former general's career, as does the crest, which is the badge of the 101st Airborne (which he served as a brigade commander in the mid-1970s). The lion may be an allusion to Scotland. The shield can be shown surrounded by the insignia of an honorary Knight Commander of the Most Honorable Order of the Bath (KCB), an award the General received after the first Gulf War.
In 2005 Powell received the Bishop John T. Walker Distinguished Humanitarian Service Award for his contributions to Africa.
AARP honored Powell with the 2006 AARP Andrus Award, the Association's highest honor. This award, named in honor of AARP's founder, Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, is presented biennially to distinguished individuals who have generated positive social change in the world, and whose work and achievements reflect AARP's vision of bringing lifetimes of experience and leadership to serve all generations.
In 2005 Colin and Alma Powell were awarded the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service by the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution.
Colin Powell was initiated as an honorary brother in Sigma Phi Epsilon.
Powell is a recipient of the Silver Buffalo Award, the highest adult award given by the Boy Scouts of America.
A street in Gelnhausen, Germany was named after him: "General-Colin-Powell-Straße".[117]
In 2002, scholar Molefi Kete Asante listed Colin Powell on his list of 100 Greatest African Americans.[118]
In 2009, an elementary school named for Colin Powell opened in El Paso. It is in the El Paso Independent School District, located on Fort Bliss property, and serves a portion of Fort Bliss.[119] There is also a street in El Paso named for Powell, Colin Powell Drive.
Powell is an Honorary Board Member of the humanitarian organization Wings of Hope[120]
Since 2006, he is the chairman of the Board of Trustees for Eisenhower Fellowships[121]
In 2006, The Harry S. Truman Research Institute for the Advancement of Peace at The Hebrew University of Jerusalem awarded Colin Powell with the Truman Peace Prize for his efforts to conduct the "war against terrorism", through diplomatic as well as military means, and to avert regional and civil conflicts in many parts of the world.[122]
In September 2012 Union City, New Jersey opened Colin Powell Elementary School, which was named after Powell, and dedicated the school on February 7, 2013, with governor Chris Christie in attendance.[123] Powell himself visited the school on June 4, 2013.[124]
In 2014, Colin Powell was named to the National Board of Advisors for High Point University.[125]

See also


Biography portal
United States Army portal
Military of the United States portal



List of African-American United States Cabinet Secretaries
Plame affair
Pottery Barn rule
Republican and conservative support for Barack Obama in 2008

References


^ "Biographies of the Secretary of State:Colin Luther Powell". U.S. Department of State, Office of the Historian. Retrieved November 16, 2015. 
^ Preferred pronunciation rhymes with "bowel", not "bowl" (as in Charles Powell, Baron Powell of Bayswater) – see Alexander Chancellor, "You Say Tomato", New Yorker. August 9, 1993, p. 27.
^ The first African American secretary of state, Colin Powell, The African American Registry.
^ Biographies – Colin Powell: United States Secretary of State, African American History Month, US Department of Defense.
^ Colin Powell, Britannica Online Encyclopedia.
^ Profile: Colin Powell, BBC News.
^ a b c d "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell". The White House. Retrieved 24 December 2016.   This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.
^ Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Colin Powell". wargs.com. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Branigan, Tania (May 12, 2004). "Colin Powell claims Scottish coat of arms". The Guardian. London. 
^ "Colin Powell's Scottish Ancestry". Eastman's Online Genealogy Newsletter. 9 (20). May 17, 2004. 
^ CNN staff (March 30, 2016). "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. Retrieved September 30, 2016. 
^ Daly, Michael (August 2, 2000). "Powell's Old Nabe Boss a Big Backer". New York Daily News. Retrieved October 19, 2008. Powell explained that he had joined ROTC. He became an officer after graduation, leaving Sickser's with a smattering of Yiddish... 
^ "Former Secretary of State Gen. Colin Powell and Mario Cuomo, former governor of New York State, each a former Shabbos goy, both share fond recollections of their youth, when they were uniquely qualified to lend a Jewish neighbor a hand." Fertig, Avi. "Glatt Kosher Adventure To The Land Down Under", The Jewish Press, November 21, 2007.
^ a b "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. April 2, 2017. Education: City College of New York, B.S. in geology,1958; George Washington University, M.B.A.,1971; National War College, 1976 
^ "About Gen. Colin L. Powell, USA (Ret.)". The Colin Powell School for Civic and Global Leadership, The City College of New York. He attended New York City public schools and the City College of New York where he earned a B.S. in Geology. 
^ Schwab, Nikki (May 30, 2012). "Colin Powell: bad student". Washington Examiner. My cousins became lawyers and doctors and judges and I just sort of hung around," he recalled. "I had a straight C average all the way through high school and the City College of New York — I'm not sure how I got in. 
^ "Major Player: Gen. Colin L. Powell (Ret.)". Washington Post. July 28, 2000. Retrieved April 30, 2010. 
^ "Colin (Luther) Powell Biography (1937– )". The Biography Channel. A&E Television Networks. Retrieved May 31, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell Interview". achievement.org. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell (biography)". The White House. April 29, 2003. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b c "Colin Powell". CNN. 1996. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ Kearny, Cresson H. (1996). Jungle Snafus...And Remedies. Cave Junction, Oregon: Oregon Institute of Science & Medicine. p. 179. ISBN 978-1-884067-10-5. OCLC 41447083. 
^ Finlayson, Reggie (2003). Colin Powell. Biography (A & E). Twenty-First Century Books. p. 55. ISBN 9780822549666. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ "Interview on CNN's Larry King Live". New York: U.S. Department of State. May 4, 2004. Archived from the original on January 10, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brown, Warren; Wagner, Heather Lehr (1 Jan 2009). Colin Powell: Soldier and Statesman. Infobase Publishing. p. 41,43. 
^ "Online NewsHour: Colin Powell". Pbs.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "The 14 Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff". Joint History Office, U.S. Department of Defense. American Forces Press Service. August 10, 1999. Retrieved April 24, 2008. 
^ O'Sullivan, Christopher (2010). Colin Powell: A Political Biography. Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers. p. 100. ISBN 978-0-7425-5187-9. 
^ "Reluctant warrior", The Observer, September 30, 2001.
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (March 1991). "U.S. Sen. Kasten Pushing Effort To Award Powell With Historic Fifth Star". Jet. 79 (23). ISSN 0021-5996. Retrieved February 21, 2011. ...there is a movement afoot in the U.S. Senate to award an historic fifth star to the nation's first Black Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Colin L. Powell for his military proficiency. 
^ Italia, Bob (1991). Armed Forces: War in the Gulf. Abdo & Daughters. pp. 44–6. ISBN 978-1-56239-026-6. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Others want to make him a five-star general. [...] Congress is talking about giving him a fifth silver star, which is very rare. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (1999). All Too Human: A Political Education. Thorndike Press. pp. 330–1. ISBN 978-0-7862-2016-8. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Mack asked me to secretly research the procedure for awarding a fifth star to a general. [...] If Powell did challenge Clinton, the fifth star would forestall criticism of the general's military record. 
^ Hamilton, Nigel (2007). Bill Clinton: Mastering the Presidency. PublicAffairs. pp. 190, 399. ISBN 978-1-58648-516-0. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Moreover, for the very reason he admired Colin Powell as the most distinguished living black American, Clinton also feared the general as a potential rival. [...] Bill Clinton had denied Powell his rightful fifth star... 
^ Halberstam, David (2001). War in a Time of Peace: Bush, Clinton, and the Generals. Scribner. p. 190. ISBN 978-0-7432-0212-1. Retrieved February 22, 2011. They checked it out and found that the last general to get a fifth star was Omar Bradley forty-three years earlier. Powell, they decided, was not Bradley. Besides, as George Stephanopoulos noted, if they gave him one more star, it might help him one day politically. 
^ a b Clinton, W. J. (September 30, 1993). "Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia". University of California, Santa Barbara: The American Presidency Project. Retrieved September 18, 2016. In recognition of your legacy and service, of your courage and accomplishment, today, General Powell, I was honored to present you with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, with distinction. I want to tell all those here in attendance that this was the second Medal of Freedom you have received, the first from President Bush in 1991. And today, you became only the second American citizen in the history of the Republic to be the recipient of two Medals of Freedom. 
^ "Remarks With Bulgarian President Georgi Purvanov At Award Ceremony for the Stara Planina First Order Medal". Presidential Palace, Coat of Arms Hall, Sofia, Bulgaria: U.S. Department of State. December 7, 2004. 
^ "Parvanov-Powell". President of the Republic of Bulgaria. December 7, 2004. President Georgi Parvanov awarded US Secretary of State Colin Powell with the highest Bulgarian order "Stara Planina" for his extraordinary services to the advancement of Bulgarian-American relations and in connection with the 100th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between Bulgaria and the United States. 
^ Powell, Colin (2012). It Worked for Me. HarperCollins. pp. 3–4. ISBN 978-0-06-213512-4. 
^ McClimon, Tim (27 August 2012). "Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership". American Express. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ "Can we apply Colin Powell's 13 rules?" (PDF). Texas Child Care Quarterly. Summer 2012. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ Schram, Martin (January 21, 1995). "Don't Count Out Colin Powell". The Seattle Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Van Dyk, Ted (September 6, 1990). "Will Powell Run With Bush in '92?". The New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Lusane C. Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice: Foreign Policy, Race and the New American Century. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006, ISBN 0-275-98309-9, p. 46.
^ Apple, R. W. (October 28, 1995). "Life in Iowa May Not Have Changed, But the Political Turf Is Another Story". The New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Berke, Richard L. (October 19, 1995). "New Hampshire Poll Finds Powell With an Edge". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Clines, Francis X. (November 9, 1995). "The Powell Decision: The Announcement". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Plissner, Martin (February 7, 2007). "Ready for Obama Already". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ "NH US Vice President – R Primary Race". Our Campaigns. Feb 20, 1996. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Colin L. Powell Center for Public Policy". Retrieved 16 February 2013. 
^ "How Mccain Does It". 2000-03-06. Retrieved 2016-08-12. 
^ Kessler, Glenn (July 14, 2004). "Powell Flies in the Face of Tradition; The Secretary of State Is Least Traveled in 30 Years". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Warrick, Joby (April 12, 2006). "Lacking Biolabs, Trailers Carried Case for War; Administration Pushed Notion of Banned Iraqi Weapons Despite Evidence to Contrary". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Powell, Secretary Colin L. (February 5, 2003). "Remarks to the United Nations Security Council". New York City: U.S. Department of State. Archived from the original on January 9, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Lawless, Jill (February 7, 2003). "U.S. Scholar Uncredited in Iraq Report". Associated Press. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "UK accused of lifting dossier text". CNN. February 7, 2003. 
^ Charlie Rose. charlierose.com. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ Miller, Greg (July 15, 2004). "Flaws Cited in Powell's U.N. Speech on Iraq". Los Angeles Times. reprinted by CommonDreams.org. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b DeYoung, Karen (October 1, 2006). "Falling on His Sword: Colin Powell's most significant moment turned out to be his lowest". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell on Iraq, Race, and Hurricane Relief". ABC News: 20/20. September 8, 2005. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brancaccio, David (February 3, 2006). "Iraq Pre-War Intelligence". NOW. PBS. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Pincus, Walter (February 14, 2004). "Support for Intelligence Plan". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Remarks at the 2003 Groundhog Job Shadow Day Program, Secretary Colin L. Powell, Remarks and question and answer session with students, Washington, DC, January 31, 2003, excerpt on 1973 Chile coup, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell, Interview On Black Entertainment Television's Youth Town Hall, February 20, 2003, excerpt on 1973 U.S. covert action in Chile, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Sciolino, Elaine (November 18, 2004). "Exiles Add to Claims on Iran Nuclear Arms". New York Times. Retrieved February 8, 2007. 
^ Anderson, Cooper (December 31, 2004). "Transcripts: New Year's Eve Special". CNN. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ VandeHei, Jim; Robin Wright (April 22, 2005). "Powell Playing Quiet Role in Bolton Battle". Washington Post. 
^ Borger, Julian (April 23, 2005). "Powell's remarks harm Bolton's chances of UN job". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (April 28, 2005). "The good soldier's revenge". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Powell criticises storm response". BBC News. September 9, 2005. 
^ "Senators defy Bush on tribunals". BBC News. September 15, 2006. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Wilken, Dennis (September 7, 2008). "Down the Rabbit Hole". American Satellite Magazine. Retrieved October 10, 2008. 
^ "Board of Directors". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved December 6, 2007. 
^ "islanderspointblank.com". islanderspointblank.com. Archived from the original on July 13, 2011. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "nhl.com". nhl.com. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Powell, General Colin L, USA (Ret.) (July 8, 2008). "Keynote Address – A New Vision for America's Future: Young Leaders Shaping an International Agenda". CSIS Launch of Next America. Center for Strategic and International Studies. Archived from the original on July 31, 2008. Retrieved October 20, 2008. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ "Who Mentored Colin Powell?". President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2008. 
^ "Al Gore, Colin Powell, Caroline Kennedy in Obama's Administration? – Washington Whispers". usnews.com. November 11, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell advised against Afghan surge", Politico (September 27, 2009). http://www.politico.com/blogs/laurarozen/0909/Powell_advised_against_Afghan_surge.html
^ Ingrid Lunden. "General Colin Powell Joins Salesforce Board Of Directors, As CRM Giant Zeros In On Public Sector". TechCrunch. AOL. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ a b c Colin Powell's biography from 'On The Issues'.
^ DeYoung, Karen (February 3, 2010). "Colin Powell shifts stance on 'don't ask, don't tell' policy". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2010. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (November 18, 2004). "Colin and the crazies". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Sen. McCain Releases Letter from Gen. Colin Powell", Washington Post (September 14, 2006). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/graphic/2006/09/14/GR2006091400728.html
^ "Colin Powell: Republican Party Needs Me More Than The Democratic Party Needs Me". TheLonelyConservative.com. February 7, 2014. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ See Official website: Aspen Ideas Festival
^ "Conversation with Colin Powell" (PDF). Aspen Ideas Festival. July 2007. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell: Support for Obama doesn't mean Iraq war wrong", CNN (October 19, 2008). http://edition.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/10/19/powell.transcript/
^ James M. Klatell, "Powell: We Are Losing In Iraq", CBS (December 17, 2006). http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/12/17/ftn/main2274583.shtml
^ "Powell says Iraq surge should have come earlier", Seattle Times (July 5, 2009)
^ Henry, Ed (August 9, 2007). "Powell donates to McCain". CNN. Retrieved August 9, 2007. 
^ Holland, Steve (March 5, 2008). "McCain now has to pick a vice presidential nominee". Boston Globe. Reuters. Retrieved April 14, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell endorses Obama for president; Republican ex-Secretary of State calls Democrat 'transformational figure'". Meet the Press. MSNBC and NBC News. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ a b "Meet the Press' transcript for October 19, 2008". MSNBC. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Ohlemacher, Stephen (October 20, 2008). "Colin Powell endorses Barack Obama for president". USA Today. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell on Rush Limbaugh". CNN. July 16, 2010. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell airs doubts on Obama agenda". The Washington Times. July 3, 2009. Retrieved September 17, 2010. 
^ Carrie Budoff Brown, "Colin Powell critical of President Obama", Politico (September 19, 2010). http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0910/42381.html
^ "Video". CNN. 
^ [1] retrieved October 25, 2012.
^ "ABC News". Retrieved 2013-01-22. 
^ https://www.yahoo.com/news/colin-powell-slams-donald-trumps-immigration-plan-163454530.html. Colin Powell slams Donald Trump's immigration plan. October 1, 2015. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-gop-race_us_56dda980e4b0000de405301a Colin Powell: The GOP Race Has ‘Gone Into The Mud’. The Huffington Post. March 7, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.people.com/article/colin-powell-hillary-clinton-pinning-email-scandal-on-him Colin Powell Says Hillary Clinton's 'People Have Been Trying to Pin' Email Scandal on Him. People Magazine. August 21, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/09/13/colin-powell-hacked-emails/90341788/
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-hillary-clinton_us_57d96524e4b09d7a6880bf1c Colin Powell Attacked Hillary Clinton’s ‘Hubris’ In Leaked Emails. The Huffington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14th, 2016.
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/09/14/here-are-the-juiciest-colin-powell-comments-about-trump-and-clinton-from-his-leaked-emails/ Here are the juiciest Colin Powell comments about Trump and Clinton from his hacked emails. The Washington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ Colin Powell joins 67 Republican politicians, donors and officials who are supporting Hillary Clinton October 25, 2016
^ Four Washington electors break ranks and don’t vote for Clinton
^ Powell, Colin (October 17, 2005). "Interview transcript". Larry King Live (Interview). Interview with Larry King. CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Powell, Colin (August 2, 2004). "A Conversation with Colin Powell". The Atlantic (Interview). Interview with P. J. O'Rourke. Washington, D.C. Archived from the original on February 4, 2013. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Colin Powell insists ‘there was no affair then and there is not one now’ with diplomat. NY Daily News. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ National Winners | public service awards. Jefferson Awards.org. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ "Spingarn Medal Winners: 1915 to Today". naacp.org. Archived from the original on May 5, 2014. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Colin L. Powell". The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans. n.d. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "The Ronald Reagan Freedom Award". Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation & Library. Archived from the original on October 16, 2006. 
^ Powell, Colin (July 4, 2002). "2002 Liberty Medal Acceptance Speech". Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: National Constitution Center. 
^ "GEN Colin Powell". 2016-03-08. Retrieved 2017-07-01. 
^ Asante, Molefi Kete (2002). 100 Greatest African Americans: A Biographical Encyclopedia. Amherst, New York. Prometheus Books. ISBN 1-57392-963-8.
^ According to the Fort Bliss Bugle, as of 10/24/2013, nine schools have been named for Colin Powell.
^ ":.: The Official Wings Of Hope Homepage :.:". Wings-of-hope.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ efworld
^ "Powell: Friendship with Israel means friendship with Arabs" (PDF). afhu.org. 
^ McDonald, Terrence T. (February 8, 2013). "Gov. Christie visits Union City school opening, hears Democratic mayor praise him". NJ.com.
^ Wenik, Ian (June 9, 2013). "Saluting the general". The Union City Reporter. pp. 1 and 11.
^ "High Point University National Board of Advisors". 


Further reading

LaFeber, Walter, "The Rise and Fall of Colin Powell and the Powell Doctrine", Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Spring 2009), 71–93.
Powell, Colin A. and Joseph Persico, My American Journey, Ballantine Books, 1995. ISBN 0-345-40728-8.
Excerpts from My American Journey, TIME, September 18, 1995.
DeYoung, Karen, Soldier: The Life of Colin Powell, Alfred A. Knopf, 2006. ISBN 1-4000-4170-8.
"Alex Haley's Other Roots: African-Americans with Irish Ancestors". February 25, 2006. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
Powell, Colin; Koltz, Tony (2012). It Worked for Me: Lessons in Leadership and Life. Harper. ISBN 978-0062135124. 

External links

Find more aboutColin Powellat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Appearances on C-SPAN
Colin Powell on Charlie Rose
Colin Powell on IMDb
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The New York Times. 
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The Guardian.  
Works by or about Colin Powell in libraries (WorldCat catalog)
Colin Powell: America's Best Leaders from U.S. News & World Report
Issue positions and quotes at On the Issues
Colin Powell Quotes
African Americans in the U.S. Army
The American Presidency Project: Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia, September 30, 1993
Address to the National Summit on Africa, Washington, D.C., February 2000
Remarks to the United Nations Security Council, February 5, 2003
Complete text, audio, video of Colin Powell's Remarks to the UN Security Council AmericanRhetoric.com
"Curveball" Revelations Indicate falsified info used to start Iraq war and esp used for Powell's UN presentation on Iraq WMDs, November 5, 2007
Colin Powell demands answers over Curveball's WMD lies, Ed Pikington, Helen Pidd and Martin Chulov, The Guardian, February 16, 2011
WARGS: Ancestry of Gen. Colin Powell



Political offices


Preceded by
Peter Rodman
Deputy National Security Advisor
1987
Succeeded by
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci
National Security Advisor
1987–1989
Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright
United States Secretary of State
2001–2005
Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


Military offices


Preceded by
William Crowe
Chair of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
1989–1993
Succeeded by
David Jeremiah
Acting


Awards and achievements


Preceded by
Mikhail Gorbachev
Recipient of the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award
1993
Succeeded by
Yitzhak Rabin


Party political offices


Preceded by
Susan Molinari
Keynote Speaker of the Republican National Convention
2000
Served alongside: John McCain
Succeeded by
Zell Miller








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Cabinet of President George W. Bush (2001–09)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Colin Powell (2001–05)
Condoleezza Rice (2005–09)








Secretary of the Treasury



Paul H. O'Neill (2001–02)
John W. Snow (2003–06)
Henry Paulson (2006–09)





Secretary of Defense



Donald Rumsfeld (2001–06)
Robert Gates (2006–09)





Attorney General



John Ashcroft (2001–05)
Alberto Gonzales (2005–07)
Michael Mukasey (2007–09)





Secretary of the Interior



Gale Norton (2001–06)
Dirk Kempthorne (2006–09)





Secretary of Agriculture



Ann Veneman (2001–05)
Mike Johanns (2005–07)
Ed Schafer (2008–09)





Secretary of Commerce



Donald Evans (2001–05)
Carlos Gutierrez (2005–09)





Secretary of Labor



Elaine Chao (2001–09)





Secretary of Health and
Human Services



Tommy Thompson (2001–05)
Mike Leavitt (2005–09)





Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development



Mel Martinez (2001–03)
Alphonso Jackson (2003–08)
Steve Preston (2008–09)





Secretary of Transportation



Norman Mineta (2001–06)
Mary E. Peters (2006–09)





Secretary of Energy



Spencer Abraham (2001–05)
Samuel Bodman (2005–09)





Secretary of Education



Rod Paige (2001–05)
Margaret Spellings (2005–09)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Anthony Principi (2001–05)
Jim Nicholson (2005–07)
James Peake (2007–09)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Tom Ridge (2003–05)
Michael Chertoff (2005–09)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Dick Cheney (2001–09)





White House Chief of Staff



Andrew Card (2001–06)
Joshua Bolten (2006–09)





Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency



Christine Todd Whitman (2001–03)
Mike Leavitt (2003–05)
Stephen L. Johnson (2005–09)





Director of the Office of
Management and Budget



Mitch Daniels (2001–03)
Joshua Bolten (2003–06)
Rob Portman (2006–07)
Jim Nussle (2007–09)





Director of National Drug
Control Policy



John P. Walters (2001–09)





Trade Representative



Robert Zoellick (2001–05)
Rob Portman (2005–06)
Susan Schwab (2006–09)













Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff









Bradley
Radford
Twining
Lemnitzer
Taylor
Wheeler
Moorer
Brown
Jones
Vessey
Crowe
Powell
Jeremiah (acting)
Shalikashvili
Shelton
Myers
Pace
Mullen
Dempsey
Dunford















v
t
e


Assistants to the President for National Security Affairs






Cutler
Anderson
Jackson
Cutler
Gray
Bundy
Rostow
Kissinger
Scowcroft
Brzezinski
Allen
Clark
McFarlane
Poindexter
Carlucci
Powell
Scowcroft
Lake
Berger
C. Rice
Hadley
Jones
Donilon
S. Rice
Flynn
Kellogg (acting)
McMaster















v
t
e


Recipients of the Soldier's Medal






Marty Allen
Glenn Andreotta
Clift Andrus
Aaron Bank
James Leroy Bondsteel
Leonard Boswell
Allison Brooks
William Francis Buckley
Max Cleland
Lawrence Colburn
John Thomas Corley
Wayne A. Downing
Theodore Leslie Futch
John Galvin
Elmer Gedeon
Carl Genian
Hershel W. Gober
John F. Goodman
David E. Grange Jr.
Ed Grady
Edith Ellen Greenwood
Francis Grevemberg
Bo Gritz
William W. Hartzog
Mike Hayden
Anthony Herbert
Patrick J. Hessian
Don Holleder
Bob Hoover
Eli D. Hoyle
Otto Kerner Jr.
Darwin K. Kyle
Richard L. Lawson
Reis Leming
Charles Andrew MacGillivary
William A. Matheny
Charles J. McDonnell
Jack N. Merritt
Leo J. Meyer
Henry Mucci
José Antonio Muñiz
Thomas Alexander Parrott
Frank D. Peregory
Colin Powell
Edwin W. Rawlings
Richard Scholtes
Preston Schoyer
Stephen Silvasy Jr.
John K. Singlaub
Alek Skarlatos
Christopher Speer
Donn A. Starry
Joseph Warren Stilwell Jr.
Thomas Tackaberry
Hugh Thompson Jr.
Clarence L. Tinker
Alfred Valenzuela
Leon L. Van Autreve
David Wade
Ron Welch
Samuel Tankersley Williams
Walter K. Wilson Jr.






Names are in alphabetical order







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 79113153
LCCN: n87926095
ISNI: 0000 0001 0858 8433
GND: 119077817
SUDOC: 073950408
BNF: cb12496187m (data)
NDL: 00515602
NKC: jo2003163174
IATH: w68g9rsz










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Colin_Powell&oldid=790924136"					
Categories: 1937 birthsLiving people21st-century American politicians21st-century American writersAfrican-American diplomatsAfrican-American members of the Cabinet of the United StatesAfrican-American military personnelAfrican-American politiciansAfrican-American writersAmerican EpiscopaliansAmerican male writersAmerican memoiristsAmerican military personnel of the Gulf WarAmerican military personnel of the Vietnam WarAmerican people of Jamaican descentAmerican people of Scottish descentAmerican political writersAmerican politicians of Jamaican descentChairmen of the Joint Chiefs of StaffCity College of New York alumniCongressional Gold Medal recipientsFellows of the United States National Academy of Public AdministrationGeorge W. Bush administration cabinet membersGeorge Washington University School of Business alumniHonorary Knights Commander of the Order of the BathIraq and weapons of mass destructionKleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers peopleLégion d'honneur recipientsMilitary leaders of the Gulf WarMilitary personnel from New York CityMy Lai MassacreNational War College alumniNew York RepublicansPeople from HarlemPeople from the BronxPeople from McLean, VirginiaPershing RiflemenPolitical realistsPresidential Citizens Medal recipientsPresidential Medal of Freedom recipientsReagan administration personnelRecipients of the Air MedalRecipients of the Defense Distinguished Service MedalRecipients of the Defense Superior Service MedalRecipients of the Distinguished Service Medal (US Army)Recipients of the Legion of MeritRecipients of the Order of Saint MauriceRecipients of the Order of Skanderbeg (1990–)Recipients of the Order of Stara PlaninaRecipients of the Soldier's MedalSpingarn Medal winnersUnited States Army Command and General Staff College alumniUnited States Army Command and General Staff College facultyUnited States Army generalsUnited States National Security AdvisorsUnited States Secretaries of StateWhite House FellowsWriters from New York CityHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listWikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleUse mdy dates from March 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from October 2011Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიLatviešuLietuviųमराठीმარგალურიBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng ViệtYorùbá中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 00:21.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 







Security Check Required




FacebookJoin or Log Into Facebook   Email or PhonePasswordForgot account?Log InDo you want to join Facebook?Sign UpSign UpSecurity CheckPlease enter the text belowCan't read the text above?Try another text or an audio captchaText in the box:What's this?Security CheckThis is a standard security test that we use to prevent spammers from creating fake accounts and spamming users.SubmitEnglish (US)EspañolFrançais (France)中文(简体)العربيةPortuguês (Brasil)Italiano한국어Deutschहिन्दी日本語MessengerFacebook LitePeoplePlacesGamesLocationsCelebritiesMarketplaceGroupsRecipesMomentsInstagramAboutCreate AdCreate PageDevelopersCareersPrivacyCookiesAd ChoicesTermsSettingsActivity Log Facebook © 2017






Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          










Colin Powell: Kids need structure | TED Talk | TED.com







































































































You have JavaScript disabled
For the best experience, please turn JavaScript on.
Here's how






































				Colin Powell
			

Kids need structure



					1,474,945
					 views

 • 17:46


•

						Subtitles in 28 languages
					







Up next


Details


Discussion






							Details
							About the talk








How can you help kids get a good start? In this heartfelt and personal talk, Colin Powell, the former U.S. Secretary of State, asks parents, friends and relatives to support children, starting before they even get to primary school, through community and a strong sense of responsibility.


About the speaker





Colin Powell
·
Former U.S. Secretary of State

General Colin Powell was the first African-American to serve as U.S. Secretary of State.


General Colin Powell was the first African-American to serve as U.S. Secretary of State.






















Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Colin Powell - Wikipedia




















 







Colin Powell

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the American politician. For the British soccer player, see Colin Powell (footballer).


Colin Powell








65th United States Secretary of State


In office
January 20, 2001 – January 26, 2005


President
George W. Bush


Deputy
Richard Armitage


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright


Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff


In office
October 1, 1989 – September 30, 1993


President
George H. W. Bush
Bill Clinton


Deputy
Robert Herres
David Jeremiah


Preceded by
William Crowe


Succeeded by
David Jeremiah (Acting)


16th National Security Advisor


In office
November 23, 1987 – January 20, 1989


President
Ronald Reagan


Deputy
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci


Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft





Personal details


Born
Colin Luther Powell
(1937-04-05) April 5, 1937 (age 80)
New York City, New York, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Alma Johnson (m. 1962)


Education
City University of New York, City College (BS)
George Washington University (MBA)


Signature



Military service


Allegiance
 United States


Service/branch
 United States Army


Years of service
1958–1993


Rank
 General


Unit
 3rd Armored Division
  23rd Infantry Division


Commands
 V Corps
 Joint Chiefs of Staff
  Army Forces Command


Battles/wars
Vietnam War
Invasion of Panama
Persian Gulf War


Colin Luther Powell (/ˈkoʊlᵻn/; born April 5, 1937)[1] is an American statesman and a retired four-star general in the United States Army.[2] Powell was born in Harlem as the son of Jamaican immigrants. During his military career, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989), as Commander of the U.S. Army Forces Command (1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Persian Gulf War. Powell was the first, and so far the only, African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State, serving under U.S. President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2005, the first African American to serve in that position.[3][4][5][6]
Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and was raised in the South Bronx. His parents, Luther and Maud Powell, immigrated to the United States from Jamaica. Powell was educated in the New York City public schools, graduating from the City College of New York (CCNY), where he earned a bachelor's degree in geology. He also participated in ROTC at CCNY and received a commission as an Army second lieutenant upon graduation in June 1958. His further academic achievements include a Master of Business Administration degree from George Washington University.[7]
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, during which time he held myriad command and staff positions and rose to the rank of 4-star General. His last assignment, from October 1, 1989 to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. He also formulated the Powell Doctrine.[7]
Following his military retirement, Powell wrote his best-selling autobiography, My American Journey. In addition, he pursued a career as a public speaker, addressing audiences across the country and abroad. Prior to his appointment as Secretary of State, Powell was the chairman of America's Promise - The Alliance for Youth, a national nonprofit organization dedicated to mobilizing people from every sector of American life to build the character and competence of young people. He was nominated by President Bush on December 16, 2000 as Secretary of State. After being unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate, he was sworn in as the 65th Secretary of State on January 20, 2001.[7]
Powell is the recipient of numerous U.S. and foreign military awards and decorations. Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medal of Freedom, the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, and the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country. Powell is married to the former Alma Vivian Johnson of Birmingham, Alabama. The Powell family includes son Michael (ex-chairman of the Federal Communications Commission); daughters Linda and Anne; daughter-in-law Jane; and grandsons Jeffrey and Bryan.[7]
In 2016, while not a candidate for that year's election, Powell received three electoral votes for the office of President of the United States.



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Military career

2.1 Training
2.2 Vietnam War
2.3 After the Vietnam War
2.4 A "political general"
2.5 Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
2.6 Dates of rank
2.7 Awards and decorations

2.7.1 Badges
2.7.2 Medals and ribbons
2.7.3 Foreign decorations


2.8 13 Rules of Leadership


3 Potential presidential candidate
4 Secretary of State
5 Life after diplomatic service
6 Political views

6.1 Views on the Iraq War
6.2 Role in presidential election of 2008
6.3 Views on the Obama administration
6.4 2016 presidential election


7 Personal life
8 Civilian awards and honors
9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Early life and education
Powell was born on April 5, 1937,[8] in Harlem, a neighborhood in the New York City borough of Manhattan, to Jamaican immigrant parents Maud Arial (née McKoy) and Luther Theophilus Powell. His parents were both of mixed African and Scots ancestry.[9][10] Luther worked as a shipping clerk and Maud as a seamstress.[11] Powell was raised in the South Bronx and attended Morris High School, from which he graduated in 1954. (This school has since closed.)
While at school, Powell worked at a local baby furniture store, where he picked up Yiddish from the eastern European Jewish shopkeepers and some of the customers.[12] He also served as a Shabbos goy, helping Orthodox families with needed tasks on the Sabbath.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Geology from the City College of New York in 1958[14][15] and has said he was a 'C average' student.[16] He later earned an MBA degree from the George Washington University in 1971,[14] after his second tour in Vietnam.
Despite his parents' pronunciation of his name as /ˈkɒlᵻn/, Powell has pronounced his name /ˈkoʊlᵻn/ since childhood, after the heroic World War II flyer Colin P. Kelly Jr.[17] Public officials and radio and television reporters have used Powell's preferred pronunciation.
Military career
Powell was a professional soldier for 35 years, holding a variety of command and staff positions and rising to the rank of General.[18]
Training
Powell described joining the Reserve Officers' Training Corps (ROTC) during college as one of the happiest experiences of his life; discovering something he loved and could do well, he felt he had "found himself." According to Powell:

It was only once I was in college, about six months into college when I found something that I liked, and that was ROTC, Reserve Officer Training Corps in the military. And I not only liked it, but I was pretty good at it. That's what you really have to look for in life, something that you like, and something that you think you're pretty good at. And if you can put those two things together, then you're on the right track, and just drive on.[19]

Cadet Powell joined the Pershing Rifles, the ROTC fraternal organization and drill team begun by General John Pershing. Even after he had become a general, Powell kept on his desk a pen set he had won for a drill team competition.
Upon graduation, he received a commission as an Army second lieutenant.[20] After attending basic training at Fort Benning, Powell was assigned to the 48th Infantry, in West Germany, as a platoon leader.[21]
Vietnam War
In his autobiography, Powell said he is haunted by the nightmare of the Vietnam War and felt that the leadership was very ineffective.
Captain Powell served a tour in Vietnam as a South Vietnamese Army (ARVN) advisor from 1962 to 1963. While on patrol in a Viet Cong-held area, he was wounded by stepping on a punji stake.[22] The large infection made it difficult for him to walk, and caused his foot to swell for a short time, shortening his first tour.
He returned to Vietnam as a major in 1968, serving in the 23rd Infantry Division, then as assistant chief of staff of operations for the Americal Division. During the second tour in Vietnam he was decorated for bravery after he survived a helicopter crash, single-handedly rescuing three others, including division commander Major General Charles Martin Gettys, from the burning wreckage.[21][23]
Powell was charged with investigating a detailed letter by 11th Light Infantry Brigade soldier Tom Glen, which backed up rumored allegations of the My Lai Massacre. He wrote: "In direct refutation of this portrayal is the fact that relations between American soldiers and the Vietnamese people are excellent." Later, Powell's assessment would be described as whitewashing the news of the massacre, and questions would continue to remain undisclosed to the public. In May 2004 Powell said to television and radio host Larry King, "I was in a unit that was responsible for My Lai. I got there after My Lai happened. So, in war, these sorts of horrible things happen every now and again, but they are still to be deplored."[24]




Powell in April 1989, as the Commanding General of FORSCOM.


After the Vietnam War
Powell served a White House Fellowship under President Richard Nixon from 1972 to 1973. During 1975–1976 he attended the National War College, Washington, D.C.[25]
In his autobiography, My American Journey, Powell named several officers he served under who inspired and mentored him. As a lieutenant colonel serving in South Korea, Powell was very close to General Henry "Gunfighter" Emerson. Powell said he regarded Emerson as one of the most caring officers he ever met. Emerson insisted his troops train at night to fight a possible North Korean attack, and made them repeatedly watch the television film Brian's Song to promote racial harmony. Powell always professed that what set Emerson apart was his great love of his soldiers and concern for their welfare. After a race riot occurred, in which African American soldiers almost killed a Caucasian officer, Powell was charged by Emerson to crack down on black militants; Powell's efforts led to the discharge of one soldier, and other efforts to reduce racial tensions.[21]
A "political general"
In the early 1980s, Powell served at Fort Carson, Colorado. After he left Fort Carson, Powell became senior military assistant to Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, whom he assisted during the 1983 invasion of Grenada and the 1986 airstrike on Libya.




President Ronald Reagan and National Security Advisor Powell in 1988


In 1986, Powell took over the command of V Corps in Frankfurt, Germany, from Robert Lewis "Sam" Wetzel.
Following the Iran Contra scandal, Powell became, at the age of 49, Ronald Reagan's National Security Advisor, serving from 1987 to 1989 while retaining his Army commission as a lieutenant general.
In April 1989, after his tenure with the National Security Council, Powell was promoted to four-star general under President George H. W. Bush and briefly served as the Commander in Chief, Forces Command (FORSCOM), headquartered at Fort McPherson, Georgia, overseeing all Army, Army Reserve, and National Guard units in the Continental U.S., Alaska, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico. He became the third general since World War II to reach four-star rank without ever serving as a division commander, joining Dwight D. Eisenhower and Alexander Haig.
Later that year, President George H. W. Bush selected him as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.[26]
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff




Powell in November 1989, on his official Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff portrait.


Powell's last military assignment, from October 1, 1989, to September 30, 1993, was as the 12th Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the highest military position in the Department of Defense. At age 52, he became the youngest officer, and first Afro-Caribbean American, to serve in this position. Powell was also the first JCS Chair who received his commission through ROTC.[27]
During this time, he oversaw 28 crises, including the invasion of Panama in 1989 to remove General Manuel Noriega from power and Operation Desert Storm in the 1991 Persian Gulf War. During these events, Powell earned his nickname, "the reluctant warrior." He rarely advocated military intervention as the first solution to an international crisis, and instead usually prescribed diplomacy and containment.




General Colin Powell, Chairman, Joint Chiefs of Staff, waves from his motorcade during the Persian Gulf War Welcome Home Parade in New York City.


As a military strategist, Powell advocated an approach to military conflicts that maximizes the potential for success and minimizes casualties. A component of this approach is the use of overwhelming force, which he applied to Operation Desert Storm in 1991. His approach has been dubbed the "Powell Doctrine". Powell continued as chairman of the JCS into the Clinton presidency but as a dedicated "realist" he considered himself a bad fit for an administration largely made up of liberal internationalists.[28] He clashed with then-U.S. ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright over the Bosnian crisis, as he opposed any military interventions that didn't involve US interests.[29]
During his chairmanship of the JCS, there was discussion of awarding Powell a fifth star, granting him the rank of General of the Army. But even in the wake of public and Congressional pressure[30][31] to do so, Clinton-Gore presidential transition team staffers decided against it.[32][33][34]
Dates of rank

Promotions

Rank
Date


 General
April 4, 1989


 Lieutenant general
March 26, 1986


 Major general
August 1, 1983


 Brigadier general
June 1, 1979


 Colonel
February 1, 1976


 Lieutenant colonel
July 9, 1970


 Major
May 24, 1966


 Captain
June 2, 1962


 First lieutenant
December 30, 1959


 Second lieutenant
June 9, 1958


Awards and decorations
Badges







Combat Infantryman Badge









Expert Infantryman Badge









Ranger Tab









Parachutist Badge









Pathfinder Badge









Air Assault Badge









Presidential Service Badge









Secretary of Defense Identification Badge









Joint Chiefs of Staff Identification Badge









Army Staff Identification Badge




Medals and ribbons











Defense Distinguished Service Medal with three oak leaf clusters









Distinguished Service Medal, Army with oak leaf cluster



Defense Superior Service Medal









Legion of Merit with oak leaf cluster



Soldier's Medal



Bronze Star



Purple Heart



Air Medal



Joint Service Commendation Medal










Army Commendation Medal with two oak leaf clusters



Presidential Medal of Freedom with Distinction (1993)[35]



Presidential Medal of Freedom (1991)



Presidential Citizens Medal









National Defense Service Medal with bronze service star









Vietnam Service Medal with silver service star



Army Service Ribbon



Army Overseas Service Ribbon with award numeral 4


Foreign decorations



Skanderbeg's Order (Albania)



Honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) (United Kingdom)



Légion d'honneur, Grand Cross (France)



Meritorious Service Cross (M.S.C.) (Canada)



Order of Stara Planina in the First Order (Bulgaria)[36][37]



Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation



Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal


13 Rules of Leadership
First printed in the August 13, 1989 issue of Parade magazine,[38] these are Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership.[39][40]

It ain't as bad as you think.
Get mad, then get over it.
Avoid having your ego so close to your position that when your position falls, your ego goes with it.
It can be done.
Be careful what you choose. You may get it.
Don't let adverse facts stand in the way of a good decision.
You can't make someone else's choices.
Check small things.
Share credit.
Remain calm. Be kind.
Have a vision.
Don't take counsel of your fears or naysayers.
Perpetual optimism is a force multiplier.

Potential presidential candidate
Powell's experience in military matters made him a very popular figure with both American political parties. Many Democrats admired his moderate stance on military matters, while many Republicans saw him as a great asset associated with the successes of past Republican administrations. Put forth as a potential Democratic Vice Presidential nominee in the 1992 U.S. presidential election[41] or even potentially replacing Vice President Dan Quayle as the Republican Vice Presidential nominee,[42] Powell eventually declared himself a Republican and began to campaign for Republican candidates in 1995.[43] He was touted as a possible opponent of Bill Clinton in the 1996 U.S. presidential election, possibly capitalizing on a split conservative vote in Iowa[44] and even leading New Hampshire polls for the GOP nomination,[45] but Powell declined, citing a lack of passion for politics.[46] Powell defeated Clinton 50–38 in a hypothetical match-up proposed to voters in the exit polls conducted on Election Day.[47] Despite not standing in the race, Powell won the Republican New Hampshire Vice-Presidential primary on write-in votes.[48]
In 1997 Powell founded America's Promise with the objective of helping children from all socioeconomic sectors. That same year saw the establishment of The Colin L. Powell Center for Leadership and Service. The mission of the Center is to "prepare new generations of publicly engaged leaders from populations previously underrepresented in public service and policy circles, to build a strong culture of civic engagement at City College, and to mobilize campus resources to meet pressing community needs and serve the public good." [49]
Powell was mentioned as a potential candidate in the 2000 U.S. presidential election, but decided against running.[50] Once Texas Governor George W. Bush secured the Republican nomination, Powell endorsed him for president and spoke at the 2000 Republican National Convention. Bush eventually won, and Powell was appointed Secretary of State.
In the electoral college vote count of 2016, Powell received three votes from faithless electors from Washington.
Secretary of State




Powell, National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice and Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld listen to President George W. Bush speak.


As Secretary of State in the Bush administration, Powell was perceived as moderate. Powell was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate. Over the course of his tenure he traveled less than any other U.S. Secretary of State in 30 years. [51]
On September 11, 2001, Powell was in Lima, Peru, meeting with President Alejandro Toledo and US Ambassador John Hamilton, and attending the special session of the OAS General Assembly that subsequently adopted the Inter-American Democratic Charter. After the September 11 attacks, Powell's job became of critical importance in managing America's relationships with foreign countries in order to secure a stable coalition in the War on Terrorism.
Powell came under fire for his role in building the case for the 2003 Invasion of Iraq. In a press statement on February 24, 2001, he had said that sanctions against Iraq had prevented the development of any weapons of mass destruction by Saddam Hussein. As was the case in the days leading up to the Persian Gulf War, Powell was initially opposed to a forcible overthrow of Saddam, preferring to continue a policy of containment. However, Powell eventually agreed to go along with the Bush administration's determination to remove Saddam. He had often clashed with others in the administration, who were reportedly planning an Iraq invasion even before the September 11 attacks, an insight supported by testimony by former terrorism czar Richard Clarke in front of the 9/11 Commission. The main concession Powell wanted before he would offer his full support for the Iraq War was the involvement of the international community in the invasion, as opposed to a unilateral approach. He was also successful in persuading Bush to take the case of Iraq to the United Nations, and in moderating other initiatives. Powell was placed at the forefront of this diplomatic campaign.




Computer-generated image of an alleged mobile production facility for biological weapons, presented by Powell at the UN Security Council. On May 27, 2003, US and UK experts examined the trailers and declared they had nothing to do with biological weapons.[52]






Powell holding a model vial of anthrax while giving a presentation to the United Nations Security Council in February 2003.


Powell's chief role was to garner international support for a multi-national coalition to mount the invasion. To this end, Powell addressed a plenary session of the United Nations Security Council on February 5, 2003, to argue in favor of military action. Citing numerous anonymous Iraqi defectors, Powell asserted that "there can be no doubt that Saddam Hussein has biological weapons and the capability to rapidly produce more, many more." Powell also stated that there was "no doubt in my mind" that Saddam was working to obtain key components to produce nuclear weapons.[53]
Most observers praised Powell's oratorical skills. However, Britain's Channel 4 News reported soon afterwards that a UK intelligence dossier that Powell had referred to as a "fine paper" during his presentation had been based on old material and plagiarized an essay by American graduate student Ibrahim al-Marashi.[54][55] A 2004 report by the Iraq Survey Group concluded that the evidence that Powell offered to support the allegation that the Iraqi government possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) was inaccurate.
In an interview with Charlie Rose, Powell contended that prior to his UN presentation, he had merely four days to review the data concerning WMD in Iraq.[56]
A Senate report on intelligence failures would later detail the intense debate that went on behind the scenes on what to include in Powell's speech. State Department analysts had found dozens of factual problems in drafts of the speech. Some of the claims were taken out, but others were left in, such as claims based on the yellowcake forgery.[57] The administration came under fire for having acted on faulty intelligence, particularly what was single-sourced to the informant known as Curveball. Powell later recounted how Vice President Dick Cheney had joked with him before he gave the speech, telling him, "You've got high poll ratings; you can afford to lose a few points." Powell's longtime aide-de-camp and Chief of Staff from 1989–2003, Colonel Lawrence Wilkerson, later characterized Cheney's view of Powell's mission as to "go up there and sell it, and we'll have moved forward a peg or two. Fall on your damn sword and kill yourself, and I'll be happy, too."[58]
In September 2005, Powell was asked about the speech during an interview with Barbara Walters and responded that it was a "blot" on his record. He went on to say, "It will always be a part of my record. It was painful. It's painful now."[59]
Wilkerson said that he inadvertently participated in a hoax on the American people in preparing Powell's erroneous testimony before the United Nations Security Council.[60]
Because Powell was seen as more moderate than most figures in the administration, he was spared many of the attacks that have been leveled at more controversial advocates of the invasion, such as Donald Rumsfeld and Paul Wolfowitz. At times, infighting among the Powell-led State Department, the Rumsfeld-led Defense Department, and Cheney's office had the effect of polarizing the administration on crucial issues, such as what actions to take regarding Iran and North Korea.




Secretary Powell with NATO Secretary General Jaap de Hoop Scheffer


After Saddam Hussein had been deposed, Powell's new role was to once again establish a working international coalition, this time to assist in the rebuilding of post-war Iraq. On September 13, 2004, Powell testified before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee,[61] acknowledging that the sources who provided much of the information in his February 2003 UN presentation were "wrong" and that it was "unlikely" that any stockpiles of WMDs would be found. Claiming that he was unaware that some intelligence officials questioned the information prior to his presentation, Powell pushed for reform in the intelligence community, including the creation of a national intelligence director who would assure that "what one person knew, everyone else knew."
Additionally, Powell has been critical of other instances of U.S. foreign policy in the past, such as its support for the 1973 Chilean coup d'état. From two separate interviews in 2003, Powell stated in one about the 1973 event "I can't justify or explain the actions and decisions that were made at that time. It was a different time. There was a great deal of concern about communism in this part of the world. Communism was a threat to the democracies in this part of the world. It was a threat to the United States."[62] In another interview, however, he also simply stated "With respect to your earlier comment about Chile in the 1970s and what happened with Mr. Allende, it is not a part of American history that we're proud of."[63]
Powell announced his resignation as Secretary of State on November 15, 2004. According to The Washington Post, he had been asked to resign by the president's chief of staff, Andrew Card.[58] Powell announced that he would stay on until the end of Bush's first term or until his replacement's confirmation by Congress. The following day, Bush nominated National Security Advisor Condoleezza Rice as Powell's successor. News of Powell's leaving the Administration spurred mixed reactions from politicians around the world — some upset at the loss of a statesman seen as a moderating factor within the Bush administration, but others hoping for Powell's successor to wield more influence within the cabinet.
In mid-November, Powell stated that he had seen new evidence suggesting that Iran was adapting missiles for a nuclear delivery system.[64] The accusation came at the same time as the settlement of an agreement between Iran, the IAEA, and the European Union.
On December 31, 2004, Powell rang in the New Year by pressing a button in Times Square with New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg to initiate the ball drop and 60 second countdown, ushering in the year 2005. He appeared on the networks that were broadcasting New Year's Eve specials and talked about this honor, as well as being a native of New York City.[65]
Life after diplomatic service
After retiring from the role of Secretary of State, Powell returned to private life. In April 2005, he was privately telephoned by Republican senators Lincoln Chafee and Chuck Hagel,[66] at which time Powell expressed reservations and mixed reviews about the nomination of John R. Bolton as ambassador to the United Nations, but refrained from advising the senators to oppose Bolton (Powell had clashed with Bolton during Bush's first term).[67] The decision was viewed as potentially dealing significant damage to Bolton's chances of confirmation. Bolton was put into the position via a recess appointment because of the strong opposition in the Senate.




Powell with Ban Ki-moon, 2004.


On April 28, 2005, an opinion piece in The Guardian by Sidney Blumenthal (a former top aide to President Bill Clinton) claimed that Powell was in fact "conducting a campaign" against Bolton because of the acrimonious battles they had had while working together, which among other things had resulted in Powell cutting Bolton out of talks with Iran and Libya after complaints about Bolton's involvement from the British. Blumenthal added that "The foreign relations committee has discovered that Bolton made a highly unusual request and gained access to 10 intercepts by the National Security Agency. Staff members on the committee believe that Bolton was probably spying on Powell, his senior advisors and other officials reporting to him on diplomatic initiatives that Bolton opposed."[68]
In July 2005, Powell joined Kleiner, Perkins, Caufield & Byers, a well-known Silicon Valley venture capital firm, with the title of "strategic limited partner."
In September 2005, Powell criticized the response to Hurricane Katrina.[69] Powell said that thousands of people were not properly protected, but because they were poor rather than because they were black.




Powell walks with newly crowned King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, Vice President Dick Cheney, and former President George H. W. Bush, Saudi Arabia, August 2005.


On January 5, 2006, he participated in a meeting at the White House of former Secretaries of Defense and State to discuss United States foreign policy with Bush administration officials. In September 2006, Powell sided with more moderate Senate Republicans in supporting more rights for detainees and opposing President Bush's terrorism bill. He backed Senators John Warner, John McCain and Lindsey Graham in their statement that U.S. military and intelligence personnel in future wars will suffer for abuses committed in 2006 by the U.S. in the name of fighting terrorism. Powell stated that "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of [America's] fight against terrorism."[70]
Also in 2006, Powell began appearing as a speaker at a series of motivational events called Get Motivated, along with former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani. In his speeches for the tour, he openly criticized the Bush Administration on a number of issues. Powell has been the recipient of mild criticism for his role with Get Motivated which has been called a "get-rich-quick-without-much-effort, feel-good schemology."[71]
In 2007 he joined the Board of Directors of Steve Case's new company Revolution Health. Powell also serves on the Council on Foreign Relations Board of directors.[72]
Powell, in honor of Martin Luther King Day, dropped the ceremonial first puck at a New York Islanders ice hockey game at Nassau Coliseum on January 21, 2008. On November 11, 2008, Powell again dropped the puck in recognition of Military Appreciation Day and Veterans Day.[73][74]
Recently, Powell has encouraged young people to continue to use new technologies to their advantage in the future. In a speech at the Center for Strategic and International Studies to a room of young professionals, he said, "That's your generation...a generation that is hard-wired digital, a generation that understands the power of the information revolution and how it is transforming the world. A generation that you represent, and you're coming together to share; to debate; to decide; to connect with each other."[75] At this event, he encouraged the next generation to involve themselves politically on the upcoming Next America Project, which uses online debate to provide policy recommendations for the upcoming administration.
In 2008, Powell served as a spokesperson for National Mentoring Month, a campaign held each January to recruit volunteer mentors for at-risk youth.[76]
Soon after Barack Obama's 2008 election, Powell began being mentioned as a possible cabinet member.[77] He was not nominated.
In September 2009, Powell advised President Obama against surging US forces in Afghanistan.[78] The president announced the surge the following December.
On March 14, 2014, Salesforce.com announced that Powell had joined its Board of Directors.[79]
Political views
A liberal Republican, Powell is well known for his willingness to support liberal or centrist causes.[80] He is pro-choice regarding abortion, and in favor of "reasonable" gun control.[80][clarification needed] He stated in his autobiography that he supports affirmative action that levels the playing field, without giving a leg up to undeserving persons because of racial issues. Powell was also instrumental in the 1993 implementation of the military's don't ask, don't tell policy,[80] though he later supported its repeal as proposed by Robert Gates and Admiral Mike Mullen in January 2010, saying "circumstances had changed".[81]

External video

 Booknotes interview with Powell on My American Journey, January 7, 1996, C-SPAN


The Vietnam War had a profound effect on Powell's views of the proper use of military force. These views are described in detail in the autobiography My American Journey. The Powell Doctrine, as the views became known, was a central component of U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf War (the first U.S. war in Iraq) and U.S. invasion of Afghanistan (the overthrow of the Taliban regime in Afghanistan following the September 11 attacks). The hallmark of both operations was strong international cooperation, and the use of overwhelming military force.
Powell was the subject of controversy in 2004 when, in a conversation with British Foreign Secretary Jack Straw, he reportedly referred to neoconservatives within the Bush administration as "fucking crazies."[82] In addition to being reported in the press (although the expletive was generally censored in the U.S. press), the quotation was used by James Naughtie in his book, The Accidental American: Tony Blair and the Presidency, and by Chris Patten in his book, Cousins and Strangers: America, Britain, and Europe in a New Century.
In a September 2006 letter to Sen. John McCain, General Powell expressed opposition to President Bush's push for military tribunals of those formerly and currently classified as enemy combatants. Specifically, he objected to the effort in Congress to "redefine Common Article 3 of the Geneva Convention." He also asserted: "The world is beginning to doubt the moral basis of our fight against terrorism."[83]
Powell endorsed President Obama in 2008 and again in 2012. When asked why he is still a Republican on Meet the Press he said, "I’m still a Republican. And I think the Republican Party needs me more than the Democratic Party needs me. And you can be a Republican and still feel strongly about issues such as immigration, and improving our education system, and doing something about some of the social problems that exist in our society and our country. I don’t think there's anything inconsistent with this." [84]
Views on the Iraq War
While Powell was wary of a military solution, he supported the decision to invade Iraq after the Bush administration concluded that diplomatic efforts had failed. After his departure from the State Department, Powell repeatedly emphasized his continued support for American involvement in the Iraq War.
At the 2007 Aspen Ideas Festival in Colorado,[85] Powell revealed that he had spent two and a half hours explaining to President Bush "the consequences of going into an Arab country and becoming the occupiers." During this discussion, he insisted that the U.S. appeal to the United Nations first, but if diplomacy failed, he would support the invasion: "I also had to say to him that you are the President, you will have to make the ultimate judgment, and if the judgment is this isn't working and we don't think it is going to solve the problem, then if military action is undertaken I'm with you, I support you."[86]
In a 2008 interview on CNN, Powell reiterated his support for the 2003 decision to invade Iraq in the context of his endorsement of Barack Obama, stating: "My role has been very, very straightforward. I wanted to avoid a war. The president [Bush] agreed with me. We tried to do that. We couldn't get it through the U.N. and when the president made the decision, I supported that decision. And I've never blinked from that. I've never said I didn't support a decision to go to war."[87]
Powell's position on the Iraq War troop surge of 2007 has been less consistent. In December 2006, he expressed skepticism that the strategy would work and whether the U.S. military had enough troops to carry it out successfully. He stated: "I am not persuaded that another surge of troops into Baghdad for the purposes of suppressing this communitarian violence, this civil war, will work."[88] Following his endorsement of Barack Obama in October 2008, however, Powell praised General David Petraeus and U.S. troops, as well as the Iraqi government, concluding that "it's starting to turn around."[87] By mid-2009, he had concluded a surge of U.S. forces in Iraq should have come sooner, perhaps in late 2003.[89] Throughout this period, Powell consistently argued that Iraqi political progress was essential, not just military force.
Role in presidential election of 2008
Powell donated the maximum allowable amount to John McCain's campaign in the summer of 2007[90] and in early 2008, his name was listed as a possible running mate for Republican nominee McCain's bid during the 2008 U.S. presidential election.[91] However, on October 19, 2008, Powell announced his endorsement of Barack Obama during a Meet the Press interview, citing "his ability to inspire, because of the inclusive nature of his campaign, because he is reaching out all across America, because of who he is and his rhetorical abilities", in addition to his "style and substance." He additionally referred to Obama as a "transformational figure".[92][93] Powell further questioned McCain's judgment in appointing Sarah Palin as the vice presidential candidate, stating that despite the fact that she is admired, "now that we have had a chance to watch her for some seven weeks, I don't believe she's ready to be president of the United States, which is the job of the vice president." He said that Obama's choice for vice-president, Joe Biden, was ready to be president. He also added that he was "troubled" by the "false intimations that Obama was Muslim." Powell stated that "[Obama] is a Christian—he's always been a Christian... But the really right answer is, what if he is? Is there something wrong with being a Muslim in this country? The answer's no, that's not America." Powell then mentioned Kareem Rashad Sultan Khan, a Muslim American soldier in the U.S. Army who served and died in the Iraq War. He later stated, "Over the last seven weeks, the approach of the Republican Party has become narrower and narrower [...] I look at these kind of approaches to the campaign, and they trouble me."[92][93] Powell concluded his Sunday morning talk show comments, "It isn't easy for me to disappoint Sen. McCain in the way that I have this morning, and I regret that [...] I think we need a transformational figure. I think we need a president who is a generational change and that's why I'm supporting Barack Obama, not out of any lack of respect or admiration for Sen. John McCain."[94] Later in a December 12, 2008, CNN interview with Fareed Zakaria, Powell reiterated his belief that during the last few months of the campaign, Palin pushed the Republican party further to the right and had a polarizing impact on it.[95]
Views on the Obama administration
In a July 2009 CNN interview with John King, Powell expressed concern over President Obama growing the size of the federal government and the size of the federal budget deficit.[96] In September 2010, he criticized the Obama administration for not focusing "like a razor blade" on the economy and job creation. Powell reiterated that Obama was a "transformational figure."[97] In a video that aired on CNN.com in November 2011, Colin Powell said in reference to Barack Obama, "many of his decisions have been quite sound. The financial system was put back on a stable basis."[98]
On October 25, 2012, 12 days before the presidential election, he gave his endorsement to President Obama for re-election during a broadcast of CBS This Morning. He cited success and forward progress in foreign and domestic policy arenas under the Obama Administration, and made the following statement: "I voted for him in 2008 and I plan to stick with him in 2012 and I'll be voting for he [sic] and for Vice President Joe Biden next month."
As additional reason for his endorsement, Powell cited the changing positions and perceived lack of thoughtfulness of Mitt Romney on foreign affairs, and a concern for the validity of Romney's economic plans.[99]
In an interview with ABC's Diane Sawyer and George Stephanopoulos during ABC's coverage of President Obama's second inauguration, Powell criticized members of the Republican Party who "demonize[d] the president". He called on GOP leaders to publicly denounce such talk.[100]
2016 presidential election
Powell has been very vocal on the state of the Republican party. Speaking at a Washington Ideas forum in early October 2015, he warned the audience that the Republican party had begun a move to the fringe right, lessening the chances of a Republican White House in the future. He also remarked on Republican presidential contender Donald Trump's statements regarding immigrants, noting that there were many immigrants working in Trump hotels.[101]
In March 2016, Powell denounced the "nastiness" of the 2016 Republican primaries during an interview on CBS This Morning. He compared the race to a "reality show", and stated that the campaign had gone "into the mud".[102]
In August 2016, Powell accused the Clinton campaign of trying to pin Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton's email controversy on him. Speaking to People magazine, Powell said, "The truth is, she was using [the private email server] for a year before I sent her a memo telling her what I did."[103]
On September 13, 2016, emails were obtained that revealed Powell's private communications regarding both Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton. Powell privately reiterated his comments regarding Clinton's email scandal, writing, "I have told Hillary's minions repeatedly that they are making a mistake trying to drag me in, yet they still try," and complaining that "Hillary’s mafia keeps trying to suck me into it" in another email.[104] In another email discussing Clinton's controversy, Powell noted that she should have told everyone what she did "two years ago", and said that she has not "been covering herself with glory." Writing on the 2012 Benghazi attack controversy surrounding Clinton, Powell said to then U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice, "Benghazi is a stupid witch hunt." Commenting on Clinton in a general sense, Powell mused that "Everything [Clinton] touches she kind of screws up with hubris", and in another email stated "I would rather not have to vote for her, although she is a friend I respect."[105]
Powell referred to Donald Trump as a "national disgrace", with "no sense of shame". He wrote candidly of Trump's role in the birther movement, which he referred to as "racist". Powell suggested that the media ignore Trump, saying, "To go on and call him an idiot just emboldens him." The emails were obtained by the media as the result of a hack.[106]
Powell endorsed Clinton on October 25, 2016, stating it was "because I think she's qualified, and the other gentleman is not qualified."[107]
Despite not running in the election, Powell received three electoral votes for president from faithless electors in Washington who had pledged to vote for Clinton, coming in third overall.[108] After Barack Obama, Powell was only the second African American to receive electoral votes in a presidential election. He was also the first Republican since 1984 to receive electoral votes from Washington in a presidential election, as well as the first Republican African American to do so.
Personal life
Powell married Alma Johnson on August 25, 1962. Their son, Michael Powell, was the chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) from 2001 to 2005. His daughters are Linda Powell, an actress, and Annemarie Powell. As a hobby, Powell restores old Volvo and Saab cars.[109][110] In 2013, he faced questions about a relationship with a Romanian diplomat, after a hacked AOL email account had been made public. He acknowledged a "very personal" email relationship but denied further involvement.[111]
Civilian awards and honors
Powell's civilian awards include two Presidential Medals of Freedom (the second with distinction), the President's Citizens Medal, the Congressional Gold Medal, the Secretary of State Distinguished Service Medal, the Secretary of Energy Distinguished Service Medal, and the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award. Several schools and other institutions have been named in his honor and he holds honorary degrees from universities and colleges across the country.

In 1988, Powell received the Academy of Achievement's Golden Plate Award.
In 1990, Powell received the U.S. Senator John Heinz Award for Greatest Public Service by an Elected or Appointed Official, an award given out annually by Jefferson Awards.[112]
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom by President George H. W. Bush.
In 1991, Powell was awarded the Spingarn Medal from the NAACP.[113]
In 1991, Powell was inducted into the Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans,[114] which "honors the achievements of outstanding individuals in U.S. society who have succeeded in spite of adversity and of encouraging young people to pursue their dreams through higher education."
On September 30, 1993, Powell was awarded his second Presidential Medal of Freedom with distinction by President Bill Clinton.[35]
On November 9, 1993, Powell was awarded the second Ronald Reagan Freedom Award, by President Ronald Reagan. Powell served as Reagan's National Security Advisor from 1987–1989.[115]
On December 15, 1993, Colin Powell was created an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom.
In 1998, he was awarded the prestigious Sylvanus Thayer Award by the United States Military Academy for his commitment to the ideals of "Duty, Honor, Country."
The 2002 Liberty Medal was awarded to Colin Powell on July 4 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. In his acceptance speech, Powell reminded Americans that "It is for America, the Land of the Free and the Home of the Brave, to help freedom ring across the globe, unto all the peoples thereof. That is our solemn obligation, and we will not fail."[116]





Coat of arms



The Coat of Arms of Colin Powell was granted by the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh on February 4, 2004. Technically the grant was to Powell's father (a British subject) to be passed on by descent. Scotland's King of Arms is traditionally responsible for granting arms to Commonwealth citizens of Scottish descent. Blazoned as:

Azure, two swords in saltire points downwards between four mullets Argent, on a chief of the Second a lion passant Gules. On a wreath of the Liveries is set for Crest the head of an American bald-headed eagle erased Proper. And in an escrol over the same this motto, "DEVOTED TO PUBLIC SERVICE."

The swords and stars refer to the former general's career, as does the crest, which is the badge of the 101st Airborne (which he served as a brigade commander in the mid-1970s). The lion may be an allusion to Scotland. The shield can be shown surrounded by the insignia of an honorary Knight Commander of the Most Honorable Order of the Bath (KCB), an award the General received after the first Gulf War.
In 2005 Powell received the Bishop John T. Walker Distinguished Humanitarian Service Award for his contributions to Africa.
AARP honored Powell with the 2006 AARP Andrus Award, the Association's highest honor. This award, named in honor of AARP's founder, Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, is presented biennially to distinguished individuals who have generated positive social change in the world, and whose work and achievements reflect AARP's vision of bringing lifetimes of experience and leadership to serve all generations.
In 2005 Colin and Alma Powell were awarded the Woodrow Wilson Award for Public Service by the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars of the Smithsonian Institution.
Colin Powell was initiated as an honorary brother in Sigma Phi Epsilon.
Powell is a recipient of the Silver Buffalo Award, the highest adult award given by the Boy Scouts of America.
A street in Gelnhausen, Germany was named after him: "General-Colin-Powell-Straße".[117]
In 2002, scholar Molefi Kete Asante listed Colin Powell on his list of 100 Greatest African Americans.[118]
In 2009, an elementary school named for Colin Powell opened in El Paso. It is in the El Paso Independent School District, located on Fort Bliss property, and serves a portion of Fort Bliss.[119] There is also a street in El Paso named for Powell, Colin Powell Drive.
Powell is an Honorary Board Member of the humanitarian organization Wings of Hope[120]
Since 2006, he is the chairman of the Board of Trustees for Eisenhower Fellowships[121]
In 2006, The Harry S. Truman Research Institute for the Advancement of Peace at The Hebrew University of Jerusalem awarded Colin Powell with the Truman Peace Prize for his efforts to conduct the "war against terrorism", through diplomatic as well as military means, and to avert regional and civil conflicts in many parts of the world.[122]
In September 2012 Union City, New Jersey opened Colin Powell Elementary School, which was named after Powell, and dedicated the school on February 7, 2013, with governor Chris Christie in attendance.[123] Powell himself visited the school on June 4, 2013.[124]
In 2014, Colin Powell was named to the National Board of Advisors for High Point University.[125]

See also


Biography portal
United States Army portal
Military of the United States portal



List of African-American United States Cabinet Secretaries
Plame affair
Pottery Barn rule
Republican and conservative support for Barack Obama in 2008

References


^ "Biographies of the Secretary of State:Colin Luther Powell". U.S. Department of State, Office of the Historian. Retrieved November 16, 2015. 
^ Preferred pronunciation rhymes with "bowel", not "bowl" (as in Charles Powell, Baron Powell of Bayswater) – see Alexander Chancellor, "You Say Tomato", New Yorker. August 9, 1993, p. 27.
^ The first African American secretary of state, Colin Powell, The African American Registry.
^ Biographies – Colin Powell: United States Secretary of State, African American History Month, US Department of Defense.
^ Colin Powell, Britannica Online Encyclopedia.
^ Profile: Colin Powell, BBC News.
^ a b c d "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell". The White House. Retrieved 24 December 2016.   This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.
^ Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Colin Powell". wargs.com. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Branigan, Tania (May 12, 2004). "Colin Powell claims Scottish coat of arms". The Guardian. London. 
^ "Colin Powell's Scottish Ancestry". Eastman's Online Genealogy Newsletter. 9 (20). May 17, 2004. 
^ CNN staff (March 30, 2016). "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. Retrieved September 30, 2016. 
^ Daly, Michael (August 2, 2000). "Powell's Old Nabe Boss a Big Backer". New York Daily News. Retrieved October 19, 2008. Powell explained that he had joined ROTC. He became an officer after graduation, leaving Sickser's with a smattering of Yiddish... 
^ "Former Secretary of State Gen. Colin Powell and Mario Cuomo, former governor of New York State, each a former Shabbos goy, both share fond recollections of their youth, when they were uniquely qualified to lend a Jewish neighbor a hand." Fertig, Avi. "Glatt Kosher Adventure To The Land Down Under", The Jewish Press, November 21, 2007.
^ a b "Colin Powell Fast Facts". CNN. April 2, 2017. Education: City College of New York, B.S. in geology,1958; George Washington University, M.B.A.,1971; National War College, 1976 
^ "About Gen. Colin L. Powell, USA (Ret.)". The Colin Powell School for Civic and Global Leadership, The City College of New York. He attended New York City public schools and the City College of New York where he earned a B.S. in Geology. 
^ Schwab, Nikki (May 30, 2012). "Colin Powell: bad student". Washington Examiner. My cousins became lawyers and doctors and judges and I just sort of hung around," he recalled. "I had a straight C average all the way through high school and the City College of New York — I'm not sure how I got in. 
^ "Major Player: Gen. Colin L. Powell (Ret.)". Washington Post. July 28, 2000. Retrieved April 30, 2010. 
^ "Colin (Luther) Powell Biography (1937– )". The Biography Channel. A&E Television Networks. Retrieved May 31, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell Interview". achievement.org. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell (biography)". The White House. April 29, 2003. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b c "Colin Powell". CNN. 1996. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ Kearny, Cresson H. (1996). Jungle Snafus...And Remedies. Cave Junction, Oregon: Oregon Institute of Science & Medicine. p. 179. ISBN 978-1-884067-10-5. OCLC 41447083. 
^ Finlayson, Reggie (2003). Colin Powell. Biography (A & E). Twenty-First Century Books. p. 55. ISBN 9780822549666. Retrieved 7 December 2012. 
^ "Interview on CNN's Larry King Live". New York: U.S. Department of State. May 4, 2004. Archived from the original on January 10, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brown, Warren; Wagner, Heather Lehr (1 Jan 2009). Colin Powell: Soldier and Statesman. Infobase Publishing. p. 41,43. 
^ "Online NewsHour: Colin Powell". Pbs.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "The 14 Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff". Joint History Office, U.S. Department of Defense. American Forces Press Service. August 10, 1999. Retrieved April 24, 2008. 
^ O'Sullivan, Christopher (2010). Colin Powell: A Political Biography. Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield Publishers. p. 100. ISBN 978-0-7425-5187-9. 
^ "Reluctant warrior", The Observer, September 30, 2001.
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (March 1991). "U.S. Sen. Kasten Pushing Effort To Award Powell With Historic Fifth Star". Jet. 79 (23). ISSN 0021-5996. Retrieved February 21, 2011. ...there is a movement afoot in the U.S. Senate to award an historic fifth star to the nation's first Black Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Colin L. Powell for his military proficiency. 
^ Italia, Bob (1991). Armed Forces: War in the Gulf. Abdo & Daughters. pp. 44–6. ISBN 978-1-56239-026-6. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Others want to make him a five-star general. [...] Congress is talking about giving him a fifth silver star, which is very rare. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (1999). All Too Human: A Political Education. Thorndike Press. pp. 330–1. ISBN 978-0-7862-2016-8. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Mack asked me to secretly research the procedure for awarding a fifth star to a general. [...] If Powell did challenge Clinton, the fifth star would forestall criticism of the general's military record. 
^ Hamilton, Nigel (2007). Bill Clinton: Mastering the Presidency. PublicAffairs. pp. 190, 399. ISBN 978-1-58648-516-0. Retrieved February 21, 2011. Moreover, for the very reason he admired Colin Powell as the most distinguished living black American, Clinton also feared the general as a potential rival. [...] Bill Clinton had denied Powell his rightful fifth star... 
^ Halberstam, David (2001). War in a Time of Peace: Bush, Clinton, and the Generals. Scribner. p. 190. ISBN 978-0-7432-0212-1. Retrieved February 22, 2011. They checked it out and found that the last general to get a fifth star was Omar Bradley forty-three years earlier. Powell, they decided, was not Bradley. Besides, as George Stephanopoulos noted, if they gave him one more star, it might help him one day politically. 
^ a b Clinton, W. J. (September 30, 1993). "Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia". University of California, Santa Barbara: The American Presidency Project. Retrieved September 18, 2016. In recognition of your legacy and service, of your courage and accomplishment, today, General Powell, I was honored to present you with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, with distinction. I want to tell all those here in attendance that this was the second Medal of Freedom you have received, the first from President Bush in 1991. And today, you became only the second American citizen in the history of the Republic to be the recipient of two Medals of Freedom. 
^ "Remarks With Bulgarian President Georgi Purvanov At Award Ceremony for the Stara Planina First Order Medal". Presidential Palace, Coat of Arms Hall, Sofia, Bulgaria: U.S. Department of State. December 7, 2004. 
^ "Parvanov-Powell". President of the Republic of Bulgaria. December 7, 2004. President Georgi Parvanov awarded US Secretary of State Colin Powell with the highest Bulgarian order "Stara Planina" for his extraordinary services to the advancement of Bulgarian-American relations and in connection with the 100th anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between Bulgaria and the United States. 
^ Powell, Colin (2012). It Worked for Me. HarperCollins. pp. 3–4. ISBN 978-0-06-213512-4. 
^ McClimon, Tim (27 August 2012). "Colin Powell's 13 Rules of Leadership". American Express. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ "Can we apply Colin Powell's 13 rules?" (PDF). Texas Child Care Quarterly. Summer 2012. Retrieved 12 April 2013. 
^ Schram, Martin (January 21, 1995). "Don't Count Out Colin Powell". The Seattle Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Van Dyk, Ted (September 6, 1990). "Will Powell Run With Bush in '92?". The New York Times. Retrieved October 24, 2008. 
^ Lusane C. Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice: Foreign Policy, Race and the New American Century. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2006, ISBN 0-275-98309-9, p. 46.
^ Apple, R. W. (October 28, 1995). "Life in Iowa May Not Have Changed, But the Political Turf Is Another Story". The New York Times. Retrieved October 20, 2008. 
^ Berke, Richard L. (October 19, 1995). "New Hampshire Poll Finds Powell With an Edge". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Clines, Francis X. (November 9, 1995). "The Powell Decision: The Announcement". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Plissner, Martin (February 7, 2007). "Ready for Obama Already". The New York Times. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ "NH US Vice President – R Primary Race". Our Campaigns. Feb 20, 1996. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Colin L. Powell Center for Public Policy". Retrieved 16 February 2013. 
^ "How Mccain Does It". 2000-03-06. Retrieved 2016-08-12. 
^ Kessler, Glenn (July 14, 2004). "Powell Flies in the Face of Tradition; The Secretary of State Is Least Traveled in 30 Years". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Warrick, Joby (April 12, 2006). "Lacking Biolabs, Trailers Carried Case for War; Administration Pushed Notion of Banned Iraqi Weapons Despite Evidence to Contrary". Washington Post. p. A01. 
^ Powell, Secretary Colin L. (February 5, 2003). "Remarks to the United Nations Security Council". New York City: U.S. Department of State. Archived from the original on January 9, 2007. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Lawless, Jill (February 7, 2003). "U.S. Scholar Uncredited in Iraq Report". Associated Press. Retrieved June 26, 2009. 
^ "UK accused of lifting dossier text". CNN. February 7, 2003. 
^ Charlie Rose. charlierose.com. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ Miller, Greg (July 15, 2004). "Flaws Cited in Powell's U.N. Speech on Iraq". Los Angeles Times. reprinted by CommonDreams.org. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ a b DeYoung, Karen (October 1, 2006). "Falling on His Sword: Colin Powell's most significant moment turned out to be his lowest". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Colin Powell on Iraq, Race, and Hurricane Relief". ABC News: 20/20. September 8, 2005. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Brancaccio, David (February 3, 2006). "Iraq Pre-War Intelligence". NOW. PBS. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Pincus, Walter (February 14, 2004). "Support for Intelligence Plan". Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Remarks at the 2003 Groundhog Job Shadow Day Program, Secretary Colin L. Powell, Remarks and question and answer session with students, Washington, DC, January 31, 2003, excerpt on 1973 Chile coup, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Secretary of State Colin L. Powell, Interview On Black Entertainment Television's Youth Town Hall, February 20, 2003, excerpt on 1973 U.S. covert action in Chile, Federation of American Scientists". Fas.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Sciolino, Elaine (November 18, 2004). "Exiles Add to Claims on Iran Nuclear Arms". New York Times. Retrieved February 8, 2007. 
^ Anderson, Cooper (December 31, 2004). "Transcripts: New Year's Eve Special". CNN. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ VandeHei, Jim; Robin Wright (April 22, 2005). "Powell Playing Quiet Role in Bolton Battle". Washington Post. 
^ Borger, Julian (April 23, 2005). "Powell's remarks harm Bolton's chances of UN job". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (April 28, 2005). "The good soldier's revenge". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Powell criticises storm response". BBC News. September 9, 2005. 
^ "Senators defy Bush on tribunals". BBC News. September 15, 2006. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ Wilken, Dennis (September 7, 2008). "Down the Rabbit Hole". American Satellite Magazine. Retrieved October 10, 2008. 
^ "Board of Directors". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved December 6, 2007. 
^ "islanderspointblank.com". islanderspointblank.com. Archived from the original on July 13, 2011. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "nhl.com". nhl.com. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ Powell, General Colin L, USA (Ret.) (July 8, 2008). "Keynote Address – A New Vision for America's Future: Young Leaders Shaping an International Agenda". CSIS Launch of Next America. Center for Strategic and International Studies. Archived from the original on July 31, 2008. Retrieved October 20, 2008. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ "Who Mentored Colin Powell?". President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2008. 
^ "Al Gore, Colin Powell, Caroline Kennedy in Obama's Administration? – Washington Whispers". usnews.com. November 11, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell advised against Afghan surge", Politico (September 27, 2009). http://www.politico.com/blogs/laurarozen/0909/Powell_advised_against_Afghan_surge.html
^ Ingrid Lunden. "General Colin Powell Joins Salesforce Board Of Directors, As CRM Giant Zeros In On Public Sector". TechCrunch. AOL. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ a b c Colin Powell's biography from 'On The Issues'.
^ DeYoung, Karen (February 3, 2010). "Colin Powell shifts stance on 'don't ask, don't tell' policy". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 3, 2010. 
^ Blumenthal, Sidney (November 18, 2004). "Colin and the crazies". The Guardian. London. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "Sen. McCain Releases Letter from Gen. Colin Powell", Washington Post (September 14, 2006). http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/graphic/2006/09/14/GR2006091400728.html
^ "Colin Powell: Republican Party Needs Me More Than The Democratic Party Needs Me". TheLonelyConservative.com. February 7, 2014. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ See Official website: Aspen Ideas Festival
^ "Conversation with Colin Powell" (PDF). Aspen Ideas Festival. July 2007. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell: Support for Obama doesn't mean Iraq war wrong", CNN (October 19, 2008). http://edition.cnn.com/2008/POLITICS/10/19/powell.transcript/
^ James M. Klatell, "Powell: We Are Losing In Iraq", CBS (December 17, 2006). http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/12/17/ftn/main2274583.shtml
^ "Powell says Iraq surge should have come earlier", Seattle Times (July 5, 2009)
^ Henry, Ed (August 9, 2007). "Powell donates to McCain". CNN. Retrieved August 9, 2007. 
^ Holland, Steve (March 5, 2008). "McCain now has to pick a vice presidential nominee". Boston Globe. Reuters. Retrieved April 14, 2008. 
^ a b "Powell endorses Obama for president; Republican ex-Secretary of State calls Democrat 'transformational figure'". Meet the Press. MSNBC and NBC News. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ a b "Meet the Press' transcript for October 19, 2008". MSNBC. October 19, 2008. Retrieved October 19, 2008. 
^ Ohlemacher, Stephen (October 20, 2008). "Colin Powell endorses Barack Obama for president". USA Today. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell on Rush Limbaugh". CNN. July 16, 2010. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ "Powell airs doubts on Obama agenda". The Washington Times. July 3, 2009. Retrieved September 17, 2010. 
^ Carrie Budoff Brown, "Colin Powell critical of President Obama", Politico (September 19, 2010). http://www.politico.com/news/stories/0910/42381.html
^ "Video". CNN. 
^ [1] retrieved October 25, 2012.
^ "ABC News". Retrieved 2013-01-22. 
^ https://www.yahoo.com/news/colin-powell-slams-donald-trumps-immigration-plan-163454530.html. Colin Powell slams Donald Trump's immigration plan. October 1, 2015. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-gop-race_us_56dda980e4b0000de405301a Colin Powell: The GOP Race Has ‘Gone Into The Mud’. The Huffington Post. March 7, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.people.com/article/colin-powell-hillary-clinton-pinning-email-scandal-on-him Colin Powell Says Hillary Clinton's 'People Have Been Trying to Pin' Email Scandal on Him. People Magazine. August 21, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/09/13/colin-powell-hacked-emails/90341788/
^ http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/colin-powell-hillary-clinton_us_57d96524e4b09d7a6880bf1c Colin Powell Attacked Hillary Clinton’s ‘Hubris’ In Leaked Emails. The Huffington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14th, 2016.
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/09/14/here-are-the-juiciest-colin-powell-comments-about-trump-and-clinton-from-his-leaked-emails/ Here are the juiciest Colin Powell comments about Trump and Clinton from his hacked emails. The Washington Post. September 14, 2016. Retrieved September 14, 2016.
^ Colin Powell joins 67 Republican politicians, donors and officials who are supporting Hillary Clinton October 25, 2016
^ Four Washington electors break ranks and don’t vote for Clinton
^ Powell, Colin (October 17, 2005). "Interview transcript". Larry King Live (Interview). Interview with Larry King. CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Powell, Colin (August 2, 2004). "A Conversation with Colin Powell". The Atlantic (Interview). Interview with P. J. O'Rourke. Washington, D.C. Archived from the original on February 4, 2013. Retrieved June 14, 2009. 
^ Colin Powell insists ‘there was no affair then and there is not one now’ with diplomat. NY Daily News. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ National Winners | public service awards. Jefferson Awards.org. Retrieved on 2013-08-17.
^ "Spingarn Medal Winners: 1915 to Today". naacp.org. Archived from the original on May 5, 2014. Retrieved August 27, 2015. 
^ "Colin L. Powell". The Horatio Alger Association of Distinguished Americans. n.d. Retrieved February 3, 2007. 
^ "The Ronald Reagan Freedom Award". Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation & Library. Archived from the original on October 16, 2006. 
^ Powell, Colin (July 4, 2002). "2002 Liberty Medal Acceptance Speech". Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: National Constitution Center. 
^ "GEN Colin Powell". 2016-03-08. Retrieved 2017-07-01. 
^ Asante, Molefi Kete (2002). 100 Greatest African Americans: A Biographical Encyclopedia. Amherst, New York. Prometheus Books. ISBN 1-57392-963-8.
^ According to the Fort Bliss Bugle, as of 10/24/2013, nine schools have been named for Colin Powell.
^ ":.: The Official Wings Of Hope Homepage :.:". Wings-of-hope.org. Retrieved August 29, 2010. 
^ efworld
^ "Powell: Friendship with Israel means friendship with Arabs" (PDF). afhu.org. 
^ McDonald, Terrence T. (February 8, 2013). "Gov. Christie visits Union City school opening, hears Democratic mayor praise him". NJ.com.
^ Wenik, Ian (June 9, 2013). "Saluting the general". The Union City Reporter. pp. 1 and 11.
^ "High Point University National Board of Advisors". 


Further reading

LaFeber, Walter, "The Rise and Fall of Colin Powell and the Powell Doctrine", Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Spring 2009), 71–93.
Powell, Colin A. and Joseph Persico, My American Journey, Ballantine Books, 1995. ISBN 0-345-40728-8.
Excerpts from My American Journey, TIME, September 18, 1995.
DeYoung, Karen, Soldier: The Life of Colin Powell, Alfred A. Knopf, 2006. ISBN 1-4000-4170-8.
"Alex Haley's Other Roots: African-Americans with Irish Ancestors". February 25, 2006. Retrieved February 22, 2008. 
Powell, Colin; Koltz, Tony (2012). It Worked for Me: Lessons in Leadership and Life. Harper. ISBN 978-0062135124. 

External links

Find more aboutColin Powellat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Appearances on C-SPAN
Colin Powell on Charlie Rose
Colin Powell on IMDb
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The New York Times. 
"Colin Powell collected news and commentary". The Guardian.  
Works by or about Colin Powell in libraries (WorldCat catalog)
Colin Powell: America's Best Leaders from U.S. News & World Report
Issue positions and quotes at On the Issues
Colin Powell Quotes
African Americans in the U.S. Army
The American Presidency Project: Remarks on the Retirement of General Colin Powell in Arlington, Virginia, September 30, 1993
Address to the National Summit on Africa, Washington, D.C., February 2000
Remarks to the United Nations Security Council, February 5, 2003
Complete text, audio, video of Colin Powell's Remarks to the UN Security Council AmericanRhetoric.com
"Curveball" Revelations Indicate falsified info used to start Iraq war and esp used for Powell's UN presentation on Iraq WMDs, November 5, 2007
Colin Powell demands answers over Curveball's WMD lies, Ed Pikington, Helen Pidd and Martin Chulov, The Guardian, February 16, 2011
WARGS: Ancestry of Gen. Colin Powell



Political offices


Preceded by
Peter Rodman
Deputy National Security Advisor
1987
Succeeded by
John Negroponte


Preceded by
Frank Carlucci
National Security Advisor
1987–1989
Succeeded by
Brent Scowcroft


Preceded by
Madeleine Albright
United States Secretary of State
2001–2005
Succeeded by
Condoleezza Rice


Military offices


Preceded by
William Crowe
Chair of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
1989–1993
Succeeded by
David Jeremiah
Acting


Awards and achievements


Preceded by
Mikhail Gorbachev
Recipient of the Ronald Reagan Freedom Award
1993
Succeeded by
Yitzhak Rabin


Party political offices


Preceded by
Susan Molinari
Keynote Speaker of the Republican National Convention
2000
Served alongside: John McCain
Succeeded by
Zell Miller








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Cabinet of President George W. Bush (2001–09)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Colin Powell (2001–05)
Condoleezza Rice (2005–09)








Secretary of the Treasury



Paul H. O'Neill (2001–02)
John W. Snow (2003–06)
Henry Paulson (2006–09)





Secretary of Defense



Donald Rumsfeld (2001–06)
Robert Gates (2006–09)





Attorney General



John Ashcroft (2001–05)
Alberto Gonzales (2005–07)
Michael Mukasey (2007–09)





Secretary of the Interior



Gale Norton (2001–06)
Dirk Kempthorne (2006–09)





Secretary of Agriculture



Ann Veneman (2001–05)
Mike Johanns (2005–07)
Ed Schafer (2008–09)





Secretary of Commerce



Donald Evans (2001–05)
Carlos Gutierrez (2005–09)





Secretary of Labor



Elaine Chao (2001–09)





Secretary of Health and
Human Services



Tommy Thompson (2001–05)
Mike Leavitt (2005–09)





Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development



Mel Martinez (2001–03)
Alphonso Jackson (2003–08)
Steve Preston (2008–09)





Secretary of Transportation



Norman Mineta (2001–06)
Mary E. Peters (2006–09)





Secretary of Energy



Spencer Abraham (2001–05)
Samuel Bodman (2005–09)





Secretary of Education



Rod Paige (2001–05)
Margaret Spellings (2005–09)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Anthony Principi (2001–05)
Jim Nicholson (2005–07)
James Peake (2007–09)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Tom Ridge (2003–05)
Michael Chertoff (2005–09)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Dick Cheney (2001–09)





White House Chief of Staff



Andrew Card (2001–06)
Joshua Bolten (2006–09)





Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency



Christine Todd Whitman (2001–03)
Mike Leavitt (2003–05)
Stephen L. Johnson (2005–09)





Director of the Office of
Management and Budget



Mitch Daniels (2001–03)
Joshua Bolten (2003–06)
Rob Portman (2006–07)
Jim Nussle (2007–09)





Director of National Drug
Control Policy



John P. Walters (2001–09)





Trade Representative



Robert Zoellick (2001–05)
Rob Portman (2005–06)
Susan Schwab (2006–09)













Chairmen of the Joint Chiefs of Staff









Bradley
Radford
Twining
Lemnitzer
Taylor
Wheeler
Moorer
Brown
Jones
Vessey
Crowe
Powell
Jeremiah (acting)
Shalikashvili
Shelton
Myers
Pace
Mullen
Dempsey
Dunford















v
t
e


Assistants to the President for National Security Affairs






Cutler
Anderson
Jackson
Cutler
Gray
Bundy
Rostow
Kissinger
Scowcroft
Brzezinski
Allen
Clark
McFarlane
Poindexter
Carlucci
Powell
Scowcroft
Lake
Berger
C. Rice
Hadley
Jones
Donilon
S. Rice
Flynn
Kellogg (acting)
McMaster















v
t
e


Recipients of the Soldier's Medal






Marty Allen
Glenn Andreotta
Clift Andrus
Aaron Bank
James Leroy Bondsteel
Leonard Boswell
Allison Brooks
William Francis Buckley
Max Cleland
Lawrence Colburn
John Thomas Corley
Wayne A. Downing
Theodore Leslie Futch
John Galvin
Elmer Gedeon
Carl Genian
Hershel W. Gober
John F. Goodman
David E. Grange Jr.
Ed Grady
Edith Ellen Greenwood
Francis Grevemberg
Bo Gritz
William W. Hartzog
Mike Hayden
Anthony Herbert
Patrick J. Hessian
Don Holleder
Bob Hoover
Eli D. Hoyle
Otto Kerner Jr.
Darwin K. Kyle
Richard L. Lawson
Reis Leming
Charles Andrew MacGillivary
William A. Matheny
Charles J. McDonnell
Jack N. Merritt
Leo J. Meyer
Henry Mucci
José Antonio Muñiz
Thomas Alexander Parrott
Frank D. Peregory
Colin Powell
Edwin W. Rawlings
Richard Scholtes
Preston Schoyer
Stephen Silvasy Jr.
John K. Singlaub
Alek Skarlatos
Christopher Speer
Donn A. Starry
Joseph Warren Stilwell Jr.
Thomas Tackaberry
Hugh Thompson Jr.
Clarence L. Tinker
Alfred Valenzuela
Leon L. Van Autreve
David Wade
Ron Welch
Samuel Tankersley Williams
Walter K. Wilson Jr.






Names are in alphabetical order







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 79113153
LCCN: n87926095
ISNI: 0000 0001 0858 8433
GND: 119077817
SUDOC: 073950408
BNF: cb12496187m (data)
NDL: 00515602
NKC: jo2003163174
IATH: w68g9rsz










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Colin_Powell&oldid=790924136"					
Categories: 1937 birthsLiving people21st-century American politicians21st-century American writersAfrican-American diplomatsAfrican-American members of the Cabinet of the United StatesAfrican-American military personnelAfrican-American politiciansAfrican-American writersAmerican EpiscopaliansAmerican male writersAmerican memoiristsAmerican military personnel of the Gulf WarAmerican military personnel of the Vietnam WarAmerican people of Jamaican descentAmerican people of Scottish descentAmerican political writersAmerican politicians of Jamaican descentChairmen of the Joint Chiefs of StaffCity College of New York alumniCongressional Gold Medal recipientsFellows of the United States National Academy of Public AdministrationGeorge W. Bush administration cabinet membersGeorge Washington University School of Business alumniHonorary Knights Commander of the Order of the BathIraq and weapons of mass destructionKleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers peopleLégion d'honneur recipientsMilitary leaders of the Gulf WarMilitary personnel from New York CityMy Lai MassacreNational War College alumniNew York RepublicansPeople from HarlemPeople from the BronxPeople from McLean, VirginiaPershing RiflemenPolitical realistsPresidential Citizens Medal recipientsPresidential Medal of Freedom recipientsReagan administration personnelRecipients of the Air MedalRecipients of the Defense Distinguished Service MedalRecipients of the Defense Superior Service MedalRecipients of the Distinguished Service Medal (US Army)Recipients of the Legion of MeritRecipients of the Order of Saint MauriceRecipients of the Order of Skanderbeg (1990–)Recipients of the Order of Stara PlaninaRecipients of the Soldier's MedalSpingarn Medal winnersUnited States Army Command and General Staff College alumniUnited States Army Command and General Staff College facultyUnited States Army generalsUnited States National Security AdvisorsUnited States Secretaries of StateWhite House FellowsWriters from New York CityHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listWikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleUse mdy dates from March 2012Wikipedia articles needing clarification from October 2011Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიLatviešuLietuviųमराठीმარგალურიBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng ViệtYorùbá中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 00:21.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 















Amazon.com: Ethnic & National: Books: African-American & Black, Irish, Jewish, Chinese, Japanese, Australian & More












 


























Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Ethnic & National Biographies



Ethnic & National Biographies
All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






Books Advanced Search New Releases NEW! Amazon Charts Best Sellers & More The New York Times® Best Sellers Children's Books Textbooks Textbook Rentals Sell Us Your Books Best Books of the Month Kindle eBooks












































































Ethnic & National Biographies










            Shop by category
        




        
            





.












African-American & Black...






        
            





.












Hispanic & Latino Biographies






        
            





.












Native American Biographies






        
            





.












Irish Biographies






        
            





.












Jewish Biographies










        
            





.












Australian Biographies






        
            





.












Scandinavian Biographies






        
            





.












Japanese Biographies






        
            





.












Chinese Biographies






        
            





.






















Best sellers




Previous page






The Color of Water













	James McBride




	
		Kindle Edition
	



1,433



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $12.99  








Lion (Movie Tie-In)


Saroo Brierley

		Kindle Edition
	



194



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.99  








The Other Wes Moore: One Name, Two Fates


Wes Moore

		Paperback
	



1,006



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $8.44  









You Don't Have to Say You Love Me: A...













	Sherman Alexie, Hachette Audio




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



77



$29.65 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $25.95  








Hidden Figures: The American Dream...


Margot Lee Shetterly

		Paperback
	



1,466



$15.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.57  









Sting-Ray Afternoons: A Memoir


Steve Rushin

		Hardcover
	



24



$27.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $17.68  









The Autobiography of Malcolm X: As...


Alex Haley, ...Malcolm X...




	
		Paperback
	



1,114



$7.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $6.00  









A Long Way Home: A Memoir


Saroo Brierley

		Paperback
	



907



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.73  









Notes of a Native Son













	James Baldwin, Edward P. Jones




	
		Kindle Edition
	



69



$15.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $1.99  








Born to Run: A Hidden Tribe...


Christopher McDougall

		Paperback
	



3,625



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.53  









Luther: The Life and Longing of...


Craig Seymour

		Kindle Edition
	



131



$4.99  








The Fire Next Time


James Baldwin

		Paperback
	



298



$13.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $6.42  









Enrique's Journey: The Story of a...


Sonia Nazario

		Paperback
	



458



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.07  









The Immortal Life of Henrietta Lacks


Rebecca Skloot

		Kindle Edition
	



5,558



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.99  








March: Book One


John Lewis, ...Nate Powell...




	
		Paperback
	



430



$14.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.85  









Ants Among Elephants: An Untouchable...


Sujatha Gidla

		Hardcover
	



3



$28.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $17.37  









The Misadventures of Awkward Black Girl













	Issa Rae, Simon & Schuster Audio




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



357



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $15.95  








The Girl with Seven Names: A North...


Hyeonseo Lee, David John

		Kindle Edition
	



1,281



$15.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.99  








With the Old Breed: At Peleliu and...


E. B. Sledge

		Paperback
	



2,591



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $8.80  









Tears We Cannot Stop: A Sermon to...


Michael Eric Dyson

		Hardcover
	



331



$24.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $12.49  



Next page













Most wished for




Previous page






Coach Wooden and Me: Our 50-Year...


Kareem Abdul-Jabbar

		Hardcover
	



92



$29.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $20.30  









March (Trilogy Slipcase Set)


John Lewis, ...Nate Powell...




	
		Paperback
	



211



$49.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $27.39  









Finding Gobi: A Little Dog with a...


Craig Borlase, Dion Leonard

		Paperback
	



321



$16.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.51  









Obama: The Call of History













	Peter Baker




	
		Hardcover
	



12



$50.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $34.00  









In a Sunburned Country


Bill Bryson

		Paperback
	



1,357



$16.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.16  









Man's Search for Meaning, Gift Edition













	Viktor E. Frankl, William J. Winslade...




	
		Hardcover
	



3,700



$22.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $14.35  









Same Kind of Different As Me: A...













	Ron Hall, Denver Moore...




	
		Paperback
	



2,463



$16.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.21  









Obama: The Historic Presidency of...













	Mark Greenberg, Ken Burns




	
		Hardcover
	



29



$24.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $16.42  









Empire of the Summer Moon: Quanah...


S. C. Gwynne

		Paperback
	



2,352



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.21  









March: Book Two


John Lewis, ...Nate Powell...




	
		Paperback
	



184



$19.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.89  









March: Book Three


John Lewis, ...Nate Powell...




	
		Paperback
	



157



$19.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.96  









Kennedy and King: The President, the...


Steven E. Levingston

		Hardcover
	



4



$28.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $16.85  









I Am Not Your Negro













	James Baldwin, Raoul Peck




	
		Paperback
	



108



$15.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.98  









42 Faith: The Rest of the Jackie...













	Ed Henry, Larry King




	
		Hardcover
	



81



$24.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $15.95  









Jackie's Girl: My Life with the...


Kathy McKeon

		Hardcover
	



169



$26.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $16.45  









Letter to My Daughter


Maya Angelou

		Paperback
	



375



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.57  









Ways of Grace: Stories of Activism...













	James Blake, Carol Taylor




	
		Hardcover
	



1



$26.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $16.46  









Rising Star: The Making of Barack Obama


David J. Garrow

		Hardcover
	



76



$45.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $22.50  









You Can't Touch My Hair: And Other...













	Phoebe Robinson, Jessica Williams




	
		Paperback
	



142



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.85  









An Invisible Thread: The True Story...


Alex Tresniowski, ...Laura Schroff...




	
		Paperback
	



2,601



$15.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $8.74  



Next page













Hot new releases




Previous page






Inside Studio 54













	Mark Fleischman, Denise Chatman...




	
		Hardcover
	

$26.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $23.31  









This Is Just My Face: Try Not to Stare













	Gabourey Sidibe, Audible Studios




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



75



$24.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $21.95  








The Awkward Thoughts of W. Kamau Bell...













	W. Kamau Bell, Penguin Audio




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



51



$31.50 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $26.95  








Chester B. Himes: A Biography













	Lawrence P. Jackson




	
		Hardcover
	



2



$35.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $21.53  









This Will Be My Undoing: Living at...













	Morgan Jerkins




	
		Paperback
	

$15.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $12.13  









Queen of Bebop: The Musical Lives of...













	Elaine M. Hayes




	
		Hardcover
	

$27.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $19.03  









Missileman













	John Clauson




	
		Hardcover
	



2



$25.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $23.45  









I Was Told to Come Alone: My Journey...













	Souad Mekhennet, Kirsten Potter...




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



46



$31.49 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $26.95  








Growing Up Italian-American: The...













	Ferdinand J. Visco M.D.




	
		Paperback
	



1



$15.95  









Daring to Drive: A Saudi Woman's...













	Manal al-Sharif, Lameece Issaq...




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



46



$22.67 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $20.95  








Keep Your Airspeed Up: The Story of a...













	Harold H. Brown, Marsha S. Bordner




	
		Hardcover
	



2



$29.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $21.99  









If All the Seas Were Ink: A Memoir


Ilana Kurshan

		Hardcover
	

$26.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $18.35  









Around the Way Girl: A Memoir













	Taraji P. Henson, Denene Millner




	
		Paperback
	



316



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $14.81  









Check Six!: A Thunderbolt Pilot's War...













	Jim Curran, Jr, Terrence Popravak




	
		Kindle Edition
	



176



$32.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $2.99  








Spies in the Family: An American...













	Eva Dillon, Gabra Zackman...




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



61



$25.09 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $21.95  








The Futilitarians: Our Year of...


Anne Gisleson

		Kindle Edition
	

$27.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $13.99  








The Life of Mikey: A Memoir


Michael K. Willis

		Kindle Edition
	

$2.99  








Young Radicals: In the War for...













	Jeremy McCarter, Audible Studios




	
		Audible Audio Edition
	



13



$24.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $21.95  








Saigon Kids: An American Military...


Les Arbuckle

		Paperback
	

$19.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $13.36  









A Stone of Hope: A Memoir













	Jim St. Germain, Jon Sternfeld




	
		Hardcover
	



4



$27.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $17.68  



Next page













Most gifted




Previous page






One Day We'll All Be Dead and None of...


Scaachi Koul

		Paperback
	



28



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.81  









The Reason I Jump: The Inner Voice of...













	Naoki Higashida, KA Yoshida...




	
		Paperback
	



1,719



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.67  









Drop the Ball: Achieving More by...













	Tiffany Dufu, Gloria Steinem




	
		Hardcover
	



48



$25.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $13.68  









The Home That Was Our Country: A...


Alia Malek

		Hardcover
	



40



$27.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $18.29  









The Fish That Ate the Whale: The Life...


Rich Cohen

		Paperback
	



213



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.66  









Dreams from My Father: A Story of...













	Barack Obama




	
		Paperback
	



1,416



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.90  









People Who Eat Darkness: The True...


Richard Lloyd Parry

		Paperback
	



337



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.41  









The Beautiful Struggle: A Memoir


Ta-Nehisi Coates

		Paperback
	



173



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $7.83  









Empire State of Mind: How Jay Z Went...













	Zack O'Malley Greenburg, Steve Forbes




	
		Paperback
	



127



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $12.54  









Waking Up White, and Finding Myself...


Debby Irving

		Paperback
	



268



$19.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $17.99  









The Heart of Everything That Is: The...


Bob Drury, Tom Clavin

		Paperback
	



1,005



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $7.19  









Angela's Ashes: A Memoir













	Frank McCourt, Brooke Zimmer...




	
		Paperback
	



2,868



$17.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $10.31  









Black Pioneers of Science and Invention


Louis Haber

		Paperback
	



98



$8.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $6.50  



Next page













Top rated




Previous page






The Hiding Place


Corrie Ten Boom, ...John L. Sherrill...




	
		Audio CD
	



2,789



$19.93  









Voice in the Night: The True Story of...













	Pastor Surprise, Bill Johnson...




	
		Paperback
	



180



$13.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $8.79  









Flower of God: A Jewish family's 3000...


Herbert Ausubel

		Kindle Edition
	



156



$25.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $9.99  








Suga Water: A Memoir


Arshay Cooper

		Paperback
	



75



$15.93  









My Old Man and the Mountain: A Memoir


Leif Whittaker

		Hardcover
	



55



$24.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $21.20  









Felon-Attorney


TheArthur A. Duncan II Esq.

		Paperback
	



53



$19.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $12.23  









The Making of a Healer: Teachings of...


Russell FourEagles

		Paperback
	



51



$18.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $14.13  









Spots (Spotty Books Trilogy Book 1)













	Judy Brummer




	
		Kindle Edition
	



43



$5.99  








My Life, My Love, My Legacy













	Coretta Scott King, Rev. Dr. Barbara Reynolds




	
		Hardcover
	



41



$30.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $17.85  









From Farm to Market: Stories of...


Lindy Mayberry Sellers

		Kindle Edition
	



41



$22.43 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $4.99  








Becoming Ms. Burton: From Prison to...













	Susan Burton, Cari Lynn...




	
		Hardcover
	



40



$25.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $18.03  









Dream Real: A Top Sports Agent's Tips...













	Eugene Napoleon, Michael D'Amato




	
		Paperback
	



37



$13.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $12.79  









Luba's Travels: Travels of the Heart













	Luba Ruzicka, Steven Bauer




	
		Paperback
	



36



$9.99  









Maria's Journey













	Ray Arredondo, Trish Arredondo




	
		Paperback
	



36



$19.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $14.60  









Three Marias: A Sicilian Story


Roger Armbruster

		Kindle Edition
	



33



$14.99 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $6.99  








The Vision: The Dramatic True Story...













	Tom Brown




	
		Paperback
	



32



$16.00 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $11.39  









The Token Black Guide: Navigations...


Donald R Guillory II

		Paperback
	



32



$15.00  









Stepping Into the River:  An American...













	Marc Nemiroff




	
		Paperback
	



32



$16.99  









The Black Book













	Midleton Harris, Morris Levitt...




	
		Hardcover
	



30











The Girl from the Tower


Joanna Giangardella

		Kindle Edition
	



30



$14.95 
			

			
			
    
    
    
        
        $2.99  


Next page












1-12 of 37,440 results for Books : Biographies & Memoirs : Ethnic & National



Sort by 
Featured
Price: Low to High
Price: High to Low
Avg. Customer Review
Publication Date
Most reviews




















You Don't Have to Say You Love Me: A MemoirJun 13, 2017by Sherman AlexieHardcover
$
19
40

$28.00PrimeGet it by Tomorrow, Jul 29FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$13.96(80 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
14
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Audible Audio Edition, Audio CD
4.5 out of 5 stars
77Best Sellerin Cell BiologyThe Immortal Life of Henrietta LacksMar 8, 2011by Rebecca SklootPaperback
$
10
67

$16.00PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 28FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$2.75(652 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
10
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Paperback, Hardcover, Audible Audio Edition, Mass Market Paperback, Audio CD
4.6 out of 5 stars
5,558Best Sellerin Popular Psychology CounselingMan's Search for MeaningJun 1, 2006by Viktor E. Frankl and William J. WinsladePaperback
$
8
99

$9.99PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 28FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$3.90(243 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
1
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Paperback, Hardcover, Audible Audio Edition, Mass Market Paperback
4.7 out of 5 stars
3,700Hidden Figures: The American Dream and the Untold Story of the Black Women Mathematicians Who Helped Win the Space RaceDec 6, 2016by Margot Lee ShetterlyPaperback
$
9
57

$15.99PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible ordersOnly 6 left in stock - order soon.More Buying Choices$5.38(137 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
10
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Hardcover, Audible Audio Edition, Audio CD
4.5 out of 5 stars
1,463Best Sellerin General Library & Information SciencesThe Other Wes Moore: One Name, Two FatesJan 11, 2011by Wes MoorePaperback
$
8
44

$16.00PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 28FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$2.71(394 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
11
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Hardcover, Audible Audio Edition, Mass Market Paperback, Audio CD
4.5 out of 5 stars
1,006Sting-Ray Afternoons: A MemoirJul 3, 2017by Steve RushinHardcover
$
17
68

$27.00PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 28FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$11.92(59 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
13
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Audible Audio Edition
4.8 out of 5 stars
24Obama: The Call of HistoryJun 27, 2017by Peter BakerHardcover
$
34
00

$50.00PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible ordersUsually ships in 2 to 4 weeksMore Buying Choices$34.00(19 used &amp new offers)
4 out of 5 stars
12Anne Frank: The Diary of a Young GirlJun 1, 1993by Anne Frank and B.M. MooyaartMass Market Paperback
$
5
59

$6.99PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 28FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$0.25(665 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
2
99

Auto-delivered wirelesslyOther Formats:Paperback, Audible Audio Edition, Mass Market Paperback, Library Binding, Audio CD
4.6 out of 5 stars
2,500Best Sellerin India HistoryA Long Way Home: A MemoirJun 2, 2015by Saroo BrierleyPaperback
$
11
73

$16.00PrimeGet it by Tomorrow, Jul 29FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$7.28(109 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
13
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Audible Audio Edition, Library Binding, MP3 CD
4.7 out of 5 stars
907The Color of Water: A Black Man's Tribute to His White MotherFeb 7, 2006by James McBridePaperback
$
12
51

$16.00PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 28FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$0.01(428 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
12
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Audible Audio Edition, Library Binding, Audio CD
4.6 out of 5 stars
1,433Narrative of the Life of Frederick DouglassApr 13, 1995by Frederick DouglassPaperback
$
2
70

PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 28FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$0.15(728 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
0
00

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Audible Audio Edition, Mass Market Paperback, Library Binding, Spiral-bound, MP3 CD, Flexibound
4.6 out of 5 stars
2,189Finding Gobi: A Little Dog with a Very Big HeartJun 13, 2017by Dion Leonard and Craig BorlasePaperback
$
10
51

$16.99PrimeGet it by Tomorrow, Jul 29FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$9.89(38 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
9
99

Whispersync for Voice-readyOther Formats:Hardcover, Audible Audio Edition, Audio CD
4.9 out of 5 stars
321

 
Previous Page
1
2
3
...
100
 
Next Page
















Search FeedbackDid you find what you were looking for?YesNo
Choose a category that best describes the issue that you are having with the search:Choose a category…I need to talk to customer service.I still haven't found what I'm looking for.How do I filter or sort my search ?Something is broken.A picture or description looks wrong.Could you add a feature ?Could you start carrying a product not listed here ?Choose a category…






Leave us some comments about your search; your comments can help make our site better for everyone.Submit

Get Express customer service or contact us by e-mail or phone.contact us

Thank you for your feedback.
If you need help or have a question for Customer Service, please visit the Help Section.


Show results forNew ReleasesLast 30 daysLast 90 daysComing Soon
                                Books
                                Biographies & MemoirsEthnic & NationalAfrican-American & BlackAustralianChineseHispanic & LatinoIrishJapaneseJewishNative AmericanScandinavianRefine bySubjectFrederick DouglassMartin Luther King, Jr.Malcolm XW. E. B. Du BoisAnne FrankBarack ObamaOscar WildeSee moreFormatPaperbackHardcoverKindle EditionLarge PrintAudible Audio EditionPrinted Access CodeLoose LeafAudio CDBoard BookKindle UnlimitedKindle Unlimited EligibleAuthorSherman AlexieRebecca SklootHarold S. KushnerViktor E. FranklShetterly, Margot LeeWes MoorePeter BakerSee moreBook SeriesMarch TrilogyFrank McCourtVintage InternationalFunny in FarsiDover Thrift EditionsMausPenguin ClassicsSee moreLanguageEnglishGermanFrenchSpanishItalianChineseJapaneseSee moreAmazon PrimeEligible for Free ShippingFree Shipping by AmazonAward WinnersNewbery MedalThe Pulitzer PrizeEisner AwardPromotionBargain BooksAvg. Customer Review4 Stars & Up & Up3 Stars & Up & Up2 Stars & Up & Up1 Star & Up & UpInternational ShippingAmazonGlobal EligibleConditionNewUsedCollectibleAvailabilityInclude Out of Stock






















        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.






        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.













There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started















Back to top
Get to Know UsCareersAbout AmazonInvestor RelationsAmazon DevicesMake Money with UsSell on AmazonSell Your Services on AmazonSell on Amazon BusinessSell Your Apps on AmazonBecome an AffiliateAdvertise Your ProductsSelf-Publish with UsBecome an Amazon VendorSell Your Subscription on Amazon›See allAmazon Payment ProductsAmazon Rewards Visa Signature CardsAmazon.com Store CardAmazon.com Corporate Credit LineShop with PointsCredit Card MarketplaceReload Your BalanceAmazon Currency ConverterLet Us Help YouYour AccountYour OrdersShipping Rates & PoliciesAmazon PrimeReturns & ReplacementsManage Your Content and DevicesAmazon AssistantHelp




English



United States




Amazon Music Stream millions of songs

Amazon Drive Cloud storage from Amazon

6pm Score deals on fashion brands

AbeBooks Books, art & collectibles

ACX  Audiobook Publishing Made Easy

Alexa Actionable Analytics for the Web

Amazon Business Everything For Your Business

 

AmazonFresh Groceries & More Right To Your Door

AmazonGlobal Ship Orders Internationally

Home Services Handpicked Pros Happiness Guarantee

Amazon Inspire Digital Educational  Resources

Amazon Rapids Fun stories for  kids on the go

Amazon Restaurants Food delivery from local restaurants

Amazon Video Direct Video Distribution Made Easy

 

Amazon Web Services Scalable Cloud Computing Services

Audible Download Audio Books

AudiobookStand Discount Audiobooks on Disc

Book Depository Books With Free Delivery Worldwide

Box Office Mojo Find Movie Box Office Data

ComiXology Thousands of Digital Comics

CreateSpace Indie Print Publishing Made Easy

 

DPReview Digital Photography

East Dane Designer Men's Fashion

Fabric Sewing, Quilting & Knitting

Goodreads Book reviews & recommendations

IMDb Movies, TV & Celebrities

IMDbPro Get Info Entertainment Professionals Need

Junglee.com Shop Online in India

 

Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital Publishing Made Easy


Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Delivery on Everyday Items

Prime Photos Unlimited Photo Storage Free With Prime

Shopbop Designer Fashion Brands

TenMarks.com Math Activities for Kids & Schools

Warehouse Deals Open-Box Discounts

Whispercast Discover & Distribute Digital Content


 

 

Withoutabox Submit to Film Festivals

Woot! Deals and  Shenanigans

Zappos Shoes & Clothing

Souq.com Shop Online in the Middle East

Subscribe with Amazon Discover & try subscription services

 


Conditions of UsePrivacy NoticeInterest-Based Ads© 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates




















Colin L. Powell - HDBD















































All News
All Verdicts
Book a Speaker
Disclaimer
Honors and Awards
 
Home
About
Attorneys
Practice Areas
Results & News
Contact



















About


Attorneys


Practice Areas


Results & News


Book a Speaker


Contact







Trucking & Transportation
Design Professional Malpractice
Labor Employment Litigation
Oil Gas
Consumer Commercial Collection Matters
Construction Litigation
Warranty Deceptive Trade Practice
Healthcare Litigation
Professional Liability
Insurance Defense Litigation
Class Action Multidistrict Litigation
Premises Liability
Toxic Torts/Environmental
Personal Injury Defense
Intellectual Property
Dealer/Franchise Litigation
Commercial Litigation
Product Liability Litigation




All News
All Verdicts
Book a Speaker
Disclaimer
Honors and Awards
 


Menu




 



Colin L. Powell







Download Vcard


Colin L. Powell
Associate
After graduating from Baylor University School of Law, Colin began his legal career at HDBD with a focus in product liability.
Before joining the firm, Colin worked as an intern at the U.S. Attorney’s Office in Dallas, Texas, where he conducted research and was responsible for drafting on criminal practice and procedure issues. Prior to graduation, Colin served as a summer associate at the firm and gained experience working on personal injury cases.
In 2011, Colin graduated magna cum laude with a Bachelor of Arts degree in History from Baylor University. While attending law school, he won numerous awards for his impressive efforts in mock trial competitions, and was the winner of the 2013 Bob and Karen Wortham “Top Gun” Fall Practice Court Mock Trial Competition.
Telephone: 214.346.3790
            Fax: 214.267.4280
            cpowell@hdbdlaw.com
          	8750 N. Central Expy.
            Suite 1600
          	Dallas, Texas  75231
          






Curriculum Vitae


Education

			      Baylor University, J.D. 2014 • National Trial Competition Mock Trial Team • Tournament of Champions Mock Trial Team • American Association of Justice Mock Trial Team (Regional Semifinalist) • National Criminal Procedure Moot Court Team (Third-Place Brief) • Dawson & Sodd Spring Moot Court Competition SemifinalistBaylor University, B.A. History (magna cum laude) 2011
			    




Bar & Court Admissions

			      TexasU.S. District Court for the Northern District of Texas
			    




Honors & Awards

			      • Winner of the 2013 Bob and Karen Wortham "Top Gun" Fall Practice Court Mock Trial Competition• Scott, Douglass & McConnico, L.L.P. Evidence Award from Baylor Law American Board of Trial Advocates Award from Baylor Law School
			    




Professional Affiliations & Activities

			      • Waco I.S.D. Education Foundation Board Member, 2011-2014• Heart of Texas Regional History Fair Judge, 2009-2012
			    




Areas of Practice



  
  
  
  	Personal Injury Defense
  

  



  
  
  
  	Product Liability Litigation
  

  









 
 
 
 






















 



Colin Powell - Vyrso
	



















































Vyrso: Christian Ebooks








Search







Sign in



Sign in with your Faithlife/Logos account












Email address



Password



Sign in
Forgot your password?





No account?
Sign up for a free account


 





Products

Young Adult Non-Fiction

Colin Powell















Colin Powell

by								Gregg Lewis, Deborah Shaw Lewis












Tweet







$2.99




Add to cart





Overview

Take an up-close and personal look into the lives of some well-known Christians who are successful leaders in their careers. The Today's Heroes series features everyday people who overcame great adversity to become modern-day heroes. Kids ages eight to twelve will be inspired by the compelling stories of courageous individuals who are making a real difference. In Today's Heroes: Colin Powell, learn the inspiring story of how an average kid from the Bronx grew up to become the first African-American ever appointed as Secretary of State. In fourth grade Colin Powell was put in the slow class, and in high school he only got Cs, but when he joined the ROTC while in college, his life changed. Through hard work, faith, and perseverance, Colin Powell rose through the ranks to become the first African-American to ever serve as the nation's top military commander---chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. Read the compelling story of a true pioneer and an American hero in Today's Heroes: Colin Powell.

Details


					Title: Colin Powell


					Author: 
					
Gregg Lewis, Deborah Shaw Lewis






											Genre: 

								


Young Adult Non-Fiction






					Publisher: 
Zondervan



						ISBN: 9780310865902


Author Information


Gregg Lewis is an award winning author or coauthor of more than fifty books, including the NY Times bestseller, Tom Landry: An Autobiography. Gregg and his wife Deborah have been married for more than thirty-seven years and have five adult children. They currently write and live in Georgia.








Goodreads Reviews


Reviews from Goodreads.com















Other books in this genre









8 Essentials for a Life of Significance



$5.99



Add to cart









Awesome Bible Heroes



$5.99



Add to cart









Awesome Bible Kids



$1.99



Add to cart









Awesome Bible Mysteries



$3.99



Add to cart









Awesome Power Parables



$3.99



Add to cart









Awful Bible Bad Guys



$3.99



Add to cart









Believing in Narnia: A Kid's Guide to Unlocking the Secret Symbols of Faith in C.S. Lewis' The Chronicles of Narnia



$7.99



Add to cart









Checklist for Life for teens: 40 Days of Timeless Wisdom & Foolproof Strategies for Making the Most of Life's Challenges and Opportunities



$9.99



Add to cart






















Follow us










Enter your email address to get Vyrso updates about ebooks, authors, and specials.


Submit















Tweet


















What is Vyrso?
FAQ
Forums
Press Room
Privacy
Contact Us
Mobile
Blog


Copyright 2011-2017 Faithlife / Logos Bible Software.













;



My American Journey:  Colin Powell: 9780345466419 - Christianbook.com























































Hear about sales, receive special offers & more.You can unsubscribe at any time.


Enter email address














My Account

Wishlist

Help

Email Signup


Cart (0)  items
Checkout

Welcome to Christianbook.com! Sign in or create an account 




Search by title, author, isbn, etc.







Dollar Days- Shop $10 or Less





Tumblers, Water Bottles, & More





Fab Fridays







Search within

All Products
Books
eBook
Music
MP3 Downloads
Accompaniment
Bibles
Homeschool
Gift & Home
DVDs
Christian Living
Children
Fiction
Software







Search



Bibles
VBS
Church
Bible Study
Books
eBooks
Fiction
Homeschool
Music
Kids
Toys
Gifts
DVD
Bargain



BestsellersPrayerChristian LivingSpanish ProductsMP3sVBSChurch SuppliesBible CoversFamilyGift CardsCatalogMembers










My American Journey
 By: Colin Powell




 









Buy Item
$19.80 Retail:  $22.00  Save 10% ($2.20) In Stock Stock No: WW466419 Ballantine Books / 2003 / Paperback 
Quantity:


 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10+ 

 






            Add To Cart
            Add To Cart
 












            Add To Wishlist
            Add To Wishlist






Buy eBook
Begin reading in seconds $14.99 eBook Details 
























Quantity:


 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10+ 

 






            Add To Cart
            Add To Cart

  











                Wishlist
                Wishlist






My American Journey By: Colin Powell
Ballantine Books / 2003 / Paperback Write a Review

In StockStock No: WW466419



 


Browse

All Products

Books, eBooks & Audio&times

Non-Fiction&times

Biography&times

Political Figures&times (404)













Refine by

Audience▼▲WomenMenYoung AdultParentsBinding▼▲HardcoverMass MarketPaperbackTrade PaperbackFormat▼▲AbridgedLarge PrintUnabridgedLanguage▼▲SpanishMedia Type▼▲Audio CDeBookMP3MP3 CDSeries▼▲HJLMPVDRM▼▲DRM FreeDRM Protected
Author / Artist▼▲ A B C D E F G H I J K L M N P R S T U V W Y ZPublisher▼▲ A B C D E F G H I L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y ZTop Rated▼▲1+ Stars2+ Stars3+ Stars4+ Stars5 starsPrice▼▲$0-$5$5-$10$10-$25$25-$50$50-$100$100 and upDiscount▼▲10%+ Off20%+ Off30%+ Off40%+ Off50%+ Off60%+ Off70%+ Off80%+ Off


Advanced Search Links

Advanced Search
Commentary Search
Bible Finder
Homeschool Finder
Song Search
Bible Study Search



 Product Close-up
This product is not available for expedited shipping.* This product is available for shipment only to the USA.





          Others Also Purchased (15)
       
          Other Formats (2)
       



Add To Cart







▼▲Others Also Purchased (15)
    


Add To Cart




Description Availability Price
Add Include


 
 






An American Journey
                

In Stock 
$23.39
Retail: $25.99 



Add To Cart
 $23.39 

 
 






It Worked for Me: In Life and Leadership
                

In Stock 
$14.39
Retail: $15.99 



Add To Cart
 $14.39 

 
 






My American Journey - eBook
                

In Stock 
$14.99




Add To Cart
 0 $14.99 

 
 






Primary Mathematics Textbook 4A Common Core Edition
                

In Stock 
$21.90




Add To Cart
 $21.90 

 
 






Primary Mathematics Workbook 4A Common Core Edition
                

In Stock 
$16.90




Add To Cart
 $16.90 

 
 






Primary Mathematics Workbook 5A Common Core Edition
                

In Stock 
$16.90




Add To Cart
 $16.90 

 
 






Dimensions Math Textbook 6A
                

Expected to ship on or about 08/16/17.  
$22.50




Add To Cart
 $22.50 

 
 






Living by the Book: The Art and Science of Reading the Bible, Revised and Updated
                

In Stock 
$10.49
Retail: $18.99 



Add To Cart
 $10.49 

 
 






Dimensions Math Textbook 7A
                

In Stock 
$24.00




Add To Cart
 $24.00 

 
 






Art Projects K4
                

In Stock 
$13.60




Add To Cart
 $13.60 

 
 






KJV Kids Study Bible, Hardcover edition
                

In Stock 
$13.99
Retail: $22.95 



Add To Cart
 $13.99 

 
 






Bruchko
                

In Stock 
$8.99
Retail: $14.99 



Add To Cart
 $8.99 

 
 






Primary Mathematics Textbook 2A Common Core Edition
                

In Stock 
$18.70




Add To Cart
 $18.70 

 
 






Arts & Crafts with Amber Lamb, Second Edition
                

In Stock 
$13.60




Add To Cart
 $13.60 

 
 






Primary Mathematics Workbook 2A Common Core Edition
                

In Stock 
$17.50




Add To Cart
 $17.50 

 







View All 15 Products 

 

Add To Cart





▼▲Other Formats (2)
    


Add To Cart




Description Availability Price
Add Include


 
 






eBook
                

In Stock 
$14.99




Add To Cart
 0 $14.99 

 
 






Paperback
                

In Stock 
$19.80
Retail: $22.00 



Add To Cart
 $19.80 

 









Add To Cart









Product Information▼▲
Format: PaperbackNumber of Pages: 688Vendor: Ballantine BooksPublication Date: 2003Dimensions: 9.1 X 6.1 (inches)ISBN: 0345466411ISBN-13: 9780345466419

Other Customers Also Purchased


 

Add To Cart
Add To Wishlist  
An American Journey
Joseph S. Bonsall Joseph S. Bonsall Master Books / 2004 / Hardcover 
$23.39
Retail: $25.99 Save 10%
($2.60)   

Add To Cart
Add To Wishlist  
It Worked for Me: In Life and Leadership
Colin Powell Colin Powell HarperCollins / 2014 / Trade Paperback 
$14.39
Retail: $15.99 Save 10%
($1.60)   eBOOK

More Info
Add To Wishlist  
My American Journey - eBook
Colin Powell Colin Powell Ballantine Books / 2010 / ePub 
$14.99
  

Add To Cart
Add To Wishlist  
Primary Mathematics Textbook 4A Common Core Edition
Singaporemath.com Inc / 2014 / Trade Paperback 
$21.90
 


Related Products


 

Add To Cart
Add To Wishlist  
Primary Mathematics Workbook 3A Common Core Edition
Singaporemath.com Inc / 2014 / Trade Paperback 
$16.90
 5 Stars Out Of 5 1 Reviews  

Add To Cart
Add To Wishlist  
In Remembrance of Me Communion Table, Walnut Finish
Christian Brands / Stratford Chapel / Other 
$299.95
  

Add To Cart
Add To Wishlist  
Arts & Crafts with Button Bear, Second Edition
A Beka Book / Trade Paperback 
$12.95
  

Add To Cart
Add To Wishlist  
Exploring Creation with Biology 2nd Edition Video  Instruction DVD
Sherri Seligson Sherri Seligson Apologia Educational Ministries / 2015 / DVD 
$147.75
Retail: $179.00 Save 17%
($31.25)  


Publisher's Description▼▲
"A GREAT AMERICAN SUCCESS STORY . . . AN ENDEARING AND WELL-WRITTEN BOOK."--The New York Times Book ReviewColin Powell is the embodiment of the American dream. He was born in Harlem to immigrant parents from Jamaica. He knew the rough life of the streets. He overcame a barely average start at school. Then he joined the Army. The rest is history--Vietnam, the Pentagon, Panama, Desert Storm--but a history that until now has been known only on the surface. Here, for the first time, Colin Powell himself tells us how it happened, in a memoir distinguished by a heartfelt love of country and family, warm good humor, and a soldier's directness. MY AMERICAN JOURNEY is the powerful story of a life well lived and well told. It is also a view from the mountaintop of the political landscape of America. At a time when Americans feel disenchanted with their leaders, General Powell's passionate views on family, personal responsibility, and, in his own words, "the greatness of America and the opportunities it offers" inspire hope and present a blueprint for the future. An utterly absorbing account, it is history with a vision."The stirring, only-in-America story of one determined man's journey from the South Bronx to directing the mightiest of military forces . . . Fascinating."--The Washington Post Book World"Eloquent."--Los Angeles Times Book Review"PROFOUND AND MOVING . . . . Must reading for anyone who wants to reaffirm his faith in the promise of America."--Jack Kemp The Wall Street Journal"A book that is much like its subject--articulate, confident, impressive, but unpretentious and witty. . . . Whether you are a political junkie, a military buff, or just interested in a good story, MY AMERICAN JOURNEY is a book well worth reading."--San Diego Union Tribune"Colin Powell's candid, introspective autobiography is a joy for all with an appetite for well-written political and social commentary."--The Detroit NewsFrom the Paperback edition.


Author Bio▼▲
One of the most prominent figures in American public life, General Colin L. Powell served as the twelfth Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff under both President George Bush and President Bill Clinton. He was a major architect of Desert Storm, the dramatic Allied success in the forty-three-day Gulf War, which began in January 1991. General Powell was born in New York City in 1937 and raised in the South Bronx by his parents, who had immigrated to America from Jamaica. He came up through the New York City public school system and received a commission as an army second lieutenant upon graduation from the City College of New York in 1958. Early in his career, General Powell was stationed in Germany and in a number of posts in the United States, and served two tours in Vietnam, 1962-1963 and 1968-1969. He was also a battalion commander in Korea from 1973 to 1974 and later commanded the 2nd Brigade, 101st Airborne Division (Air Assault), at Fort Campbell, Kentucky, and V Corps in Germany. General Powell was appointed Deputy National Security Advisor by President Ronald Reagan in January 1987 and in December 1987 became National Security Advisor, a post he held until January 1989. He served as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff from October 1989 until his retirement on September 30, 1993. General Powell has received numerous U.S. military awards and decorations, as well as civilian awards honoring his public service, including the Presidential Medal of Freedom, which he was awarded twice. He has also been decorated by the governments of Argentina, Bahrain, Brazil, Canada, France, Germany, Greece, Jamaica, Japan, Korea, Kuwait, Saudi Arabia, Senegal, the United Kingdom, and Venezuela, and received an honorary knighthood (Knight Commanders of Bath) from the Queen of England.From the Hardcover edition.


Product Reviews▼▲
Be the first to write a review!


Write Review




Ask a Question▼▲

Have a question about this product? Ask us here.

Find Related Products▼▲
Books, eBooks & Audio >> Non-Fiction >> Biography >> Political Figures

Author/Artist Review▼▲
I'm the author/artist and I want to review My American Journey.

Back&times
Ask a Question


What would you like to know about this product? Please enter your name, your email and your question regarding the product in the fields below, and we'll answer you in the next 24-48 hours.
If you need immediate assistance regarding this product or any other, please call 1-800-CHRISTIAN to speak directly with a customer service representative.



Name:



Email:



Question:




Submit

Edit

Confirm









Sign Up To ReceiveExclusive Email OffersYou can unsubscribe at any time




Sign Up To Receive Exclusive Email OffersYou can unsubscribe at any time





Sign Up







Connect With Us








 Account

Checkout
Account
Order History
Wishlist
Cart
Subscribe Email
Unsubscribe Email


 Shipping & Returns

Shipping & Handling Rates
Easy Returns






 Services

Affiliate Program
Gift Cards
Membership
Self-Publishing


 Catalog

Catalog Quick Shop
Online Catalogs
Request our Catalogs







 Community

Social Media
Prayer Wall
Author Profiles


 About Us

Company Info.
Job Opportunities


 Help

Customer Service
FAQ






 Shops

Bibles
Homeschool
Bargains
VBS
Christian Living
Toys
Gifts
Kids
DVDs
Fiction
Music
Academics







Desktop Site










 1-800-CHRISTIAN1-800-247-4784(Outside the United Statesand Canada Call: 978-977-5000)




 Email Us


140 Summit St. Peabody, MA 01960





Tax Information for VT and LA Residents
Conditions of Use
Privacy Notice
© 2017 Christianbook.com, LLC
* 70 *




































Colin Powell - IMDb













































































 










 
IMDb




More





All
Titles
TV Episodes
Names
Companies
Keywords
Characters
Quotes
Bios
Plots










Movies,
                TV
                & Showtimes




MOVIES

In Theaters
Showtimes & Tickets
Latest Trailers
Coming Soon
Release Calendar
Top Rated Movies
Top Rated Indian Movies
Most Popular Movies

CHARTS & TRENDS

Box Office
Oscar Winners
Most Popular by Genre



TV & VIDEO

IMDb TV
On Tonight
Top Rated TV Shows
Most Popular TV Shows
Watch Now on Amazon
DVD & Blu-Ray

SPECIAL FEATURES

Amazon Originals
Streaming
Comic-Con
IMDb Picks
Superheroes







Celebs,
                Events
                & Photos




CELEBS

Born Today
Celebrity News
Most Popular Celebs

PHOTOS

Latest Stills
Latest Posters
Photos We Love



EVENTS

Awards Central
Oscars
Golden Globes
Sundance
Cannes
Comic-Con
Emmy Awards
Venice Film Festival
Toronto Film Festival
Festival Central
Tribeca
All Events







News &
Community





LATEST HEADLINES


 Leonard Landy, ‘Our Gang’ Actor, Dies at 84

11 hours ago


 ‘It’ Producer Says Tilda Swinton Was Eyed to Play Pennywise the Clown

12 hours ago


 Reese Witherspoon, Jennifer Aniston Team Up to Star in TV Series

12 hours ago





NEWS

Top News
Movie News
TV News
Celebrity News
Indie News

COMMUNITY

Contributor Zone
Polls







Watchlist




            YOUR WATCHLIST
    













 
 


 



The leading information resource for the entertainment industry
Find industry contacts & talent representation
Manage your photos, credits, & more
Showcase yourself on IMDb & Amazon
Go to IMDbPro


|

Help


 

 

 










Sign in with Facebook
Other Sign in options










 








 














 







STARmeter
SEE RANK


Down
28,810
this week


View rank on IMDbPro
»



 Colin Powell
(I)


 
Actor





Colin Powell was born on April 5, 1937 in New York City, New York, USA as Colin Luther Powell. He is an actor, known for Breath of Freedom (2014), For Love of Liberty: The Story of America's Black Patriots (2010) and Janet: The Velvet Rope (1998). He has been married to Alma Powell since August 25, 1962. They have three children.            
See full bio »
            
 


Born:

April 5, 
     
1937

            in
            New York City, New York, USA















 


12 photos
|
5 videos
|
266 news articles »                















 


ad feedback








Feedback: Please take 5 minutes to participate in our short IMDb survey     




Quick Links

 


Biography




Awards




Photo Gallery




 


Filmography (by Job)




Trailers and Videos







Filmography



by Year




by Job




by Ratings




by Votes




by Genre




by Keyword



Personal Details



Biography




Other Works




Publicity Listings




Official Sites




Contact Info (IMDbPro)



Did You Know?



Personal Quotes




Trivia 




Trademark



Photo & Video



Photo Gallery




Trailers and Videos



Opinion



Awards



Related Items



Credited With




NewsDesk




External Sites



Professional Services



Promote yourself with a resume




Add or change photos




Get more at IMDbPro





Explore More
Show Less






   What Movies Are Coming This Summer?                  Valerian and the City of a Thousand Planets            Superheroes, swimsuits, and special operatives await you in our Summer Movie Guide. Plan your season and take note of the hotly anticipated indie, foreign, and documentary releases, too. Check out our Summer Movie Guide 






Share this page:
















   Comic-Con Panel Photos                       Check out all the action from the star-studded panels at San Diego Comic-Con. View more panel photos 






 






Related News


Megan Leavey – Review



                                  9 June 2017 4:00 AM, -08:00
                                
|
WeAreMovieGeeks.com





‘Abstract: The Art Of Design’ Review: Netflix Docuseries A Frame-Buster



                                  8 February 2017 2:16 PM, -08:00
                                
|
Deadline TV





NBC News Fetes Tom Brokaw’s 50 Years At Network With Two-Hour Special



                                  23 January 2017 8:33 AM, -08:00
                                
|
Deadline TV




See all 266 related articles »
            









  Around The Web  |  Powered by ZergNet        






On Amazon Video



Watch Now


 Breath of Freedom
 



See more on Amazon Video »
                








Create a list »
                
User Lists
Related lists from IMDb users


 


Illegitimate son/father/brother



            a list of 220 people
            created 06 Jan 2011
        
 



 


Celeberties that I have met



            a list of 25 people
            created 16 Aug 2011
        
 



 


Left Handed Celebrities



            a list of 105 people
            created 29 Jan 2013
        
 



 


Conflictive 20th Century



            a list of 162 people
            created 04 Oct 2013
        
 



 


Male Celebrities Look Alikes! (It's Doppelgangers Time)!



            a list of 2046 people
            created 11 Feb 2014
        
 


See all related lists »
                







Do you have a demo reel?
Add it to your IMDbPage









Find out more at IMDb Pro »
        






Connect with IMDb









How Much Have You Seen?
How much of Colin Powell's work have you seen?





User Polls


 Friday Face-Off: V vs. Batman

 Costume Face-Off: Different Versions of Batman

 NO! Noo!! NoooOO!!!

 Most Inspiring Speech

 The Hero Types

 Favorite film starring Ruby Dee and Ossie Davis?

See more polls »







 









      1 win.
    

See more awards »    







Known For


 
 
Breath of Freedom
Himself

(2014)


 
 
For Love of Liberty: The Story of America's Black Patriots
Himself

(2010)


 
 
Janet: The Velvet Rope
Himself / special guest

(1998)


 
 
Anthrax War
Himself

(2009)











 Show all


 Hide all

 | 


Show by...
Job
Year »
Rating »
Number of Ratings »
Genre »
Keyword »


 | 
 Edit
 
Filmography

Jump to:
Actor
| Self
| Archive footage



Hide 
Show 
Actor (1 credit)




 1997

Talking with David Frost
(TV Series)


- Colin Powell and Maya Angelou
(1997)




Hide 
Show 
Self (101 credits)




 2018

The Automat
(Documentary) (post-production)

Himself



 2017

The Activists: War, Peace, and Politics in the Streets
(Documentary)

Himself



 2016

Jay Leno's Garage
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - Former US Secretary of State

- Love Stories
(2016)
... Himself - Former US Secretary of State




 2016

American Graduate Day
(TV Special)

Himself



 2012-2016

CBS This Morning
(TV Series)

Himself - Guest
/ Himself

- Episode #5.219
(2016)
... Himself
(as Gen. Colin Powell)


- Episode #2.64
(2013)
... Himself - Guest


- Episode #1.209
(2012)
... Himself - Guest




 2016

The Eighties
(TV Mini-Series documentary)

Himself - Fmr National Security Advisor (as Gen. Colin Powell)
/ Himself - Fmr National Security Advisor

- Tear Down This Wall
(2016)
... Himself - Fmr National Security Advisor (as Gen. Colin Powell)


- The Reagan Revolution
(2016)
... Himself - Fmr National Security Advisor
(as Gen. Colin Powell)




 2016/I

The Liberation of Kuwait
(Documentary)

Himself



 2015

American Graduate Day 2015
(TV Movie)

Himself



 2003-2015

Meet the Press
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 6 September 2015
(2015)
... Himself
(as Sec. Colin Powell)


- Episode dated 19 October 2008
(2008)
... Himself


- Episode dated 26 October 2003
(2003)
... Himself


- Episode dated 7 September 2003
(2003)
... Himself




 2005-2015

This Week
(TV Series)

Himself - Former Secretary of State
/ Himself

- Episode dated 8 March 2015
(2015)
... Himself - Former Secretary of State
(as Sec. Colin Powell)


- Episode dated 25 December 2005
(2005)
... Himself




 2014

Real Time with Bill Maher
(TV Series)

Himself - Guest

- Episode #12.27
(2014)
... Himself - Guest




 2014

The World Wars
(TV Mini-Series)

Himself



 2014

Breath of Freedom
(Documentary)

Himself



 2013

Nelson Mandela: The Myth and Me
(Documentary)

Himself, former U.S. Secretary of State



 2013

The African Americans: Many Rivers to Cross with Henry Louis Gates, Jr.
(TV Mini-Series documentary)

Himself

- A More Perfect Union
(2013)
... Himself




 2013

American Graduate Day
(TV Movie)

Himself



 2013

The Iraq War
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - US Secretary of State

- After the Fall
(2013)
... Himself - US Secretary of State


- Regime Change
(2013)
... Himself - US Secretary of State




 2013

America's Book of Secrets
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- Presidential Cover Ups
(2013)
... Himself




 2013

Channel 4 News
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 8 April 2013
(2013)
... Himself




 2012

World Business Satellite
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 6 December 2012
(2012)
... Himself




 2012

OnePeople: The Celebration
(Documentary)

Former Chairman of the Joint Chief of Staff & Former Secretary of State USA



 2005-2012

The Daily Show
(TV Series)

Himself

- Colin Powell
(2012)
... Himself


- Colin Powell
(2005)
... Himself
(as General Colin Powell)




 2008-2012

Tavis Smiley
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 11 June 2012
(2012)
... Himself


- Episode dated 7 January 2008
(2008)
... Himself




 1995-2012

The Tonight Show with Jay Leno
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode #20.151
(2012)
... Himself
(as General Colin Powell)


- Episode #14.38
(2006)
... Himself


- OJ: The Early Years
(1995)
... Himself




 2012

Fox and Friends
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 23 May 2012
(2012)
... Himself




 2012

Hannity
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 22 May 2012
(2012)
... Himself




 2012

More Than a Dream
(TV Movie documentary)




 2011

Putin, Russia and the West
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - Secretary of State, U.S.
/ Himself - U.S. Secretary of State

- War
(2011)
... Himself - Secretary of State, U.S.


- Democracy Threatens
(2011)
... Himself - Secretary of State, U.S.


- Taking Control
(2011)
... Himself - U.S. Secretary of State




 2011

Piers Morgan Tonight
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 10 November 2011
(2011)
... Himself




 2011

National Memorial Day Concert
(TV Special documentary)




 2011

42nd NAACP Image Awards
(TV Special)

Himself



 2011

Brian Williams Reports: The Reunion - The President and His Men, 20 Years After the Gulf War
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2004-2010

The View
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 9 September 2010
(2010)
... Himself


- Episode dated 21 January 2008
(2008)
... Himself


- Episode dated 24 September 2004
(2004)
... Himself




 2010

Turmoil & Triumph: The George Shultz Years
(TV Series documentary)

U.S. Sec'y. of State, 2001-05

- To Start the World Again
(2010)
... U.S. Sec'y. of State, 2001-05




 2010

America: The Story of Us
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- Superpower
(2010)
... Himself


- Millennium
(2010)
... Himself


- WWII
(2010)
... Himself


- Civil War
(2010)
... Himself


- Westward
(2010)
... Himself





Show all 8 episodes




 2010

National Memorial Day Concert
(TV Movie documentary)




 2010

José María Aznar. Una batalla inacabada
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2010

Good Morning America
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 2 March 2010
(2010)
... Himself




 2010

60 Minutes
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - Former Secretary of State (segment "The Bloom Box")

- Blackwater 61/The Bloom Box/Ground Zero
(2010)
... Himself - Former Secretary of State (segment "The Bloom Box")




 2010

For Love of Liberty: The Story of America's Black Patriots
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2010

Nuclear Tipping Point
(Documentary)

Himself



 2004-2010

Larry King Live
(TV Series)

Himself

- Haiti How You Can Help!
(2010)
... Himself


- Saving Lives!
(2009)
... Himself


- Colin Powell!
(2009)
... Himself


- Colin Powell
(2007)
... Himself


- Episode dated 17 October 2005
(2005)
... Himself





Show all 8 episodes




 2009

Yes We Will! BET's Inaugural Celebration (BET)
(TV Movie)

Himself



 2009

Transcendent Man
(Documentary)

Himself



 2009

Anthrax War
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2009

Iran and the West
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - US Secretary of State

- Nuclear Confrontation
(2009)
... Himself - US Secretary of State




 2009

Entertainment Tonight
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 2 February 2009
(2009)
... Himself




 2008

Today
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 20 October 2008
(2008)
... Himself




 2008

Ballou
(Documentary)

Himself



 2008

Leading to War
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2008

We Have a Dream
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2008

The Black List: Volume One
(Documentary)

Himself



 2007

Loose Change: Final Cut
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2007

National Memorial Day Concert
(TV Movie)

Himself



 2007

La nit al dia
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode #5.106
(2007)
... Himself




 2007

King: Man of Peace in a Time of War
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2006

Jonathan Dimbleby
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 30 April 2006
(2006)
... Himself




 2006

Now
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- Episode dated 3 February 2006
(2006)
... Himself




 2006

CMT: True Grit
(TV Series)

Himself

- Ronald Reagan
(2006)
... Himself




 2006

Gomorron
(TV Series)

Himself

- Malou möter Colin Powell
(2006)
... Himself




 2005

Charlie Rose
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 18 November 2005
(2005)
... Himself


- Episode dated 17 November 2005
(2005)
... Himself




 2005

Aristide and the Endless Revolution
(Documentary)

Himself



 2005

Out of Africa: Heroes and Icons
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2005

Truth, Lies and Intelligence
(Documentary)

Himself



 2005

First Command
(TV Series)

Himself

- MacArthur, Marshall, Powell
(2005)
... Himself




 2004

Time and Chance: Gerald Ford's Appointment with History
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2004

Caiga quien caiga - CQC
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 26 November 2004
(2004)
... Himself




 2004

Anderson Cooper 360°
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 18 June 2004
(2004)
... Himself




 2004

CNN Special Reports
(TV Series)

Himself - former Secretary of State

- Special: Remembering President Ronald Reagan
(2004)
... Himself - former Secretary of State




 2004

Paula Zahn Now
(TV Series)

Himself - former Secretary of State
/ Himself

- Special: Remembering President Ronald Reagan
(2004)
... Himself - former Secretary of State


- Episode dated 26 February 2004
(2004)
... Himself




 2004

The World According to Bush
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2004

Go' aften Danmark
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 29 April 2004
(2004)
... Himself




 2004

TV2 Nyhederne
(TV Series)

Himself - Udenrigsminister

- Episode dated 29 April 2004
(2004)
... Himself - Udenrigsminister




 2004

TV-Avisen
(TV Series)

Himself - Udenrigsminister

- Episode dated 29 April 2004
(2004)
... Himself - Udenrigsminister




 2004

Berlin Mitte
(TV Series)

Himself

- Anschlag auf die Freiheit - Besiegt der Terror die Demokratie?
(2004)
... Himself




 2004

CBS Evening News with Dan Rather
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 31 March 2004
(2004)
... Himself




 2004

Europe & USA: Behind the Scenes of a Political Rupture
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2002-2004

Frontline
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- Chasing Saddam's Weapons
(2004)


- The Man Who Knew
(2002)
... Himself




 2003-2004

BBC World News
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 8 January 2004
(2004)
... Himself


- Episode dated 10 December 2003
(2003)
... Himself


- Episode dated 20 November 2003
(2003)
... Himself
(uncredited)


- Episode dated 19 November 2003
(2003)
... Himself




 2000-2003

PBS NewsHour
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 30 June 2003
(2003)
... Himself


- Episode dated 22 January 2003
(2003)
... Himself


- Episode dated 30 September 2002
(2002)
... Himself


- Episode dated 30 May 2002
(2002)
... Himself


- Episode dated 25 January 2002
(2002)
... Himself





Show all 9 episodes




 2003

Sabine Christiansen
(TV Series)


- Scheitert der Krieg gegen den Terror?
(2003)




 2003

Breakfast with Frost
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 13 April 2003
(2003)
... Himself




 2003

20/20
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - Secretary of State (segment "Colin Powell")

- Colin Powell/Life for Lionel Tate
(2003)
... Himself - Secretary of State (segment "Colin Powell")




 2003

MTV Global Forum With...
(TV Mini-Series)

Himself - Host



 2002

America Beyond the Color Line with Henry Louis Gates Jr.
(TV Mini-Series documentary)

Himself



 2002

Caiga quien caiga
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 14 April 2002
(2002)
... Himself




 2001

Ronald Reagan: The Hollywood Years, the Presidential Years
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2000

The American President
(TV Series documentary)

William H. Taft

- The Balance of Power
(2000)
... William H. Taft
(voice)




 1999

Late Show with David Letterman
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode dated 28 June 1999
(1999)
... Himself




 1999

The 71st Annual Academy Awards
(TV Special)

Himself - Presenter: 'The Thin Red Line' & 'Saving Private Ryan' Film Clips



 1998

Janet: The Velvet Rope
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself
/ special guest



 1997

The Kennedy Center Honors: A Celebration of the Performing Arts
(TV Special)

Himself



 1997

Off the Menu: The Last Days of Chasen's
(Documentary)

Himself
(uncredited)



 1997

JAG
(TV Series)

Himself

- Jinx
(1997)
... Himself
(uncredited)




 1996

The Gulf War
(TV Movie)

Himself



 1995

25th Anniversary Essence Awards
(TV Special)

Himself - Honoree



 1993

Bob Hope: The First 90 Years
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 1992

The Buffalo Soldiers
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 1991

Operation Welcome Home
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 1991

Yellow Ribbon Party
(TV Special)

Himself



 1991

This Week
(TV Series)

Himself

- War - The Final Option
(1991)
... Himself




Hide 
Show 
Archive footage (75 credits)




 2017

The Nineties
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - Fmr Chairman Joint Chiefs of Staff

- Clinton: Can We All Get Along?
(2017)
... Himself - Fmr Chairman Joint Chiefs of Staff
(as Gen. Colin Powell)




 2017

Abstract: The Art of Design
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- Platon: Photography
(2017)
... Himself




 2016

All Governments Lie: Truth, Deception, and the Spirit of I.F. Stone
(Documentary)

Himself



 2015

The Empire Files
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- Empire Files with Abby Martin Launches First Show
(2015)
... Himself




 2014

Last Week Tonight with John Oliver
(TV Series)

Himself

- Nuclear Weapons and the United States
(2014)
... Himself
(uncredited)




 2014

Mike & Mike
(TV Series)

Himself - Former US Secretary of State

- Episode dated 1 May 2014
(2014)
... Himself - Former US Secretary of State




 2013

The Presidents' Gatekeepers
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2013

Panorama
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - U.S. Secretary of State, 2001-2005

- Panorama Special: The Spies Who Fooled the World
(2013)
... Himself - U.S. Secretary of State, 2001-2005




 2013

The World According to Dick Cheney
(Documentary)

Himself - Secretary of State



 2012

Whistleblowers: The Untold Stories
(TV Series)

Himself - Former Secretary of State

- Homeland Insecurity
(2012)
... Himself - Former Secretary of State


- Patriot Act
(2012)
... Himself - Former Secretary of State




 2012

Kriegsversprechen II - Terrormanagement im 21. Jahrhundert
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2012

Top Priority: The Terror Within
(Documentary)

Himself - Former Secretary of State



 2012

The Hunt for Bin Laden
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2012

Shadows of Liberty
(Documentary)

Himself - former US Secretary of State



 2012

Modern Spies
(Documentary)

Himself, US Secretary of State



 2012

America's Book of Secrets
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- The White House
(2012)
... Himself




 2011

The Strange History of Don't Ask, Don't Tell
(Documentary)

Himself



 2008-2011

Frontline
(TV Series documentary)

Himself
/ Himself - Secretary of State

- Top Secret America
(2011)
... Himself


- Bush's War: Part I
(2008)
... Himself - Secretary of State




 2011

The Tonight Show with Jay Leno
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode #19.203
(2011)
... Himself




 2000-2011

60 Minutes
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - Former General (segment "The Power of Positive Speaking")
/ Himself (segment "Curve Ball")
/ Himself - Former Secretary of State (segment "The Bloom Box")
/ ...

- Curve Ball/Counterfeit Drugs/The $125,000 Question
(2011)
... Himself (segment "Curve Ball")


- Stealing America's Secrets/The Bloom Box/The Birdmen
(2010)
... Himself - Former Secretary of State (segment "The Bloom Box")


- Wanted: Dead or Alive/The Closer!/O'Reilly
(2004)
... Himself - Secretary of State (segment "Wanted: Dead or Alive")


- Michelle Wie/The Summer Games/Out of Control
(2004)
... Himself - Secretary of State (segment "Out of Control")


- Condoleezza Rice/Judge Charles Pickering/Freddy Adu
(2004)
... Himself - Secretary of State (segment "Condoleezza Rice")





Show all 14 episodes




 2011/I

Ethos
(Documentary)

Himself



 2010

The War You Don't See
(Documentary)

Himself



 2010/I

Fair Game

Himself
(uncredited)



 2009

Pääministeri
(TV Movie)

Himself
(uncredited)



 2009

National Geographic Explorer
(TV Series documentary)

Himself - Secretary of State, 2001-2005

- Inside Guantanamo Bay
(2009)
... Himself - Secretary of State, 2001-2005




 2009

Will Ferrell: You're Welcome America - A Final Night with George W Bush
(TV Special)

Himself
(uncredited)



 2009

Dangerous Dynasty: The Bush Legacy
(Video documentary short)

Himself
(uncredited)



 2009

Obama: All Access
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2008

Being W
(Documentary)

Himself



 2008

The Queen: A Life in Film
(Video documentary)

Himself
(uncredited)



 2008

Superpower
(Documentary)

Himself



 2008

The O'Reilly Factor
(TV Series)

Himself

- The Life of Tony Snow
(2008)
... Himself


- Episode dated 9 May 2008
(2008)
... Himself




 2008

Fabled Enemies
(Documentary)

Himself



 2008

History of the National Security State
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2007

The Kingdom

Himself
(uncredited)



 2007

La nit al dia
(TV Series)

Himself

- Episode #5.158
(2007)
... Himself




 2007

Taking Liberties
(Documentary)

Himself



 2007

A Mighty Heart

Himself
(uncredited)



 2007

War Made Easy: How Presidents & Pundits Keep Spinning Us to Death
(Documentary)

Himself



 2007

Taxi to the Dark Side
(Documentary)

Himself



 2007

No End in Sight
(Documentary)

Himself



 2006

Shut Up & Sing
(Documentary)

Himself



 2006

...So Goes the Nation
(Documentary)

Himself



 2006

My Travels with Diana
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2005

Beyond Treason
(Video documentary)

Himself
(uncredited)



 2005

Favouritism
(TV Series)

Himself

- Boy George's Queerest TV Moments
(2005)
... Himself




 2005

Lykketoft finale
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself
(uncredited)



 2005

Letter to the President
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2005

The Complete History of U.S. Wars 1700-2004
(TV Series)

Himself

- The Police Wars
(2005)
... Himself




 2005

Why We Fight
(Documentary)

Himself



 2004

Inside the U.S. Secret Service
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself - U.S. Secretary of State 2001-2005



 2004

Celsius 41.11: The Temperature at Which the Brain... Begins to Die
(Documentary)

Himself



 2004

Der durstige Planet
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- Die Zukunft des Wassers
(2004)
... Himself
(uncredited)




 2004

Uncovered: The War on Iraq
(Documentary)

Himself



 2004

Fahrenheit 9/11
(Documentary)

Himself
(uncredited)



 2004

Le 11 septembre n'a pas eu lieu...
(TV Movie documentary)




 2004

Le grand complot
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2004

Danmark i krig
(TV Movie)

Himself - Minister of Foreign Affairs, USA



 2004

911: In Plane Site
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2004

Michael Moore, el gran agitador
(TV Short documentary)

Himself



 2004

The Power of Nightmares: The Rise of the Politics of Fear
(TV Mini-Series documentary)

Himself

- The Phantom Victory
(2004)
... Himself
(uncredited)




 2003

Get Up, Stand Up
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- What's Going On
(2003)
... Himself




 2003

CIA: Guerres secrètes
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself



 2003

The Revolution Will Not Be Televised
(Documentary)

Himself



 2001

Princess Diana: The Uncrowned Queen
(Video documentary)

Himself



 2000

Saturday Night Live: Presidential Bash 2000
(TV Special)

Himself
(uncredited)



 1998

Vietnam: A Marine Perspective
(Video documentary)

Himself (during Gulf War)
(uncredited)



 1998

Sworn to Secrecy: Secrets of War
(TV Series documentary)

Himself

- The Gulf War: Architects of Desert Storm
(1998)
... Himself
(uncredited)


- The Gulf War: Steel Rain
... Himself
(uncredited)




 1996

Courage Under Fire

Himself
(uncredited)



 1995

The Speeches of Nelson Mandela
(Video documentary)

Himself - Listens to Mandela
(uncredited)



 1994

The Holocaust: In Memory of Millions
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself - Dedication Attendee
(uncredited)



 1994

Coming Out Under Fire
(Documentary)

Himself - Chairman of the U.S. Joint Chiefs of Staff



 1992

The Panama Deception
(Documentary)

Himself
(uncredited)



 1992

The Horrors of War
(Video documentary)

Himself
(as Gen. Colin Powell)



 1991

Desert Storm: The War Begins
(TV Movie documentary)

Himself


 









Related Videos



 


 


 


See all 5 videos »
                

    
    @csm.csm_widget />
            



 Edit
 
Personal Details

Other Works:
Print ad, Sight for Students, 2001                    
See more

                    »
        


Publicity Listings:
    3 Print Biographies |
    8 Portrayals |
    4 Interviews |
    22 Articles |
    4 Magazine Cover Photos |

See more
»
        


Official Sites:
US Department of State - biography



Alternate Names:
            Gen. Colin Powell | General Colin Powell | Sec. Colin Powell
        


Height:
6' 2" (1.88 m)        








 Edit
 
Did You Know?

Personal Quote:
[2/24/01, in Cairo, Egypt] He [Saddam Hussein] has not developed any significant capability with respect to weapons of mass destruction. He is unable to project conventional power against his neighbors.                    
See more

                    »
        


Trivia:
Received the Defense Distinguished Service Medal with two Oak Leaf Clusters, the Distinguished Service Medal (Army), the Bronze Star, the Purple Heart and other awards.                    
See more

                    »
        


Star Sign:
Aries








Getting Started
|
Contributor Zone »
Contribute to This Page




Edit page



Add resume








   Get Caught Up on Comic-Con    Catch up with everything you missed at Comic-Con with IMDb's 2017 Comic-Con Guide.                  What Liam Cunningham 'Liberated' From the "Game of Thrones" Set                   Seth Rogen Talks About Awards Buzz for Disaster Artist           Browse Our Guide to Comic-Con 










 





 






IMDb Everywhere

 

 

 


Find showtimes, watch trailers, browse photos, track your Watchlist and rate your favorite movies and TV shows on your phone or tablet!
IMDb Mobile site




      Follow IMDb on
      
 

 

 









Home
Top Rated Movies
Box Office
TV
Coming Soon
Site Index
Search
In Theaters




Contact Us
 Register

News

Press Room
Advertising
Jobs




IMDbPro
 Box Office Mojo

 Withoutabox


Conditions of Use
Privacy Policy
 Interest-Based Ads










Copyright © 1990-2017
                IMDb.com, Inc.


                An Amazon.com company.
            




                Amazon Affiliates
            





Amazon Video
Watch Movies &TV Online






Prime Video
Unlimited Streamingof Movies & TV






Amazon Germany
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon Italy
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon France
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon India
Buy Movie andTV Show DVDs






DPReview
DigitalPhotography






Audible
DownloadAudio Books






























